		These bird may be the most intelligent descendants of the dinosaurs, and that may be their undoing.  Parrots have flourished throughout the tropics and subtropics, more than 300 species of them, in all sizes and every conceivable color.  But now they are disappearing from the wild, even as they multiply as pets, an unnatural evolution of wild creatures into collectors' items and commodities.		How did so many endangered parrots from distant forests find their way into American cages when laws forbid their import?  A special breed of cop, a team of wildlife investigators, has been tracking down the answer to that question.  They mounted the biggest undercover operation of its kind, a sting called "Operation Renegade."  The story of that investigation takes us on a journey across America to Australia, Africa and South America, yet it keeps returning to this unlikely building in Los Angeles and to a young man who knows as much as anyone alive about the victims of the story.		The story begins here in the Mexican border town of Tijuana, famous for offering visitors a variety of commerce, legal and otherwise.  An American bird dealer had complained to authorities that wild parrots bought here were being smuggled into the U.S., some with contagious diseases.  NOVA's concealed camera reveals how easy it is to be a parrot smuggler. All around Tijuana there are wild parrots for sale, cheap.		Customers are given smuggling lessons at no extra charge.  Simply put the birds in paper bags with some bird seed or maybe a little tequila, the vendors advise, and they'll keep quiet.		A parrot in a paper bag in a car trunk is not apt to be discovered by border guards.  Nor, in Tijuana's heat, is it likely to make the trip alive. The waste of wildlife and the risk of disease convinced the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service to assign several special agents to do something about the smuggling.  One of the agents was Rick Leach.  NOVA agreed to disguise his appearance and voice.  Leach suspected he was getting into something well beyond a local border problem.		Agent Leach had 20 years' experience as an undercover investigator in narcotics before he switched to wildlife, but this case would be something new.		With a bird dealer tutoring him, Leach learned that some parrots could be sold for as much as $10,000 apiece in the United States.  Why would anyone pay that kind of money for a bird?  Bonnie Jay is a portrait photographer.  Her models are all parrots.  She owns two herself.		Kathleen Harring has a collection of rare and exotic parrots that's famous in southern Florida. It's also a large breeding operation with about 800 pairs of birds.  Although it's a business, sales are secondary.		As Fish and Wildlife investigators learned, parrots have a very devoted following.		Several hundred of the faithful attended this conference on the subject in Toronto, Canada.		Many came to hear this man, a self-  taught prodigy on parrots, Tony Silva.		Tony Silva began studying and collecting birds when he was 9.  At age 16, he was writing articles about them, and had published his first book before he was 20.		So Silva went off to the jungles of South America to study exotic parrots in the wild.  He wrote articles urging bird dealers to avoid buying smuggled parrots, describing cruel methods used to trap and ship them.  He discovered new methods of breeding endangered birds.  Still in his 20s, Silva was chosen to be the bird curator of a famous animal preserve in the Canary Islands.  He became the idol of parrot collectors and breeders all over the world.  And yet he recognizes a flaw in bird lovers like himself.		Many of the most coveted birds are parrots known as cockatoos which come from Australia.  It has been 40 years since Australia allowed any of its wild birds to be exported.  And yet, American breeders and collectors seem to have plenty of them, even endangered species.  To find out how this was happening, American wildlife agents went to Australia.  In the Australian state of Queensland, mostly unpopulated countryside larger than Texas and California combined, there are only two officers assigned to protect the wildlife.  In the even larger state of Western Australia, where many species of endangered cockatoos are making their last stand, the situation is much the same.  Farms here have gradually swallowed the bush, leaving only small patches of old trees for the birds.  Then the smugglers come, like looters after a disaster.		Kingsley Miller has spent more than 20 years trying to save endangered birds like this cockatoo.		Miller is a wildlife officer in Western Australia and has learned to think like the smugglers, to know what they're looking for, and get there ahead of them.		In robbing the cockatoo nests, the poachers not only steal a generation of birds, but spoil the nesting places for future generations.		This is likely to be the next adventure for a stolen baby cockatoo. Hidden somewhere in the 100 million pieces of luggage that go in and out of Australian airports in a year.  Customs officers watching the people, looking for smugglers, rely on tips, instinct and luck.  Tony Hanrahan and Mark Bush specialize in catching wildlife smugglers.		The suitcase full of endangered birds discovered by Australian customs that day belong to this man, Tony Somerville, a highly regarded guide for wildlife photographers.  It cost him two years in prison.		Somerville says that what he was trying to do by smuggling birds out of Australia was save them.		Like other bird dealers around the world, Somerville claims some species can no longer exist in the wild, and the only way to preserve them is to somehow get them to breeders in other countries, and he says that's what he was doing.		Australian investigators, who found a secret room beneath Somerville's home full of smuggling paraphernalia, contend he was not helping birds at all.  He was making a lot of money.  But wildlife officers like Kingsley Miller admit there's an irony involved in imprisoning people for selling cockatoos and other Australian parrots.	Although Australian law forbids the export of its birds, Australian farmers are allowed to kill many of them as pests, even some endangered kinds.		Some of the most highly prized birds thrive on farm crops, so Australia has a love-  hate relationship with its parrots, and either way, the bird loses.		There are too many travelers with too much luggage to search them all.  Most smuggled birds get through and, dead or alive, make their way to airports and pet markets half a world away.		Now wildlife agent Rick Leach understood how the birds were getting out of Australia, but he realized it would take more than catching a few individuals with parrots in their suitcases to make a real dent in the illegal bird trade. Leach and his colleagues had something more ambitious in mind. Their plan, Operation Renegade, took them into a warehouse section of south Los Angeles.		The federal agents were less interested in catching individual smugglers, the couriers, than in flushing out the people who hired them, the dealers.  To do that, they would become part of the smuggling operation.  But how?  They found the answer to that in one of the small warehouses.  It was a quarantine station.  Every bird brought into America must spend 30 days in a sealed building like this while it's tested for contagious diseases.  The Department of Agriculture regulates the quarantine stations, but private bird dealers actually own many of them.  This one happened to be for sale.		Richard Furzer owns a huge aviary in the hills near Santa Barbara, California.  He grew up in Africa, trained himself in the wild to be a naturalist.  He became fascinated with birds, and after he moved to America, began to import and sell them.		In the two years before he met Agent Leach, Furzer had imported more than 280,000 wild birds, mostly finches and canaries, but thousands of costly parrots as well.  He specialized in African gray parrots, considered the best talkers of all.  His business was perfectly legal as far as anyone knew, legal and, he still insists, beneficial.		If wasn't pleasure that Furzer had in mind when he talked to Rick Leach a few months after selling him the quarantine station.  It was money. Furzer invited Leach to go in with him on a shipment of birds from Africa. Leach recorded the conversation.		What Leach had been invited into was a major bird laundering operation.  It involved a great number of parrots, parrots smuggled out of African countries that forbid their export and into other African countries that allow it.  And from those countries the birds are shipped on to America, everything apparently legal.  So even the parrots with official papers were smuggled birds.  To help them prove this, the American investigators turned to the bird expert of the Bronx Zoo, Dr. Donald Bruning.		By day, Leach and his colleagues tended the hundreds of birds passing through the quarantine station.  By night, using a home video camera to document it, they were weighing and measuring the birds to prove by their size their actual country of origin.		Assistant U.S. Attorney John Walsh, in Los Angeles, was working closely with agent Leach.		The shipments of birds continued to arrive at Leach's quarantine station, headquarters of the sting, and he kept taking pictures.		Kathleen Harring resents the idea that bird dealers like herself are the enemies of wild parrots.  Just the opposite, she says.		But not everyone agrees with her.  The Fish and Wildlife Service claims that some endangered parrots are making a comeback in the wild, thanks to new efforts to protect them, and collectors and breeders of wild birds undermine those efforts.		Harring argues that, although breeders begin with birds taken from the wild, in the long run, this spares wild birds by supplying the pet trade with parrots born to be pets.		Bonnie Jay's white cockatoo has been sneaking out of its cage and eating her photographs.  Bonnie has brought in Chris Davis to help her with the problem.		Chris Davis is a parrot shrink.  She makes her living advising people how to co-  exist with their birds.		Davis has a house full of parrots of her own and is convinced they are something more than birds or pets.		Another person who finds parrots irresistible is Nan Crandall.  She filled her tiny Los Angeles apartment with them.		She had the perfect job for a bird lover.  It was with the Agriculture Department, tending people's pet birds from other countries as they waited in quarantine for 30 days.		She played music and danced for the caged birds, bought medicine for them with her own money, and sometimes around Christmas, let the pet birds out of quarantine early.		The quarantine station Crandall ran for the government was just a few blocks from the one Rick Leach had bought.  They became friends.  She knew him as Richard Britton, bird importer.		Somehow it all went wrong, the job, the obsession with animals, her friendship with Leach.		Nan Crandall had befriended smugglers, and the government accused her of helping them.  The smugglers gave her some pet birds, but there's no evidence she ever made any money out of it.		Her hobby, according to the government's charges, had made Nan Crandall part of an international smuggling operation which amounted to a parrot migration gone berserk, parrots laundered or smuggled from Africa, South America and Australia to the United States.  The Australian smugglers then returned home with some of the African and South American birds, the parrots becoming more exotic and increasing in value at every stop, or dying along the way.		September 1991, nesting time for cockatoos in Australia.  Several American smugglers were known to be there at the time.  Australian officers who were now part of Operation Renegade knew every move the smugglers made. Officers Bush and Hanrahan were watching them when they arrived at Sydney airport for the return trip.		The smugglers were becoming more sophisticated, investigators learned.  Rather than live birds, they were smuggling eggs. 	Each man had between 30 and 40 cockatoo eggs hidden in pouches under his shirt.  Had they been able to smuggle the birds into America and hatch them, each bird might have sold for several thousand dollars.  The American investigators, meanwhile, held off arresting individual smugglers, waiting for bigger game.  Their undercover operation had spread east to Florida. They were eager to learn what this man knew. He's a Florida veterinarian named Thomas Goldsmith.		Most bird collectors in the area have been Goldsmith's clients at one time or another.		But it was one particular case of Goldsmith's that most interested the investigators.  It involved some South American parrots named hyacinth macaws, the largest and most spectacular parrot of all, and one of the rarest and most protected.		Goldsmith says he remembers his client receiving about 35 hyacinth macaws from a supplier based in Chicago.		NOVA found Dr. Goldsmith's client in Atlanta federal prison.  He is a narcotics smuggler serving a 100-  year term.  His name is Mario Tabraue, and he says he did, indeed, buy 35 sick parrots.		Tabraue's drug smuggling financed his collection of rare birds and animals.  He readily admits that most of them were probably smuggled, and says those 35 hyacinth macaws were for sure.		Tony, from Chicago.  Tony Silva, the expert's expert.  The protector of endangered parrots. Tony Silva a smuggler?  The investigators assigned to Operation Renegade had heard the stories about Silva and began to build a case against him.  They drew up an affidavit saying they had still another witness, a secret informant who had tape recorded Silva asking him to help smuggle endangered birds from Brazil to the United States.  The birds would be placed in plastic tubing inside the door panels of automobiles for the trip across the border at Tijuana, Mexico.  According to the affidavit, Silva had said his mother was involved too. Veterinarian Goldsmith says Tony Silva asked him to be his personal vet.		Silva's attorney advised him not to respond to accusations against him, but he did talk about the atmosphere in his esoteric field.		As Fish and Wildlife agents continued to investigate Tony Silva, they were nearing the end of the undercover operation against other bird dealers.  They had watched $6 million worth of wild parrots arrive in America under suspicious circumstances.  Finally, on January 16, 1992, officials on both sides of the Pacific sprang the trap.		In California they raided Richard Furzer's aviary.  They raided the home of Nan Crandall. They raided Tony Silva's home in Chicago and the home of his mother.  They raided three of Miami's biggest bird dealerships.  One of them was Kathleen Harring's aviary, Love Them Birds.  They seized some of her rarest prized birds.  Two of those birds would die.  Hundreds of birds taken that day were held as evidence in a secret warehouse.  Many would stay there for almost two years.		Two years after the investigators closed their bogus quarantine station, ending the sting, the case is far from complete.  Twenty-  nine people in three countries have been convicted of crimes. Several others are under federal indictment in the United States.  Tony Silva has still not been charged with any crime.  He remains under investigation.  The two largest bird importers in Miami also are still under investigation with no indictments yet. No charges have been brought against Kathleen Harring's business, Love Them Birds.  She is still furious about the raid and the accusations that she was somehow involved in smuggling.		Richard Furzer, the California bird dealer who introduced Agent Leach to bird-  laundering, plead guilty to smuggling and income tax evasion and has begun serving an 18-  month term in prison. Nan Crandall was convicted of smuggling.  She was also sentenced to 18 months in prison.  She is now appealing that conviction.		Sometime after Operation Renegade ended, at an auction dock near San Diego, we meet some of the victims, parrots confiscated by the government.		Not all of these parrots were the result of the sting.  Some had been seized when ordinary people tried to smuggle them into the country.		But where is home?  Are cages the only future for the wild parrot? Some believe the parrots' long lives disguise the full extent of the damage already done them.  The poaching of eggs and young birds for the pet trade may have left some species with mainly old parrots that no longer reproduce.  Their flocks may be, in effect, only illusions of species already extinct.		After two years in a government warehouse, the birds of Operation Renegade were now ready for the next phase of their lives.		From contraband, to evidence, to commodity.		For 30 million years these strange creatures have lived free and graced the world with their beauty, only to find themselves now at our mercy, caught between our greed, our obsession, and our good intentions.  	For those who hope to reconstruct the story of life on earth, to reveal the substance of creatures long vanished and the origin of those that live today, fossil bones are vital clues. They're unlike any other objects of scientific study.  So rare, so irreplaceable, and so compelling that they're often viewed as treasure. And treasure can be a curse as well as a blessing. On May 14, 1992, the town of Hill City, South Dakota, woke up to a raid. Thirty-five Federal agents, police, and National Guardsmen surrounded a warehouse owned by Peter Larson.	Word spread that they were looking for a vicious predator named Sue. But no shots were fired. And in the end, Sue went peacefully, all ten tons. The finest specimen of Tyrannosaurus rex ever found.  T. rex, the undisputed king of the dinosaurs, among the largest carnivores ever to walk the earth, is still creating an uproar 65 million years after drawing its last living breath. This T. rex, half its bones still encased in rock, is at the center of a government crackdown on modern-day prospectors, who hunt for gold in the form of fossil bones.  The prime target for the better part of a decade has been the Black Hills Institute of Geological Research. Over the past twenty years, Peter Larson, his brother Neal, and partner Bob Farrar, have built a thriving commercial fossil business.  Yearly sales in the neighborhood of a million dollars make them the biggest players in the small world of the fossil trade. Their small museum in Hill City is a popular stop on the summer tourist trail. But their real business is collecting, preparing, and selling fossils to museums, universities, and private collectors around the world.  They're known in the trade as dealers in everything from inexpensive fossil invertebrates to dinosaurs that sell for hundreds of thousands of dollars.  The Larson brothers have been digging fossils since they were children growing up on the family ranch in South Dakota.  But as the raid continued, they suddenly found themselves on dangerous ground.	Their troubles began during the summer of 1990, when they became acquainted with the owner of a ranch on the Cheyenne River Sioux reservation in South Dakota.  Maurice Williams invited the Black Hills crew to look around on his property.	A few days later, Sue Hendrickson went exploring on the Williams ranch.  At the bottom of a cliff, she discovered some interesting bone fragments, which she took back to Larson.	At the cliff face, the Larson brothers saw what appeared to be the find of a lifetime
 a Tyrannosaurus rex embedded in the rock.	For the Black Hills crew, it would be hard to imagine anything more exciting.  A Tyrannosaurus rex is the ultimate prize for a fossil hunter. It's been that way since the first one was discovered at the turn of the century. Christened "The Tyrant Lizard King," the forty-five-foot monster with eight-inch teeth became a huge favorite with the public and a source of continuing fascination for science.  But for all its notoriety, T. rex is known from only a handful of skeletons, none more than 75% complete.  So, the discovery on Maurice Williams' ranch was incredible.  More than 90% complete, it was also the largest T. rex ever found, with a beautifully preserved skull. They named it Sue, after its discoverer and documented the excavation on home video.  Fully prepared, this T. rex could be worth millions of dollars.  But Larson told Maurice Williams they planned to make it the centerpiece of their own museum in Hill City.	Larson wrote Williams a check for $5,000 and finished the excavation. Back at their place in Hill City, as they began chipping away at the rock matrix, they realized that Sue was even more impressive than they'd first thought.  Unusual details such as bite wounds on the skull.  A healed broken leg.  And one of only two known T. rex upper arm bones added to its scientific interest.  Sue clearly ranked among the finest dinosaurs ever found.  So when the story of the discovery appeared in the newspaper, a number of parties took more than a casual interest.  The tribal council of the Cheyenne River Sioux checked the status of Maurice Williams' ranch. They discovered that, although he owns the property, years ago, he put it in trust with the Federal government to make it exempt from property taxes, a common practice on reservation land. The tribe contended that no one could buy any part of his land, including fossils, without government permission.  The tribal chairman claimed that Larson admitted knowing as much, soon after the discovery.	And did he ever admit guilt, as Gregg Bourland claimed?	But the tribal council disagreed and drafted a resolution asking the U.S. Attorney to help them get the dinosaur back.	Meanwhile, Maurice Williams asked the U.S. Attorney to help him get the dinosaur back, denying that he never sold it to Larson in the first place.	So, almost two years later, the U.S. Attorney for South Dakota ordered the dinosaur seized and began a criminal investigation of the Black Hills Institute.	Fossil hunting, and fossil wars, have been part of the North American experience ever since white settlers began carving up the land west of the Mississippi in the 19th century.  Discoveries of fantastic skeletons created a sensation.  The big eastern museums hired fossil hunters to stake claims and dig up the bones.  Competition was intense, and not always friendly.  Dig sites were often armed camps.  Back east, museums prepared the specimens for display. But eventually, the dinosaur halls were full.  Collection efforts were scaled back, and then virtually wiped out by the Great Depression.  But in the 1970s, dinosaurs came roaring back.  With new discoveries, their image changed from lumbering reptiles to active, possibly warm-blooded animals.  Now, they're an industry in themselves, and an early interest in science for children around the world.  People everywhere want dinosaurs.  But robotic theme parks, like this one near Tokyo, aren't enough to satisfy true dinosaur lovers. Unfortunately, fossils of the real thing are harder to come by.  Dinosaurs lived all over the world, from the Arctic to the South Pole, but good-quality skeletons are extremely rare.  None have been found in Japan, and few in Europe.  But they are found in North America.  So, museum buyers from around the world join the crowd at huge fossil shows each year in Tucson and Denver.	Most countries have strict laws governing the export of fossils.  But America is wide open, and the foreign buyers know it.	The Black Hills Institute is just one of many dealers selling North American fossils to a broad range of customers.  At the low end of the market are buyers from educational supply houses, schools, and gift shops, looking for common, inexpensive fossils.  Further up the scale are national retailers and high-end fossil shops catering to private collectors and decorators. And at the top end are international museum buyers looking for impressive and rare display pieces.  But not everyone is happy about the booming fossil trade, least of all, professional paleontologists like Robert Hunt, of the University of Nebraska.	A big concern among paleontologists like Jack Horner is that commercial collectors don't always take the time to preserve the context of the fossils they find, the small clues that give fossils meaning.	In the summer of 1990, while the Black Hills Institute was excavating Sue in South Dakota, Jack Horner's crew was busy excavating another T. rex two hundred miles away in Montana.  Working slowly and carefully to preserve all the information at the site, Horner's dig took ten people five weeks to complete.  It took six people from the Black Hills Institute less than three weeks to get Sue out of the ground.	Kirby Siber is one of the biggest fossil dealers in Europe, and a longtime friend and business associate of Peter Larson.  Here, at a private quarry in Wyoming, he's excavating a young apatasaur for his own museum in Switzerland.  He thinks many good commercial collectors are unfairly blamed for the actions of a few.	Siber admits, though, that science and commerce sometimes require different approaches.	European commercial collectors are used to a more cooperative relationship with paleontologists, and Siber insists on quality documentation.	That's what happened to David Weishampel of Johns Hopkins University. After three years of work at a site on private land, he arrived one summer to find that he was no longer welcome.  He blames the change on the arrival of commercial collectors in the area.	Like most scientists, Weishampel has neither the budget nor the inclination to compete with commercial collectors.	Most American museums cannot afford to buy top end dinosaurs from commercial dealers.  With a few exceptions, they use their own staff paleontologists to collect new specimens.  But foreign museums are a different story. Especially in Japan, where many new museums are in development, paying the high cost of commercially collected fossils is the quickest way to build new collections from scratch.  Even so, commercial collectors who work without institutional support claim selling fossils is no way to get rich.	In the year following the seizure, the Black Hills Institute wages an all-out war to "Free Sue."  They run an aggressive public relations campaign out of their Hill City office.	Every visitor to the gift shop gets a crash course in fossil politics.  Through it all is a constant theme of abuse of power by the government.	Their attorneys file a civil suit against the government, demanding the return of Sue.  And the dinosaur sits in a warehouse in Rapid City while the custody battle rages on.  Public protests mounted by the Institute get louder and more abrasive.  U.S. attorney Kevin Schieffer is singled out for special abuse.  The attack is relentless and sometimes ugly.	Schieffer doesn't have much to say in public, but behind the scenes, he's turned up the heat on the criminal investigation of the Institute.  In January, 1993, Federal prosecutors subpoena thousands of BHI business records.	Investigators sift through the seized records looking for evidence of crimes, specifically, of taking fossils from Federal land.  The western states are checkerboards of private and public land—national parks, Forest Service, BLM, and parts of Indian reservations.  It's often arid, eroded country passed up by homesteaders in the 1800s.  But that same quality makes it a rich source of fossils as new specimens weather out of the ground.  It's long been government policy to deny access to commercial collectors.  Collecting without a permit amounts to theft of government property, though the law has rarely been enforced.  Former park ranger Vince Santucci has spent years documenting cases of fossil poaching in national parks.	But now, there's energy and enthusiasm to spare. Using field notes seized from the Black Hills Institute, investigators begin searching for illegal excavation sites on Federal land.	At each site, they also search for evidence that would tie BHI employees to the location.  As the investigation grows, dozens of agents follow leads all over the west and as far away as Japan and South America.  In July, 1993, the FBI returns to Hill City, armed with a search warrant.	144,000 acres of South Dakota's Badlands National Park overlap the Pine Ridge reservation of the Oglala Sioux.  The tribe is responsible for enforcing park regulations on this part of the reservation.  Terry Roy is the chief ranger for tribal land.  He spends a lot of time chasing fossil poachers.	Most of the time, poachers in this part of the park are local people.	It's common knowledge among the rangers that local poachers are working for dealers off the reservation.	The Pine Ridge reservation has the lowest per capita income of any county in the United States. Unemployment is 80%.  Calvin Ferguson has a part-time job as a bus driver, but until recently, he was doing much better as a fossil hunter.	Over the years, the buyers showed the local people how to make a living in the fossil trade.	Federal investigators suspect that some of those fossils were finding their way to the Black Hills Institute.  But when the rangers started cracking down on the poachers, the buyers got scarce.	The fossil trade can be a mixed blessing for Native Americans.	In the meantime, Calvin drives the bus and looks forward to being a legitimate collector someday, a change that would not only provide some local employment, but would also help deter the most serious threat posed to paleontology by the fossil black market
 illegal traders attempting to cover their tracks.	In November, 1993, a Federal grand jury in Rapid City returns a thirty-nine count indictment, charging the Black Hills Institute partners with fifteen instances of fossil theft from public land, and a long list of white collar crimes, like conspiracy and wire fraud, arising from the sale of those fossils.  Around the same time, the 8th Circuit Court of Appeals rules that the Institute has no legal claim to the T. rex called Sue.	The partners gather at lawyer Patrick Duffy's office to hear the details.	This is also bad news for the Cheyenne River Sioux, who have lost their claim to the T. rex as well.	On December 10th, 1993, the Black Hills defendants report to the Federal Court House to plead not guilty to all counts of the criminal indictment.  There are no charges relating to the T. rex, but the defendants contend they are being targeted because of Sue.	The prosecutors, who've been working the case for more than three years, deny that there's any retribution involved, despite the anti-government rhetoric of the "Save Sue" campaign.	The prosecutors have little to say to the press. They've spent millions of dollars building their case and don't want it jeopardized with pre-trial publicity.  It's been expensive for the defendants as well, who have run up legal bills over a hundred thousand dollars.  That night, they gather at Peter Larson's house to watch the news.	For the first time ever in the United States, people are facing serious jail time for fossil crimes.	In fact, they each face more than three hundred years in prison and twelve million dollars in fines.  But the harsh penalties are not for the fossil thefts, which are minor offenses under current law.  It's the white collar crimes that could send them to prison.  Many people feel there should be tougher laws to protect fossils in the first place.	To the dismay of most scientists, in the current political climate of deregulation, Congress is more likely to open up Federal land to commercial collecting than to toughen laws against it.	Most commercial collectors argue that Federal land should be opened up, without restriction, for the good of the fossils.	Whatever changes lie ahead in fossil law will come too late for the Black Hills Institute defendants, who finally go to trial more than a year after their indictment.	After seven weeks of testimony, scores of witnesses, and the presentation of hundreds of pieces of evidence, the case goes to the jury, and the defendants go home to wait.  Three weeks later, the jury returns its verdict.  They find Peter Larson guilty of two felonies for failure to report carrying currency over $10,000 in and out of the country, and two misdemeanors for theft of government property worth less than $100.  Bob Farrar, guilty of two felonies for undervaluing fossils on export declarations. Neal Larson, guilty of one misdemeanor for theft of government property worth less than $100.  And for the Institute, one felony for retaining a fossil fish stolen from Badlands National Park, three felony customs violations, and one misdemeanor for theft of government property. The jury votes to acquit on seventy-three other charges, and is hung on sixty-eight.  Despite felony convictions, the defense claims victory.	Cleared of the most serious charges, but still facing the possibility of prison time when sentence is passed, the Black Hills partners once again go home to wait.  The message to the fossil trade is clear
 Until further notice, public land is off limits.  Now, the question is, can science and commerce find ways to co-exist?  In at least one case, they already have.  Here on the Blackfeet reservation in Northern Montana.  Jack Horner worked here for years before a company called Canada Fossils approached the tribe with a business proposition.  They would pay tribal members to dig dinosaurs and prepare the bones, and pay the tribe a royalty on sales.  But first, they had to contend with Jack.	So, Horner keeps an eye on the fossils coming out of the ground and makes sure that nothing important is lost to science.  And Canada Fossils brings its resources to the preservation of material that might otherwise be lost to erosion. In a field with barely enough institutional support to begin with, a cooperative venture like this one can help everyone involved, including the landowner, in this case, the Blackfeet, who have seen a lot of valuable fossils leave their reservation over the past hundred years.	Dorothy Flamand works for Canada Fossils as a digger and a preparator.  She's been collecting dinosaur bones since she was a little girl.	A hunter.  A hunter so strong that it can pull down prey ten times its own weight.  So intelligent and capable that primitive man followed it to scavenge from its kills.  A hunter which, because of its very success, has now been banished by man to the most remote and barren of wildernesses.  The howl of the wolf, the sound of the unknown.  And yet, wolves are more familiar to us than we might think.  Stone Age people took their pups and tamed them, and all our domesticated dogs are descended from them.  Indeed, the very characteristics we most admire in our dogs—loyalty and intelligence and courage—are precisely the characters that the wolf has to have to survive in the wild.  And yet, whereas the dog has become man's best friend, the wolf remains one of his most feared enemies.  It is time we saw the wolf for what it really is. Northern Canada in winter is a bleak and unpromising land for any hunter.  But the wolf is indefatigable.  Its senses are so acute that it can interpret what is going on around it with a degree of subtlety that is beyond our imagining. It has a loose-limbed trot that is so effective and economical of energy that it can cover 50 miles in 24 hours, and do so for day after day after day.  The raven is a scavenger, and wolves are not above joining it, for the winter brings many casualties—easy meat.  Many wolves, for much of the time, operate as a pack.  They have such an extraordinary degree of intuition that their understanding of one another's intentions often seems beyond normal explanation.  Younger members learn from the older, more experienced ones so that the whole group operates as a unified and highly skilled team.  For all of these reasons, human hunters everywhere have admired the wolf.  Even today, the native people of the North call it "The Teacher," and honor its special powers with dances.  In Europe, when people settled down to farm, the wolf's image changed from deity to devil and fertile imaginations wove frightening legends around it.  As farmers cleared the forests, the wolves developed a taste for livestock.  The innocent lamb and the savage wolf became powerful symbols which the Church used to demonstrate the existence of Satan.  So, wolves were hunted without mercy. Eventually, they were driven out of most of Europe's forests, but an irrational fear of them has remained.  It takes huge commitment and great dedication to study wolves.  It also takes a lot of air miles.  A single pack may have a vast range, hundreds of miles across.  Biologist Mike Nelson is on a wolf patrol in the wilderness near the American Great Lakes.  The leader of the project, Dr. David Mech, has been studying wolves here for 25 years. The team seldom catches sight of the animals.  Instead, they follow a pack not by sight, but by sound.  They trapped wolves from several packs and fitted them with collars that emit different radio signals.  So now, by homing in on the signals, they've mapped the boundaries of each pack territory—boundaries that are rigorously marked and defended, and on a good day, they may actually catch a glimpse of the wolves themselves. 	Wolves are wary and elusive, so we may never know the whole truth about their lives. Fragments of evidence must be pieced together. Wolves can respond intelligently to changing conditions, which keeps wolf biologists guessing.  Mech and Nelson can only begin to understand how wolf packs operate by examining when and what they eat.  And this is work that has to be done on foot.  The wolves may have scattered for now, but they left lots of clues around their deer kill, which Mech and Nelson must interpret, much as detectives would at the scene of a crime. 	The quality and amount of bone marrow will tell them about the deer's health before it died. Teeth samples will establish its age, and scuffle marks in the snow will indicate how many wolves were involved in the chase and in the final kill.  Mech and Nelson will deduce why that particular white-tailed deer became vulnerable.  In these Minnesota forests, Mech and Nelson have established that it is old, young, or sick deer that are most likely to be killed by wolves.  A fit deer, with all its senses tuned to danger, can usually spot a wolf in time, and escape.  The numbers and size of prey animals in any area affect the size of wolf packs.  In Northern Minnesota, there are many white-tailed deer and moose, so some packs can be 15-strong. The pack is dominated by an adult pair who are often together for life. Offspring from the previous three years make up the rest of the group.  These pups look fully grown, but they're still learning from their parents. Their schooling is long, and their family life intense.  Wolf packs are no more than highly organized and mobile nurseries.  And it is this extraordinary mobility which makes them so difficult to observe at close range.  To get close to a wolf on the ground, you have to be able to think like a wolf, and observe and interpret the same signs that they use in making their decisions.  These wolves in Northern Canada are exceptional.  They follow and attempt to kill the formidable and massive of all prey animals—buffalo.  These buffalo belong to the last of the great herds that once covered the North American grasslands. Wolf packs have shadowed them for thousands of years.  Although the wolves here are the largest in the world—Some weigh over 125 pounds—an adult buffalo may weigh over a ton.  So, bringing one down is both difficult and dangerous. Snow can sometimes give wolves an advantage.  Their splayed paws act like snowshoes, so that they can move over the top of crusted snow in places where other animals would sink into the drifts.  To make up for their relatively small size, these wolves rely heavily on teamwork.  They move among the buffalo, sizing up the herd, looking for an animal that might be vulnerable, and therefore easier to bring down.  The buffaloes stand their ground.  If the pack can persuade the herd to move, then the older and weaker animals will become more obvious.  The wolves are choosing their moment very carefully, because in each buffalo hunt, they are risking their lives.  The wolves' first attack is a test.  It will help them to decide whether to back off or whether to build up the pressure. They've selected a possible victim.  If they can isolate it from the herd, they will be able to deny it security and food.  Day after day, they keep up the pressure.  The stress on the buffalo becomes both physical and psychological, draining it of energy and determination.  It's a long process.  But the wolves are patient.  If the wolves are successful, they will have enough meat to last the whole pack for a week.  If the buffalo manages to regain the safety of the herd, then the wolves will have to start all over again.  Here in the high arctic, members of the pack keep in touch with one another over vast distances.  Prey may be widely scattered. Herds of musk ox, for instance, may be tens of miles apart.  Arctic wolves have to cover a lot of ground.  Often, they are forced to live on smaller prey, such as arctic hare.  But hares are alert and quick, and although there are many of them, they are very difficult to catch. They're not much more than a snack for a wolf, and when you're on such short rations, you have no energy to spare. Even if jaegers harass you because you have inadvertently gotten close to their nest, it's not worth the energy to respond.  Calories may be short, but relationships are strong.  This is the seventh spring that this wolf couple have been together. Ellesmere Island, where these wolves live, is in almost perpetual darkness during the five months of winter.  When summer arrives, the thick fur, which helped the wolf survive the bitter cold, becomes an irritation.  It's a pleasure to get rid of it.  This far north, the summer is very short, so the arrival of young has to be precisely timed.  Arctic hares have already produced their babies, and the leverets are busy cropping the new plant shoots.  But if the wolves themselves are to breed successfully, their hunting efforts must go up a gear.  Wolves have an eloquent body language.  The female uses it to persuade the male to go out to find food. There is no stalking cover for the male wolf, and adult hares can easily sprint and bounce out of danger.  The leverets tend to lie low.  The young hare has speed—but the wolf has stamina.  The female wants her share.  This tug of war reflects an internal struggle, the battle between a wolf's individual needs and its team spirit.  The female wins the hare without too much trouble—which suggests that there's more at stake than this meal.  The pair may already have pups hidden away in their den.  By keeping her partner hungry, the female forces him to continue his search for food.  Further south, the buffalo are also shedding their winter coats and minding their spring calves.  The new calves are easier targets for the wolves, but they must still be cautious.  Nothing about catching buffalo is easy.  The calves may look vulnerable, but they have fiercely protective parents. Again, the wolves get the herd on the run. Instinctively, the calves move to the middle, where they are shielded by the sheer bulk and ferocity of the adults.  Buffalo calves can run as fast as their parents, but if the wolves keep the herd moving, the calves will become exhausted.  And if one should stumble, it will be left exposed.  The wolves have got one.  This calf seems doomed.  An adult returns to the rescue. The mother, helped by several other adults, tries to shepherd the calf back to the safety of the herd.  The calf makes it, but the injuries and shock it has sustained have weakened it. So, the wolves will keep the herd running for many miles yet.  Their hunger makes them determined and tenacious.  Successful buffalo hunts are rare.  It's very difficult for wolves to bring down a fit adult.  The best opportunity comes when an animal is weak or already wounded. And this one is.  The buffalo makes a break for safety, but its strength is already ebbing away. The wolves' only weapons are their sharp teeth. Killing quickly is not a choice open to them. There has always been a natural and subtle relationship between wolves and buffalo.  Human hunters on the plains used to put on wolf skins in order to creep close to the herds.  But it wasn't easy even for them to catch one.  Horse-power shifted the balance.  Native people could now round up the buffalo and kill them in larger numbers.  But once the hunters had guns, the buffalo had little chance.  European colonizers cleared the land for their cattle and grain—first of buffalo, and then of wolves.  Wolves were shot, trapped, and poisoned with fanatical zeal.  By the early 1930s, wolves had been exterminated from most of the United States.  As in Europe, the wolf became a fugitive, surviving only in places well away from persecution—Places such as this, a remote island off the west coast of Canada, where clear creeks each year fill with salmon.  It's a wilderness largely untouched by man.  Wolves are extremely adaptable, and here, during the salmon season, they go fishing.  As we have learned more about the wolves' way of life, we have come to accept that, like all predators, they are important elements in maintaining the natural balance of the wilderness.  Almost from birth, wolf puppies display individual personalities and aptitudes. At three months, they are still too inexperienced to kill large animals, so they are nurtured in a safe place while the older wolves go out hunting.  Grovelling and urgent licking by the pups encourages the returning adult to regurgitate the contents of its expandable stomach.  Farther south in the United States, some people, increasingly appreciative of wild places, have campaigned for the protection of wolves and a better understanding of their nature.  Many people want to re-introduce them into protected land, which is now overrun by deer and elk.  The Nez Perce Indians of the Rocky Mountains offered their own tribal lands for the release of 35 wild-trapped wolves.	In other places, the wolf is not so welcome. Wolves pay no regard to human feelings or boundaries.  They travel to where there is food. They may follow other wolf scent for hundreds of miles, or just strike out independently on their own.  In the late 1980s, a grey male wolf trotted 250 miles from the Canadian border right into the Nine Mile Valley, the heart of Montana ranching country.  Hatred of wolves has a long tradition here. The grey wolf had chosen his ranch well. Ralph Thisted was  intrigued by the view down his gunsights, and hoped to see more. Soon  after, Federal biologist Mike Jiminez arrived on the track of another  wolf. This was a female with a radio collar that had been caught near  Canada some months before. She had followed the male's scent right onto  the Thisted ranch. When her signal became static, Jiminez suspected that  they had made a den. Word leaked out. The return of the wolf was a tabloid  editor's dream. Opinion quickly polarized. But wolves have legal protection  now. Killing them no longer brings a bounty, but a possible hundred-thousand-dollar  fine. Ranching country is hard to police. Within weeks, the female wolf's  radio collar was recovered. It had been cut off and dumped. Neither her  body—nor the culprit—was ever found. Soon afterwards, her mate, the  grey male, was found dead by the highway. Ralph Thisted began videoing  the orphaned pups. Road-killed deer were put out for the pups to eat.  But without their parents, he feared for their long-term survival. Some  did make it, and there is now a healthy wolf population in the valley,  and their presence is more widely accepted. Elsewhere, wolves are not  waiting for an invitation. Wherever wild prey is dense, they are crossing  the Canadian border, trickling back into their former territory. If wolves  have enough room to maneuver, they tend to avoid cattle. But if there  is a shortage of prey, it's hardly surprising that a wolf will try to  take the meat that men are rearing for themselves. Nowhere is this problem  greater than in India. It is early July in the state of Maharashtra, and  the monsoon is breaking. It is about as hot and humid as a wolf can stand.  India is as far south as wolves go. Indian wolves are uncommon, but they  are most visible in the rainy season, when they are hunting for their  pups as well as for themselves. Wild blackbuck concentrate in large numbers  wherever there is new growth, even if it is in the heart of a wolf pack's  territory. As in wolf hunts everywhere, the first stage is to identify  frailty. Blackbuck are not only fast, they are also extremely agile. Each,  as it leaps, is demonstrating its fitness and strength. Maybe their pursuer  will choose a weaker neighbor, or get too confused to select a single  target. But when the monsoon dries up in September, the blackbuck disperse.  The wolves must look elsewhere for food. These fast-growing pups still  need feeding. The parents' only choice is to take the villagers' livestock.  Local people also have families to support, and they do all they can to  protect their herd, using their dogs—domesticated wolves—to help  them do so. It's hard for anyone to make a living here. There are few  places left for the Indian wolf. In some parts of Europe, wolves have  found a way of living close to man. In rural Romania, the pace of change  has been relatively slow. The mountain meadows of Transylvania are grazed  in much the same way as they have been for centuries. Every evening, shepherds  pen their flocks to protect them against wild animals. Just above them,  on the upper slopes, is one of the wildest and most extensive tracts of  forest left in Europe. Wolves, bears, and lynx live here in substantial  numbers. But when shepherds lose occasional lambs, it's the wolf that  is usually blamed. To establish the truth of the matter, scientists trapped  and radio collared a wild female wolf. Using remote cameras, they were  able to monitor the growth of her nine puppies. By June, most of the youngsters  were on to solids—regurgitated deer meat, for instance—which she  brought back from her hunting trips. A couple of the youngsters still  have a taste for her milk. There are good numbers of red deer in her hunting  territory, but providing food for ten is a demanding business. However,  her patch of forest slopes down to the suburbs and industrial areas of  the town of Brasov. Brasov is modernizing fast, but this is Transylvania,  and werewolf myths persist to this day. So, the first report of a wolf  by the main line to Bucharest were treated as tales told by the gullible.  Romanian bed-time stories are as full of evil wolves as elsewhere in Europe.  The scientists were skeptical, but when they began tracking the wolf at  night, they discovered that they had missed half the story. A starlight-sensitive  camera revealed that not only was it a wolf here, but it was behaving  in a most surprising fashion. When the night express to Bucharest had  passed through, the female wolf carefully crossed the line. Although temporarily  limping, probably because of a thorn in her foot, the female was confidently  making her way into town. She was clearly streetwise and seemed to be  certain of where she was going. By midnight, she had crossed the main  drainage canal, and had been joined by a yearling from her pack. They  were now on the other side of town, well away from their forest home.  When the female headed across waste ground towards the oil refinery, the  researchers were struggling to keep up. But the team's leader, Dr. Christopher  Promberger, had guessed where the wolf was heading—for the summer sheep  meadows beyond. The sheep are well-guarded. This must be one of the few  places in Europe where shepherds still watch their flocks by night. Their  dogs display all the possessiveness of their wolf ancestors. Outnumbered,  the female wolf turned back into town. It is now known that she always  checks the flocks first for a chance stray, but she finds easier meals  in and around the Brasov rubbish bins. Wolves here are simply adapting  to a new environment, just as urban foxes have done in English towns.  She looks very like another feral dog, and so far, she has evaded unwanted  publicity. But it is unlikely that the Brasov residents will remain in  the dark for much longer. They will have to decide whether or not to tolerate  a wolf in their midst. To survive in the modern world, wolves need our  acceptance, as well as physical space. Even in the wildest places, wolves  face difficulties. On the barren ground of Ellesmere Island, even suitable  places for dens are rare, and the wolves have great problems to solve  if they are to raise a family. This pair have two pups. At five weeks  old, they are adventurous, but they are far from independent. The female  and her mate will have to provide them with food for months yet. Wolf  puppyhood is long because there is so much to learn. Vigorous play is  an important part of learning new skills, but also helps to strengthen  to pups' developing bodies. They will try to suckle as often as possible,  but their mother is not always keen to oblige. It is likely that she hasn't  had much to eat herself lately, and is simply short of milk. The mother  wolf and her pups are showing obvious signs of hunger. To maintain a healthy  development, the pups will have to increase their weight by two to three  pounds every week. But that will require a regular supply of nourishment.  These puppies may be small, but to feed them properly, their parents will  need a hunting territory of over a thousand square miles. The male is  kept hard at work. The female still does the begging, but gradually, the  pups will learn this ritual for themselves. The male seems reluctant to  deliver the meal. No doubt he is hungry too, but the female cannot accompany  him and help on long hunts until the pups are a bit older. The pups wolf  down their food, simply because they can never be sure of their next mouthful.  As the days lengthen, so do the leverets' chances of survival. They are  faster now, and smarter. Wolves rarely live beyond nine years in the wild.  The male wolf may already be thirteen. So, although he's exceptional,  he's well past his prime. On days when he is unsuccessful, the female  collects food from her store—leverets that were killed and buried earlier  in the year, when they were easier to catch. But if his family is to survive,  the male cannot give up the hunt. Wolves are the experts  at chasing and collecting moving objects, and this exercise is far more  critical than retrieving a ball. Today is a good day. The male has brought  back two hares and readily gives up one to the female. But her urge to  feed her pups is overwhelming. It's a hard life, but if the male's bloodline  is to survive, then pups' future comes first. In seven seasons, this wolf  couple have raised only three offspring to maturity, and the prospects  for the current family are by no means certain. Already, one pup is quicker  to take advantage of the incoming meal. It's a critical advantage, for  it will give the most vigorous pup a head start when the long arctic winter  begins to close in. The den provides some shelter, but the weather is  not the problem. There may just not be enough food to go around. If the  pups survive until the spring, the parents will have done unusually well.  Wolves have had to be tenacious. Not only do they endure some of the harshest  conditions on earth, but they also have survived bitter hostility from  humanity. Their methods, especially when hunting, may shock us deeply.  But they aren't given meat out of tins and packets, as our dogs are. A  wolf can only be a wolf. They remain wary and unknowable. But steadily,  they are winning back our respect. Even the howl of the wolf, that once  struck terror into our hearts, is now regarded by many as one of the most  thrilling sounds of the natural world. In August these days, hundreds  of Canadians make a pilgrimage into the wilderness to make contact with  wolves. A road, cutting through the remote forests of spruce and fir,  provides a good place to stand and listen for this wild music. These listeners  have no chance of actually seeing a wolf. But National Park rangers know  how to communicate with the legendary outlaw who, for centuries, we have  tried to destroy.		There is no end to an African day.  Across the grasslands of the Kalahari, the sunset merely signals a new beginning.  As the earth cools in the fading light, zebras, wildebeest and other grazing animals move on.  They are relinquishing the night to a new cast of characters.  Hidden in the shadows, there is a world which few have ever seen, an endless labyrinth of tunnels and burrows, home to the Kalahari's creatures of the night.  The dry season is ending in central Kalahari.  As winter turns to spring, warmer night air will soon be greeting the dwellers of these moonlit portals.  Not all live underground. A tree gives shelter to this wide-eyed curiosity, nine inches of lesser bush baby, a tiny primate, one of our distant relatives.  Excellent eyesight, grasping hands, and an amazing agility make them superb catchers of insects.  On the ground, another creature has woken up.  These are spring hares.  About as big as a rabbit, the spring hare looks like a small kangaroo. It feeds on the remaining dried grasses, and if pursued, it can leap as far as thirteen feet in a single bound.  To the left of the bush baby is a tree mouse, one of the smaller and therefore more careful desert predators.  Less timid than its neighbor, the bush baby illustrates the art of foraging.  The tree mouse scrambles to the ground.  Here, it will either find a meal or become one. Larger predators are now emerging. The brown hyena, a rarely-seen scavenger. The hole it calls home is not its own creation.  The hyena is merely a squatter in this vast underground burrow stretching out hundreds of yards.  Many of Kalahari's smaller inhabitants could not survive without the protection of these ready-made shelters.  And this is the master digger, the principle architect for Kalahari's underworld.  It is the aardvark.  Translated, its name is "earth pig," although the name "antbear" is often used.  But it is no relation to pig or bear.  The aardvark's nearest relatives are all extinct.  It has a long snout to sniff out food and a long, sticky tongue to gather its prey. The aardvark is a timid creature, relying on sound, rather than sight, to alert it to danger. Its diet consists of mostly ants and termites. But despite its vigorous probing, the termites in this mound are not to be found.  As the aardvark widens its search, a brown hyena prowls nearby. It is one of the least-glimpsed animals of the Kalahari.  Brown hyenas are primarily scavengers, favoring meat from abandoned carcasses over all other food.  But they will also consume eggs, fruit, insects—even the occasional mouse. Guided by its keen sense of smell, the aardvark has stumbled upon this
 a hill seething with ants. More often, the aardvark must dig for its meal.  But tonight, the ants are within easy reach.  Many ants attempt to repel the invader. Ineffectual, but irritating nonetheless.  A few seemingly-gentle strokes from its sharp claws opens up the hard shell of the mound.  Once inside, its long, sticky tongue goes to work. Satisfied, the aardvark prepares for the coming day.  It doesn't need to find the entrance to its most recent home.  It will simply make a new one, demonstrating its well-earned reputation of master digger.  Burrows vary in design.  Many are created to serve as temporary shelter, penetrating only a few yards into the ground. Deeper, more elaborate burrows are excavated for use as maternity dens in the rearing of their young.  Aardvarks can dig at a prodigious rate and could easily escape capture from anyone with a shovel intent on digging them out.  The tail and the hind legs help clear away the soil the massive claws are digging.  In less than thirty minutes, the aardvark has disappeared underground, leaving a mound of earth in its wake.  Burrows are not kept for long.  Once abandoned by the aardvark, they provide life-giving shelter for Kalahari's other nocturnal inhabitants.  Porcupines, although capable of digging their own homes, will readily take advantage of these pre-existing burrows.  The male porcupine is the largest rodent in Africa and can grow up to 25 pounds.  The offspring will need their parents' care for about six months, protected from both heat and cold in this second-hand nursery.  Above, the brown hyena is checking for messages.  On the grass stems, other hyenas have left special glandular secretions.  One longer-lasting scent tells whose territory this is.  Another short-lived odor indicates how long ago other hyenas were feeding here.  Scent-marking helps the brown hyena keep track of other group members, which may number as many as twelve.  It also helps reduce the need to defend their territory.  An unwary gerbil is caught with surprising speed.  Such a kill is unusual for this nocturnal scavenger.  The scuttle scarcely disturbs the bush baby above.  It's still scoffing insects. Ever hungry, it thinks it's spotted another victim.  Or has it?  It looks like a stick.  But it did move.  The insect unfurls its wings.  Not designed for flight, they rattle noisily in an attempt to ward off predators.  This bush baby's eyes are bigger than its appetite.  And so is this giant stick insect. But curiosity soon banishes fear, and the perhaps not-so-hungry bush baby follows the oddity with the passion of a naturalist.  The bush baby decides not to bite off more than it can chew. With the coming dawn, the creatures of the Kalahari's night return to their shelters. Although highly adapted to living in this arid region, they would soon overheat if left exposed. They will sleep through the day, safe from predators and protected from the ferocity of the African sun.  Oblivious to the underworld beneath them, zebras move out across the plain, foraging from the sea of dry vegetation that surrounds them. Because of their larger body sizes, grazers like the zebra, can tolerate much higher temperatures.  But large or small, wildlife must find life-sustaining water in their food.  For in most of the Kalahari, which occupies one-third of southern Africa, there is no surface water from which to drink.  For this ant-eating chat, moisture is found in the insects its neighbors will soon be uncovering.  Even though they are active during the day, ground squirrels also require protection from the sun.  The job of hole digging demands constant activity.  Vulnerable and exposed, the ground squirrel's work is often interrupted by having to check for hostile predators.  A lot of effort goes into these daytime retreats, and when the ground squirrels abandon them, others move in.  Meerkats take advantage of the ground squirrels' inadvertently generous nature, and so are neighbors and squatters beside them on the plain. Even in this tinder-dry scrub, they know how to root out a juicy insect or two. Sweeping the horizon with keen eyes, they are constantly on the alert for any approaching threat.  This time, the threat comes from above.  One of the season's first storms is approaching.  Unaware of the advancing rain, some need a cue to disappear.  Nature provides it.  Generally, rain falls in the warmer months between October and April.  Often, it will come in violent, torrential downpours.  Because of these seasonal rains, much of the Kalahari is not, in fact, a true desert, despite its reputation.  The rains are often local and patchy.  Some areas remain dry for years.  Highly tolerant, the vegetation is adapted to these drought conditions, renewing itself through seeds when the life-giving storms finally do arrive. What was a dusty plain will very quickly flush green.  The freshly-disturbed earth around each hole in the ground is the first to show new growth.  It is burrowing animals that provide the water with a path to flow, allowing it to soak the soil and become available for plants. Fortunately, the tunnels don't flood at every level, and the passage is quickly dried.  Soon, life resumes with more predictable patterns. Following the torrent of localized rain, the stage is set for a most spectacular event. Winged termites take to the air just once in their lives.  These flyers are called "alates" and are produced to leave the mound in order to establish new colonies.  In termite mounds all over the Kalahari, this exodus of potential kings and queens happens just once a year, triggered by strong rains.  The rain has brought out other arrivals just beyond the swarming mound.  The giant bullfrog's arrival is opportune.  It has a taste for termites.  Without a strong wind, many of these winged termites will not travel far. Once on the ground, the wings are discarded. Now, kings pursue queens, but not unobserved. This annual phenomenon provides the termites with very little chance for success.  Only a few couples will escape.  Paired kings and queens equipped with huge fat reserves will hide in cracks in the ground or find refuge in trees. There, each will attempt to found a new colony. Animals of all shapes and sizes come to satisfy their appetites.  Even a gerbil will risk leaving its home on this particular night.  It's the shifting equilibrium between predators and prey that keeps the Kalahari full of life and under natural control.  The delicate sound of rustling wings is a clear signal for the bat-eared fox. Although related, it is not a true fox.  Its huge ears and small teeth put it in a sub-family all its own.  Most of its food is insects.  Special jaw muscles allow it to chew rapidly, ideal for coping with termites.  Prey is located primarily through hearing.  Using their very specialized ears, they can even detect the movements of insect larvae buried in the ground.  The last winged termites leave the mound.  The workers are busy sealing the doors for another year.  In just a few hours, the spectacle is over.  The African hedgehog also took its share of termites, and it will eat almost anything else it comes across. It has longer legs and different facial markings compared to its European cousins.  The termites were of no concern to the porcupine family. They are vegetarians.  The porcupines love to feast on tsama melons.  With a water content of more than 90%, they are a valuable source of moisture. Porcupine pairs are monogamous, and it is the female that initiates mating. She will typically conceive only once a year with litter sizes varying between one and three.  They young arrive well-developed, attaining adult body mass in just over a year.  Due to the porcupine's effective, defensive spines, suckling begins with a bothersome search.  The sought-after nipples are not on the mother's underbelly, but positioned further up on the side of her body, covered and surrounded by sharp quills.  Their desire for milk is so strong, they'll put up with this for nearly five months, although they've been able to take solids since they were four weeks old.  Baby hedgehogs are totally reliant on their mother's milk.  These newborn are waiting for her return. Despite their quills, hedgehogs and porcupines are quite unrelated.  Unlike porcupines, the hedgehog mother has no mate to help raise the family she's going back to.  When born, the babies' sharp spines have not yet cut through the skin.  But over the first two weeks, the eyes open, hair grows, and the spines push through and harden.  Very soon, they will have the defensive knack of rolling into an inedible, spiky ball. The burrow will be their den for six to seven weeks. After that time, they'll be expected to venture out on their own.  So warm and safe is this home, that when the time comes, their mother may have to push them out.  When not raising young, these nocturnal creatures will change their resting places daily, curling up in holes, under bushes, or beneath matted grass.  An abandoned termite mound is the home for this familiar-looking creature.  But this is no house pet.  Called the black-footed cat, it is the smallest member of the Kalahari's wild cat family.  What it lacks in size, it makes up in ferocity.  Because of its aggressive nature, it is unmanageable in captivity, despite its appearance.  Mice are its favorite food, but it will readily attack other small mammals, with a few exceptions, such as this nearby hedgehog, puffing along contentedly in search of food.  The black-footed cat approaches.  But unwilling to risk the sharp, prickly spines of the hedgehog, it quickly retreats.  Black-footed cats have two or three kittens in a litter, and this one can't wait to leave home.  The other kittens are not quite as brave and stay home.  The bolder kitten is ready for a lesson in hunting technique.  He must learn to hunt very quickly in this forbidding environment. Playing follow-the-leader, the kitten duplicates its mother's every move.  For the less adventurous, there's always a brother or sister to practice on.  The mother returns home, but the kitten is not yet ready to follow.  The sound of potential prey prompts the mother to investigate.  Another sound, this time of a potential predator, encourages the bold kitten to call it a night.  The black-footed cat's larger and more common relatives are feeding tonight. Though sometimes active during the day, lions are primarily nocturnal.  As they squabble among themselves, others are tempted out by the smell of blood in the air.  Unlike spotted hyenas, which hunt and kill in packs, the brown hyena won't disturb the meal.  They'll wait until the lions leave before approaching the carcass. Until then, it's time to be patient and indulge in a display of affection.  Hyenas are perhaps one of the most misunderstood and maligned of creatures.  Because of their eerie nighttime calls and secretive, scavenging nature, they are considered animals of doom and misfortune among many African natives.  Their true nature is rarely, if ever, seen.  The lions leave.  Now they can venture in and sift through what's left. Brown hyenas have remarkable digestive systems and an unusual range of tastes in food.  They will even eat fruit, an important supplement in this arid region.  After finding a kill, they will readily eat what other animals have discarded.  Their powerful jaws can crush bone, which contains nutritious marrow inside.  Not much is left of this springbok ram, but it's a better meal than many.  Sometimes, brown hyenas will travel as much as thirty miles in a single night.  Even then, they may only pick up a few scant insects for their efforts.  Nothing goes to waste in the Kalahari.  As the wet season runs its course, the sun rises over a sea of green. This lush, flowered garden will be put to good use until the plains, once again, dry out.  A feast awaits the mostly vegetarian ground squirrel.  It may eat an insect now and again, but its diet consists primarily of leaves, grass, bulbs, roots, and on this day, seeds.  Like most of Kalahari's creatures, it receives moisture from its food and can live without the presence of standing water.  Aptly named, ground squirrels are poor climbers, but they will scramble up the occasional bush in search of berries.  Otherwise, feeding is strictly a terrestrial activity. After the meal, it returns to work on the den. The damp soil is easy to remove.  But for the moment, play takes precedence.  But these days of plenty will soon be over.  In March, as the dry season descends, temperatures soar to over 100 degrees.  Only a ruffled dry carpet of grass remains.  Hard at work on these grasses are harvester termites, one of many insect families that farm the Kalahari.  They cut down stalks of dry grass to a manageable size and drag them down into their tunnels thirty feet below—provisions against harder times.  Waiting to feed upon the termites are predators like the scorpion and the ant-eating chat.  Each termite, worker or soldier, is a succulent snack.  For predators, they are small packets of life-sustaining moisture.  Close by, a sand wasp is preparing for its future.  She's paralyzed a caterpillar which she will take into a hole she dug earlier. First, she'll have to open the entrance.  On the living caterpillar, she lays one egg.  Soon, the paralyzed victim will be a fresh meal for her single larva.  Before leaving, the small stone over the opening is replaced.  She may repeat the same process a dozen times in her lifetime. Still working on the stalks of dried grass, the termite's habit of moving plant material underground plays an enormous role in nutrient cycling.  Their fat-rich bodies are also a key link in the Kalahari food chain.  The ant-eating chat has more than a beakful ready to bring to her brood in a very unusual home.  Such a wealth of food enables the chats to nest in this dry time of year.  But where?  She's at the entrance to an aardvark burrow, now occupied by a brown hyena.  The resident doesn't seem to mind the intrusion.  Both parents are feeding the chicks whose cries are coming from a hole in the roof of the tunnel.  Although it can excavate its own burrow for nesting, it more often chooses the ready-made shelter of an aardvark hole.  The dry season is also nesting time for the world's largest bird.  The male ostrich is about to change places with the female.  It's now his turn to incubate the eggs.  Heat is the biggest enemy. The temperature is high, even in the shade. Unattended, eggs can easily spoil in the Kalahari sun.  Other females also lay eggs in the nest. This minimizes the risk of losing an entire clutch to predators.  But each set of parents knows its own eggs and tries to keep them positioned in the center of the nest.  During these daytime vigils, the ostrich can become heat-stressed.  But it can tolerate the loss of up to 25% of its body weight in water without ill effect.  In the heat of the day, soil temperature can rise to over 150 degrees.  But in the labyrinth of burrows beneath this scorching landscape, it can be as much as 50% cooler.  For the Kalahari's nocturnal creatures, this retreat is key to their survival.  Daytime grazers also seek protection when temperatures are at their highest.  Lying in the shade of trees or bushes helps reduce water loss and keeps body temperatures from soaring. Diurnal animals have adapted in other ways.  Pound for pound, they require less water and use less energy to survive.  Their body tissue can also store a much larger amount of heat.  Six weeks after being laid, the ostrich eggs have hatched, sending as many as ten miniature versions of their parents out into the world.  They will grow at a remarkable rate, from six inches to eight feet in their first year.  But not all the eggs hatch. Sometimes, despite the best efforts of their parents, they become spoiled in the heat and are abandoned. The failures will not go to waste. The eggs represent nourishment for the less discerning of Kalahari's night life.  As the dry season advances, the sun's warming rays quickly dissipate into the clear evening sky.  Because of the region's relatively high altitude, temperatures in winter can drop below freezing. Cold becomes another enemy.  But tonight, winter's grip has not yet taken hold, and the Kalahari's nocturnal prowlers are free to roam. The denizens of the underworld stir in their burrows.  The bush babies seem less interested in grasshoppers this evening and more interested in each other.  The master digger ventures out, concerned—quite literally—with sticking to its diet of ants and termites.  It's just a slight distraction to the bush babies, who are keen on courtship.  The prelude to mating involves the gentlest of caresses.  And then, a series of gymnastic displays, leaping up to fifteen feet in a single bound.  The hyena has caught the smell of rotting ostrich eggs. They're a welcome seasonal bonus.  Hyenas have been observed removing over twenty eggs from a nest, one by one, hiding them for later.  For all but a few animals, these eggs present a tricky problem.  Ostrich eggs are designed to be broken from the inside at the right time.  The hyena will need to use its bone-crushing jaws.  With a little persuasion, the egg gives up its spoiled contents to an animal with just the stomach for such a pungent delicacy. Another of the Kalahari's underground creatures surfaces to find its first meal of the night.  The conspicuous coloring of the striped polecat warns others to stay clear.  Like the skunk, it will release a nauseating spray if threatened. Its diet is primarily insects, but it will readily consume more exotic fare. Scorpions hide in other animals' burrows as well.  Like almost everything else, it's looking for a meal.  It has a powerful sting, but against a much larger predator, it stands little chance of escape.  To the striped polecat, the scorpion is not a difficult challenge.  The larger predator first bites off the tail which can deliver a painful sting.  To the scorpion, termites were thirst-quenchers. Now, it unwillingly provides the same service for the striped polecat, a link in the chain of appetites foraging in the dark.  Changing seasons mean changing diets for the hunters and scavengers of the Kalahari's night.  As the weather cools, it is often ants, and not termites, that are more readily-available for feasting.  During the meal, the aardvark will inadvertently consume grass seed the ants have stored.  Because he cannot digest the seed, it will be deposited on soil which the aardvark then buries. Beyond his title of master digger, the aardvark is one of the Kalahari's master planters as well.  And so, it's on to the next job at hand, an after-dinner dig which will take the aardvark into the deepest recesses of the underworld, providing once again additional shelter for those less capable of such grand excavation.  A master bedroom in the making. Familiar sounds and smells alert the nocturnal cast of the imminent sunrise.  Travel-weary but well-fed, the brown hyena returns to its burrow. The others soon follow suit.  Soon, the only traces left of these strange creatures will be the dark portals to their hidden world.  Gone, but not forgotten.  The creatures of the night play a vital role in the regeneration of this arid land.  Without them, this fragile web of life would all but disappear. 	Crocodiles hail from the great age of reptiles well over 70 million years ago.  Since then, the world has changed dramatically around them, but amazingly, they have changed little.  They are the only great reptile predator to have outlived the dinosaurs.  Ancient they may be, but 70 million years on, they are still the most successful freshwater predator.  Most of the waterways in the tropics these days have their own species of crocodile.  How come that they've been so successful for so long?  Well, it seems that their design, when it first appeared, was already very advanced, and it's kept them successful ever since.  This film reveals the nature of that success.  Crocodiles may have scored an early evolutionary bull's eye, but there's much more to their staying power than brute strength.  Only now, by exploring their complete world—above and below water, by day and night—can we fully appreciate just how sophisticated they are.  Crocodiles can float or sink at will, finely tuning their buoyancy.  They can control their buoyancy like a submarine.  The liver is squeezed back to make more room for the expanded lungs.  A crocodile can stay submerged for up to three hours.  While submerged, a protective membrane closes over their eyes, like swimming goggles.  Crocodiles are cold-blooded. They rely on the temperature of the sun and water to heat themselves up or to cool down.  They are sluggish, but when they are warm enough, crocodiles are capable of breathtaking speed.  They're the most dangerous freshwater predator on the planet.  It's a status gained thanks to adaptations so sophisticated that ancient crocodile survived when their close relatives, the mighty dinosaurs, perished.  It's a design that has allowed them to spread around the tropical world.  This extended family includes alligators of temperate waterways, gharials of the Indian subcontinent, and caiman of tropical South America.  They've even invaded the sea.  Special glands in the mouth allow crocodiles to tolerate salt water long enough to reach the next river.  This is how they spread along the coasts.  But only a few species can migrate across oceans.  The real specialists, the saltwater crocodiles, are affectionately known as "salties."  They've been seen more than 600 miles from land, encrusted with barnacles, as they search for new island homes.  This pioneering spirit and their unique character has made them a universal threat.  Crocodiles deserve their tough reputation, but they aren't just solitary killers.  In the calm of the Florida swamps, we can begin to see them in a new light.  They are reptiles with social skills, and American alligators are particularly vocal. During the breeding season, an expressive chorus of bellows, grunts, and hisses rises from their dense swamps.  Having settled himself into a suitable lagoon, a territorial male sets about fending off rivals.  Such a perfect breeding pond is hot property.  Other males put in an unwelcome bid for occupancy.  The resident male only shows a bit of muscle if the rival fails to get the message. He's made his point, and he can now focus on finding a mate.  Vibrations within his muscle walls send sound waves rippling out into the swamp, powerful enough to make the water dance.  Part of his roar radiates at such low frequency that human ears can't hear it.  But these subsonic calls have astounding penetration, travelling four times faster, and further, under the water.  Only with special low frequency recordings can we appreciate what the female alligator hears.  When she hears his rumbling invitation, she wastes no time, and the low frequency calls guide her through the murk and vegetation.  Female alligators move freely from the territory of one male into that of another's. Even though the call may come from the remotest part of the swamp, she soon finds him.  Then, things get intimate.  After lengthy calling, the physical part of the courtship begins.  Alligators may mate with several partners during the short summer breeding season.  Crocodiles are extremely sensitive to touch. Their armor-plated toughness would appear to be only skin-deep.  Such complicated language and behavior is exceptional among today's reptiles, but crocodiles might provide a tantalizing rear window on the social life of their ancient relatives, the dinosaurs.  Nile crocodiles are the most fraternal crocs of all.  Once a year, they hang out together, soaking up the sun at traditional mating places.  Compared to Florida's noisy alligators, African Nile crocodiles are fairly quiet.  These are far from being lazy afternoons.  But the group is very organized, and individuals keep a careful eye on the movements of others within it.  A healthy, 15-foot adult male attracts the attention of smaller females on the lookout for a fit partner.  Up to ten females spend much of their time in the water soliciting him.  They bare their throats as a gesture of appeasement.  He'll mate with them all in turn during the breeding season. The male also uses body signals and shows off with noisy water displays.  But these postures don't always keep rival males waiting in the wings.  The top male flaunts to his female audience as the challenger tries to get in on the act.  The rival's change of mind comes too late.  Lives are rarely lost, but toes, limbs, and even tails can sometimes get ripped off.  A victorious fountain of water re-asserts the top male's authority.  The biggest males are usually the most successful when it comes to attracting mates.  The females can also be influenced by individual temperaments.  It's they who often take the lead, by rubbing themselves along the length of his body.  At first, he snubs both of them, but the rubbing releases a pungent oil from glands under their jaws.  Both sexes are highly sensitive to this crocodile perfume, and the male answers with his own musky message.  The scent in the water is particularly potent before mating.  The male will eventually court and couple with all the females in the group.  But the subtleties of crocodile relationships remain submerged in mystery.  Several weeks later, the females are ready to make their nests.  Even when basking, adults rarely move far from water.  So, it's ironic that the first and most critical part of the crocodilian life is spent on land. Crocodile babies are born encased in eggs, but they must still breathe air. It's essential that this mother lays her clutch well beyond the high water mark.  The eggs will be so at risk—from drowning, from predators, and from temperature fluctuations—that she relies on exactly the same nest position year after year.  These time-honored sites are a measure of the experienced care that crocodile mothers provide.  Once the excavation is complete, she lays her eggs in a trance-like state.  The hole will become an incubator.  Crocodile eggs will only develop if they remain between a steamy 80 and 94 degrees.  So, her choice of site is critical.  Nest chambers from equatorial African plains to high Himalayan river valleys all remain within this temperature range.  But no one knows how crocodile mothers get it right.  Once the nest is sealed, the mothers keep vigil for 90 days.  Temperature determines the sex of the developing eggs.  A half-degree difference between the top and bottom of the next could markedly affect the ratio of males to females.  No one knows yet just how disruptive global climate changes will be in terms of the sex ratio of hatchlings in the future.  Right now, these youngsters face more immediate, local threats.  The noise and smell coming from the nest could soon attract the attention of hungry raiders.  Fortunately, there mother has been waiting nearby, and is the first to hear the muffled newborn cries.  Once she digs them out, they must reach the relative security of water as quickly as possible. The babies could probably find their own way, but they're only safe if they all stick together, so their mother transports them to water herself in her mouth. The skin of her lower jaw stretches into a hanging cradle in which she can carry fifteen or so at a time.  It's a snug fit—once you're in.  Her 40 or so eggs hatch simultaneously, so she'll have to make several trips.  The clamorings of the waiting hatchlings constantly remind her to return to the nest, and ensure that no one misses the last bus.  She releases them into a nursery pool, where they must make the most of her tender loving care.  They have only a few weeks under her watchful eye.  Their rate of growth is affected by temperature.  Over a lifetime under a tropical sun, they may grow 4,000 times bigger than this.  While they're so tiny, they call to each other and to her—conversations that continue into adulthood.  The 18 different sounds they'll use represent a vocabulary more typical of mammals than of reptiles. These calls can be of life-saving importance, particularly if one loses contact with the group.  This hatchling's adventurous spirit is putting him in great danger, from predatory birds and monitor lizards.  The rest of the family is now nearly 50 feet away.  But just as their calls fade, the lost hatchling's survival instincts kick in.  He utters a loud call of distress.  It's answered by his siblings.  The stray baby calls again.  The other hatchlings reply. Their constant calls guide him back to the security of the family.  Vocal contact ensured this youngster's survival.  Other threats demand spirited action by their mother.  One of the biggest risks is from other crocodiles. The mother successfully defends her own brood, but it's a grim reminder that crocodiles will eat just about anything.  Like the adults, the young aren't fussy about food.  And, like adults, they are masters of the stealthy hunting technique that all crocodiles are born with, keeping eyes, ears and nose at surface level.  These shoreline snacks may be wildebeest or zebra in years to come.  Growing hatchlings must eat 5% of their own weight every day.  Frogs, grasshoppers, spiders, anything small enough goes.  They rely on communal living to survive this tender age, but competition between the youngsters is intense.  Many will be picked off by predators.  Floods and droughts also take their toll.  Only 2% of the hatchlings will make it to adulthood.  In Venezuela, the babies of South American caiman also face tough odds.  It's the dry season.  Only a few pools remain.  Even the fish are out of water.  The dry season is five months long, but in some years, it's more severe than usual. Unexpectedly, animals can be left high, if not exactly dry.  Eventually, some of these watercourses will dry up completely, leaving many caiman exposed and dehydrated.  Temporary skin relief is provided by this ultimate of mud masks. Cooling water is at a premium.  The remaining pools are becoming over-crowded. At such pressing times, the adults usually tolerate each other.  However, babies could be eaten by them, so this is no place for a mother to raise her young.  Fortunately, her babies can expect complete maternal attention during this five-month period of danger.  The shrinking marsh forces their mother to make a drastic move.  If she gets it wrong, the whole family will perish. Night-time cameras reveal that they will make a run for it, under the cover of dark.  Their escape will be risky, for it's made over land.  Mother leads the way.  It's a while before the babies have the courage to join her.  Calls of reassurance, and maybe her musky smell, encourage the hatchlings out of the water.  She follows good instincts.  Night-time temperatures are less dangerous to tiny cold-blooded bodies, and there are fewer threats about.  But this is a long march that must be concluded by day-break.  Their mother's acute sense of smell brings them to their watery destination, with less than an hour to spare until dawn.  There's plenty of water here for her babies to survive the rest of the dry season.  But there's no room for their mother.  Another female has already had the same idea, and adults won't share the pool.  To avoid a fight, the newly arrived mother moves on, leaving her family behind.  They'll be safer in the swamp than with her.  Others have done the same thing.  The foster mother's creche has now swollen to more than 100 babies.  Only some are hers. This mother carries her burden lightly.  Crocodiles are more social than all other reptiles and grow up in company.  As hunting adults, this may prepare them for dedicated teamwork—especially if there's a rare dish on the menu. Migrating zebras cross the Mara River in Kenya only a few times each year, travelling between traditional grazing grounds.  Resident Nile crocodiles cannot afford to miss these fleeting chances.  So, they cooperate.  From different places under the riverbanks, they spend days waiting and watching the nervous herds.  Only when the zebra have committed themselves to a departure point do the crocodiles take up their final positions.  The current drags the zebra downstream, so five or six crocodiles cover the crossing from different angles.  It's hard work for crocodiles too, but they can submerge, taking advantage of deeper, slower currents to move closer.  Their approach is stealthy, measured and tactical, as if moving in on a chosen victim.  The current is flowing in this zebra's favor.  It buffets the crocodiles out of position and they can't get a grip.  The zebra's wide rump gives it a big advantage.  Adult zebras also have a vicious kick, which could break a crocodile's jaw.  That might mean starvation, so crocodiles are also taking risks.  A lot of effort results in little success for the crocodiles—but only until smaller, more vulnerable animals enter the water.  At any time, the zebras can be ambushed by frightening power and lightening speed.  The baby zebra faces several waves of attack.  Crocodiles work alone, or in groups, depending on the size of the prey.  This time, they were rewarded.  Farther south, in Zambia, the parched Luangwa Valley is the scene of some remarkable behavior.  In the dry season, it has one of the highest concentrations of crocodiles in the world.  Hundreds crowd together, forced to share what little water remains.  Even the hippos can't find water deep enough to wet their backs.  In the heat of the day, crocodiles save their energy.  There is little to do and, it seems, little to eat.  But even in these extreme conditions, crocodiles excel at making the most of their circumstances.  Far from being dependent on large mammals such as wildebeest or zebra, crocodiles have extraordinarily adaptable diets.  We've not known this until now, because we've never seen them hunting at night.  What crocodiles do at night has remained a mystery because they will only move around naturally in total darkness.  So, only with the use of invisible infrared light can we see their nocturnal habits for the first time.  In the Luangwa River shallows, a Nile crocodile hunts for less glamorous prey.  It's stalking fish.  Over the year, crocodiles fatten up on fish and mollusks, rather than mammals.  Mammals come and go.  But the muddy river bottom is always a good place to stir up snails, for instance.  The crocodile is a flexible feeder in its methods, too.  It uses its armor-plated body as sinuously as a length of fishing net to corral fish towards the shore. Midnight feasting is not uncommon at this time of year.  But even the fish are running out.  By day, the temperatures soar.  The only ripples now are those shimmering in the scorching air.  For the crocs, things appear to be getting desperate.  Many animals have to resort to the scavenging habits of vultures. Even hippos, normally grazers, are forced to supplement their meager rations with the grassy stomach contents of a dead buffalo.  But crocodiles still thrive on the edge.  And, once again, infrared cameras allow their night habits to be discreetly filmed.  Vultures have to wait until daybreak, but other scavengers and hunters are out in force.  Hyenas are doing particularly well at the expense of others.  Some crocs just couldn't find enough to live on. Others, though, hang onto life.  But they look danger in the eye every night. Only when the dry season becomes desperate, are these two great hunters of land and water likely to come face to face.  The crocodile is too hungry to be intimidated by a lion, and the smell of food wafting towards the river on the night air is just too strong.  But it walks into an unlikely dinner party.  A hungry hippo is formidable company.  Even the lions know that.  Unsure at first of its welcome, the crocodile soon takes its place at this most unusual mutually tolerant gathering.  For the lions, there's no such thing as eating in peace.  No sooner is the hippo out of the way than the crocodile actively takes on the whole pride.  The lions, though, have had enough of the intrusion. Though lions have been known to kill crocodiles, this croc won't take the hint. There's not a lot the lions can do, especially when the smell of their supper coaxes other crocodiles out of the water.  Crocodiles have thick skins.  The lions are forced to defend their meal by moving to a different table.  They just leave nothing but scraps behind.  The reptiles have stronger stomachs than the mammals.  Lions can only cope with smaller tissues.  Crocodile digestive juices are so acidic that they can break down skin, bone, and horn.  There's no such thing as crocodile left-overs.  Their exceptional sense of smell enables them quickly to capitalize on the demise of others.  And at the end of the dry season, the smell of death is everywhere.  Sickness, starvation, and injury take many victims.  One of this hippo's group has died.  The crocodiles have good reason to be wary.  A provoked adult hippo could easily inflict a mortal wound.  So, they wait for it to go before closing in on the carcass.  Food, any food, is hard to find.  Crocodiles from up to four miles away recognize the whiff of opportunity.  Each crocodile patiently waits for the chance to feed. The reason for this patient approach?  Crocodiles have a powerful grip and sharp teeth, but their jaws don't move sideways.  They can't chew.  So, they have to eat large animals together.  One or two crocodiles effectively brace the carcass in the jaws, while others wrench off smaller pieces of flesh by spinning their bodies around.  The largest male usually initiates the communal meal.  How the rest of the crocodiles organize themselves to feed, no one knows.  It can take 24 hours to satisfy every diner.  Too readily, perhaps, we have cast crocodiles as ruthless predators, feared them, misunderstood them, attacked and exploited them.  But they are great survivors from an ancient line that goes back more than 70 million years.  And perhaps, in millions of years to come, crocodiles will live on, successful still, looking and behaving much the same as they do today—one of the world's great survivors.  Tonight, on NOVA
  As daylight fades, a silent hunter stalks. For the first time ever, under the cover of complete darkness, see her strike. With NOVA's special cameras, go on the hunt with Africa's most successful big cat.  Enter the hidden world of leopards of the night.  Many African cultures praise the courage and charisma of the leopard.  They also fear his stealth and his cunning, because he can move and hunt in total darkness, whereas we, unable to see, can only hide away.  This is South Luangwa National Park, in Zambia, a lush riverine valley full of life.  Leopards thrive here, but they are masters of concealment, and if you do catch a glimpse of an adult during the day, it's generally not doing very much at all. Tonight, on NOVA, lives were imperiled, fortunes spent, to possess a precious gem plucked from the sea. For centuries, its mystique centered on the mystery of its origins
 an accident of nature, or a product of human engineering? Has science unlocked the secret of the perfect pearl? Of all of the world's gems, it is the pearl which has held the greatest fascination for humans. So powerful is the pearl's allure, that for thousands of years, people have risked their lives to rest this perfect jewel from the ocean's depths. Today's cultured pearls are produced in their millions in a remarkable collusion between nature and science. But as science continues to perfect the techniques for pearl culturing, nature is not always a willing partner. Pearl oysters are sensitive creatures, susceptible to even subtle changes in the environment. They are a member of the mollusk family, one of the most successful species on earth. Mollusks have been around for at 530 million years, and have evolved into over 130,000 living species.  All types of mollusks can produce something resembling a pearl, but relatively few species create the lustrous objects we prize as gems. The quest to uncover the secrets of the pearl oyster has been a lifelong passion for zoologist John Lucas, an international mollusk expert. Currents also carry foreign material which can enter the shell. Normally, the oyster can expel any irritant that finds its way inside. But sometimes a piece of shell or coral catches in its delicate flesh. If it can't get rid of this foreign matter, the oyster isolates it inside a membrane or pearl sack that secretes nacre, the same smooth substance called mother of pearl that lines its shell. The irritant is slowly plated with translucent layers of calcium carbonate crystals, which make the irritant smooth and tolerable to the oyster. Throughout history, the pearl has been passionately sought after by kings and queens, emperors, and maharajahs. As valued in the West as in the East, pearls proclaim their owner's wealth and power, and were often the currency of romance. Even after the introduction of underwater breathing systems, diving for pearls remained dangerous and unpredictable. Shark attacks and accidents took their toll, along with the diver's disease known as the bends, where nitrogen bubbles form in the blood stream.  Sometimes divers were forced to dive too deep, or stay below too long. The human passion for pearls took a heavy toll. Natural pearls are always rare, exquisite accidents of nature. And when discovered, they're almost never perfectly round. They come in an infinite variety of shapes. Formations, bumps, and half-domes, that grow against the shell's interior surface are called mabes.  Some pearls grow into irregular and, sometimes, fantastic forms called baroques. A baroque is created when an oyster is unable to turn the foreign object inside its shell, causing the layering of nacre to build up unevenly. The mystique of the pearl centered on the mystery of its origins. The first known example of pearl culturing came in the 12th century, when the Chinese produced little pearl Buddhas by sliding figurines into freshwater mussels between the body and the shell.  The practice of inducing mollusks to make pearls goes back more than 1,500 years. As early as the 5th century, the Chinese produced pearls by inserting small objects, including images of Buddha, between the shell of a freshwater mussel and its nacre-producing mantle. It wasn't until the end of the 19th century that a technique for culturing pearls was invented in Japan. At last, the natural process could be duplicated. The essential discovery was made by the son of a noodle shop owner, Kokichi Mikimoto. After twenty years of exhaustive research and many disappointments, he founded Japan's cultured pearl industry. Mikimoto had discovered a natural irritant which the oyster wouldn't reject. But these implanted beads were still not being consistently coated with nacre. Another ingredient was needed. Fortunately, two other Japanese experimenters found the answer, which Mikimoto would later license. In this procedure called nucleation, mantle tissue from another oyster induces the formation of a pearl sack around the irritant bead. That pearl sack then secretes nacre, and, over a period of time, produces a cultured pearl. Mikimoto also invented a system for farming oysters. His divers gathered wild akoya oysters, which thrived in the sheltered coastal waters of Japan. Once they'd been nucleated, the oysters were caged and suspended from rafts and left to grow for four years, to produce a thick coating of nacre. Mikimoto wasn't just a remarkable innovator. He was also a brilliant business man and promoter. He worked tirelessly to have his cultured pearls accepted as true gems. Mikimoto invented the process for culturing pearls in Japan's Ago Bay. Today, dozens of large pearl companies cultivate oysters in the bay.  Small oysters, like the akoya, usually cannot tolerate nucleation more than once.  Most will be killed during harvesting when the pearls are separated from the flesh. The Japanese Akoya, Pinctada imbricata,  Japan's pearling industry expanded beyond its boarders to other Pacific shores in search of larger South Sea oysters. In the late 1950s, the Japanese arrived in Australia, helping to establish the countries first cultured pearl farm in the Kimberly region.  Australia is home to the Pinctada Maxima, the world's largest oyster, producer of the biggest and most expensive pearls. It can live up to twenty years, growing to the size of a dinner plate.  The environment in this remote region proved ideal for sustaining a large, healthy population of pearl oysters. These shell beds are swept by an exceptionally high tidal flow, providing the oysters an abundant supply of food. Nick Paspaley now runs a modern pearl culturing operation along these shores. His father began the business in the 1930s, harvesting oysters long before the arrival of Japanese culturing methods. In those days, gem quality pearls were rare, and the business of the day was in the profit the shells could bring. Nick's father became one of the first Australians to move into pearl culturing, and, in 1958, he established a farm with Japanese and American partners. Oysters were gathered in the wild. But instead of killing the oysters for their shells, the live animals were transported to sheltered bays and used as raw stock to cultivate pearls. Japanese technicians were employed to make use of their proven, but still secret culturing techniques. The Japanese also brought their oyster farming methods.  They crowded together the large Australian shells, 5,000 or more, suspended from a single pontoon. But disaster struck. 60 percent of the oysters died, and those that survived produced only a few gems quality pearls. Clearly, Paspaley would have to find new methods. Unable to roll in the surf, captive oysters quickly become smothered by barnacles. To avoid this, oysters were winched onboard and put through cleaning machines every few weeks. The oysters' health did improve. But other problems remained. The harbor water was becoming less pristine and overcrowding was a growing concern.  Now, every year from June till September, Australian crews and Japanese technicians live and work in an environment more beneficial to the health of the oysters. This floating enterprise is a high-tech solution to the threat of oyster mortality. But it is a solution few can afford. In Japan, pearl farmers are also struggling with the problem of overcrowding. And pollution is a major concern.  After 100 years of continuous pearl culturing in Ago Bay, the Akoya oyster is under assault. Katsumasa Tanaka and his wife, Kikumi, are second generation pearl farmers at Shimatown on Ago Bay. One of hundreds of independent producers in Japan, the Tanikas practice a technique handed down from Katsumasa's father, who started the family business more than 30 years ago. Ago Bay is no longer a quiet backwater. Today, it's a busy port surrounded by residential and tourist development. Industrial and domestic wastes are steadily polluting the once healthy waters in which the farmed oysters live and breathe. One threat is when toxin-producing plankton reproduce in great numbers, causing what is called "red tide."  Long term problems with pollution have made Japanese scientists leading authorities on algal blooms. The senior manager at Mikimoto's Pearl Research Laboratory is Dr. Shigeru Akamatsu. Every day, the laboratory collects samples to monitor the water quality in Ago Bay. When dangerously high levels of plankton are detected, Mikimoto scientists alert government authorities, who advise local farmers to reposition their oysters. But red tide isn't the only problem. Ago Bay is now pushed to the limits, accommodating scores of small pearling companies. Packed tightly across the bay, the mesh of oyster nets restricts tidal movements, reducing the food supply. If the oysters don't grow, neither do the pearls. Rising mortality rates is one reason Japanese pearl farmers have taken to harvesting early.  On some farms, the traditional three-year growth cycle has been reduced to as little as six months. Often, buyers are unwilling to risk the wait for higher-quality pearls. This harvest will supply the ready market for less expensive pearl jewelry. In the still-clean waters of Western Australia, pearl producers have been able to avoid many of the problems faced by Japanese farmers. But clean water alone is not enough. During the nucleation process, the large Australian oyster becomes stressed. An elaborate storage and conveyance system is designed to reduce the time it spends out of water. No longer a secret, Mikimoto's technique is still performed here by Japanese technicians. A cut is made in the oyster, and a shell bead inserted into the flesh. Positioning the bead is critical. For a perfect round, the technicians aim for the reproductive organs.  Nick Paspaley and his technicians have developed their own trade secrets. They've introduced antiseptics and hygienic conditions to minimize the oyster's exposure to infection. Unlike fish, oysters can survive out of water for hours.  Every two weeks, the oysters are cleaned to remove marine growths, which carry parasites and diseases that can affect the oyster's health, or even kill them. The cages are turned regularly, so that the embryonic pearls develop evenly. This way, they're more likely to produce the perfect spheres that are so highly prized in the marketplace. Once they've recovered, the oysters are transferred to one of the farms dotted in more sheltered waters. The farm at Talbot Bay is nestled among the ancient cliffs of the Kimberley Coast. It's home to more than 100,000 nucleated oysters. As the oysters mature, they're periodically x-rayed to gauge their progress. But with all the care in the world, nature still has the power to intervene. High winds and waves can kill unprotected oysters and tear apart entire farms. After two years of careful nurturing, the oysters are removed from the water, so that the pearls can be harvested. This is the moment of truth.  Now, in a second operation, the pearl is removed. After a two-year growth cycle, the hope for a result is a large pearl of excellent quality, with a thick coating of nacre. If an oyster yields a good-quality pearl, the technician immediately implants a fresh nucleus to start the process all over again. With a productive life of around eight years, an oyster can produce up to four pearls.  As the oyster continues to grow, it can tolerate increasingly larger nuclei, so it will produce its biggest pearl towards the end of its life. Giant South Sea pearls such as this comprise only five percent of the world's pearl market. They are extravagantly expensive, and out of reach for most consumers. The smaller Japanese pearl is still the most popular and affordable. The Mikimoto Company specializes in the high-end of this vast consumer market. For years, the Mikimoto Company produced all the pearls it sold. Today, half of what it sells comes from other pearl suppliers. China and other Asian countries are rapidly developing their own pearl culturing industries, competing for the mass market with Japan's Akoya pearls. Japan's dominance has diminished as a producer, but Japanese companies still control much of the world's pearl market. The rest of it is shared by others. Nick Paspaley will soon be selling his most recent harvest. In the world of pearls, these command the highest price. And it is New York where many of them will end up. Americans spend more each year on pearl jewelry than any other consumers in the world. Much of what they buy passes through New York. One of this country's best known pearl dealers is Salvador Assael. He specializes in South Sea pearls from Tahiti and Australia, that command dazzling prices in New York's auction rooms and jewelry salons. Her flamboyant costumes included yards of the gem that had once been the trademark of nobility. These cross-shaped pearls are from Lake Biwa in Japan. Formed in fresh water mussels, the Biwa pearls are induced by inserting mantle tissue alone without a bead. As a result, it's the shape of the tissue that determines the shape of the pearl. But as environmental pollution contaminates the lake where they grow, these gems are now virtually unobtainable.  Today, it is the black pearl that is capturing the attention of jewelry designers. Black pearls were once considered an exotic oddity, rare and almost mythical. Now, they are becoming increasingly popular. Salvador Assael claims credit for helping introduce the black pearl to New York's fashion jewelers. In the past few years, more islands in the South Pacific have been producing this once-rare commodity. Most black pearls are produced commercially in the remote coral atolls of Tahiti, in the middle of the Pacific Ocean.  The warm ocean currents and concentration of plankton in these waters create a favorable environment for the black-lipped pearl oysters, pinctada margaratifara.. This oyster is second only to the giant pinctada maxima in size, growing up to 12 inches in width and weighing as much as 11 pounds. It can produce pearls ranging from 10 to 17 millimeters. The pearl's distinctive range of colors is determined by the dark shades of the oyster shell and may also be affected by mineral salts in the water. Like the Australians, Tahitian pearl producers have adapted the traditional Japanese methods of cultivation to suit local conditions. But typhoons and sudden temperature fluctuations make these oysters vulnerable. Until recently, mortality was high, with a third of oysters dying after nucleation. To ensure the future of pearl culturing, the industry must understand every aspect of the oyster's development, even manipulating its genes in the quest for ultimate control. Dr. John Lucas is experimenting with a method of artificially breeding oysters in hatcheries, so that the small island states of the South Pacific can develop their own pearling industries without plundering their reefs for wild oysters. The moment of spawning begins with a milky eruption. The Japanese were the first to experiment with artificial breeding techniques more than 50 years ago. Then, as now, there are not enough wild Akoya oysters to meet the demands of the industry. Today, they hatch oysters in large glass tanks inside laboratories. After two months' growth, the spats, or baby oysters, are suspended under water in breeding cages. Overbreeding from the same genetic strains may soften the oysters' shell. Because the shell is its only defense against the outside world, any weakness in this natural armor can put the health of the oyster at risk. But, even healthy oysters do not always produce perfect pearls. At the end of the annual harvest, every gem is graded by shape, color, lustre and size. The painstaking process of matching the pearls then begins. With only 150 gem quality South Sea necklaces produced in a year, these cultured pearls have started to command prices at auction once reserved for rare natural pearls. In 1992, an Australian South Sea necklace was sold at Sotheby's in New York for $2.3 million dollars, a world auction record. Australia's cultured pearl industry continues to benefit from the luxury of largely unpolluted waters. Off the country's remote northern coast, pearl farmers can still collect wild shells, but only with a permit. Strictly enforced quotas limit the number of shells each farmer can collect, helping to ensure the future of Australia's wild oyster population. Pearls were once considered miraculous, a gift from the Gods. Science may have unraveled the oyster's secrets, but the pearl remains an evocative symbol of nature's genius, and a haunting reminder that humans too often destroy what they treasure most. Tonight on NOVA, a mystery on the icy depths of Loch Ness. Eye witnesses bring the legend of Loch Ness to life. Can science bring proof to the surface? Is Nessie a prehistoric monster or an elaborate hoax? An expedition launches a search for the answer. The beast of Loch Ness. ...("NOVA" theme music)... Major funding for NOVA is provided by the Park Foundation, dedicated to education and quality television. And by Iomega, makers of personal storage solutions for your computer so you can create more, share more, save more and do more of whatever it is you do. Iomega. Because it's your stuff. In the remote highlands of other Scotland, there is a place of haunting beauty. Steeped in mystery. Loch Ness. Beneath this wind-swept surface, lies one of the world's deepest bodies of water. It is a cold and forbidding environment. Drowning victims sink without a trace in the icy depths. Divers fear becoming disoriented in the eternal night, ever mindful of the legend of Loch Ness. Is this what they are seeing? A photograph taking in 1934 shows an unknown animal, or an elaborate hoax. This film was shot by an aeronautical engineer in 1960. When computer processed for NOVA, it shoes a featureless back hump, quite different from the boat, filmed later that day for comparison. Both are moving at ten miles an hour. Photographic experts at the Royal Air Force concluded that the hump is at least six feet wide and five feet high. Probably an animate object. Today, a new expeditions arrives to search the Loch. The leader is Bob Rines. Rines is a man of many accomplishments
 A respected patent attorney and founder of a law school, he was trained in science and engineering at MIT, and helped in them development of both radar and sonar. But his true passion is a pursuit few scientists take seriously
 The hunt for the Loch Ness Monster. Rines' longtime partner in the search is Charles Wyckoff. A photographic innovator with over 60 patents to his name, Wyckoff created the film stocks that captured the first images of atomic bomb explosions and moon landings. It took time for this scientist to warm to the idea of the Monster. For these two men, this expedition might well be the final chapter in a quest that began some 30 years ago, when Rines became intrigued by the mystery on a chance visit to Loch Ness. As a lawyer, used to dealing with eye-witness testimony, he found the accounts of sightings persuasive. His hunch turned to conviction in the summer of 1972, when he and his wife, Carol, had an experience that would ever haunt them. The sighting inspired Rines to mount an expedition, combining old technologies in new ways. He aimed a sonar out into the depths and nearby, placed a camera with a strobe light to take pictures every 45 seconds. After weeks of waiting, the plan finally paid off. For thousands of frames, there was nothing. Then, suddenly, three frames showing an object reflecting the strobe light back at the camera. After computer enhancement at NASA's Jet Propulsion Laboratory, the image revealed a flipper-like shape some six feet long. Rines' excitement was shared by his mentor, Harold "Doc" Edgerton, a legendary figure at MIT, the inventor of both strobe photography and side-scan sonar. Edgerton would be an active participant in Rines' later expeditions. New sonar hits and this image, in which some see the body and neck of a large animal helped to win an other important convert, one of Britain's most respected naturalists, Sir Peter Scott. With the support of Edgerton and Scott, the idea of the Monster gained new credibility. In 1975, Rines and Scott were invited to write an article in the prestigious scientific journal, Nature. For a moment, Rines had the attention of the scientific world. But his case for Nessie was soon embroiled in controversy. The flipper photo, already computer-enhanced by NASA, somehow became this image, raising doubts about its validity. As the years passed, with no follow-up by zoologists, Rines felt growing pressure to settle unfinished business. With only Wyckoff left of the original team, it is now or never. But searching Loch Ness is harder than it looks. Stretching 24 miles from the Cross-Scotland Caladonian Canal to Inverness, where the river Ness empties out into the sea, the Loch fills a deep chasm with sheer walls that plunge 800 feet down, making it the largest body of water in the British Isles. High above the Loch, Fish and his assistant install a relay station for their global positioning system, a key tool in Rines' new, more aggressive search strategy. Instead of waiting for the Monster to come to him, this time, Rines will sweep the Loch with sonar. If the sonar team finds a target, the GPS will give them a precise location. The camera team, close behind in a second boat, will then move in and attempt to capture the target on film. Getting pictures will take all of Wyckoff's ingenuity. Loch Ness is filled with peat particles washed down from the surrounding hills. The yellow haze limits visibility to a few feet. With most of the expedition's limited funds devoted to sonar, Wyckoff and his colleague, Sheldon Apsol, (?) have had to improvise. In the best MIT tradition, they have assembled a rig with a low light video camera and car headlight mounted on an aluminum frame left over from an expedition in the '70s. The final team member will play a very different role. Local naturalist, Adrian Shine, came to the Loch 20 years ago in the hope of solving the mystery. But his research has convinced him that there's no monster here. Despite their strongly opposing views, Rines has asked Shine to lend his expertise to the expedition. With the preparations completed, Rines, anxious to get started, briefs the team. A quarter of a century after his first attempt, Rines is back in the hunt. The lead boat is packed with high tech gear. Attached to the hull is a fish-finding sonar pointing straight down from surface to bottom. It will supplement the expedition's primary search tool, Sidescan Sonar. While it looks like Edgerton's original device, today's model is far more sophisticated. Pulled below and behind the boat, the Sidescan tow fish (?) sends out a sound impulse or "ping" in a 180 degree arc. In 1994 the British Natural History Museum took part in Project Urchin, the first major effort to study the ecology of the Loch. Monsters were not on the agenda. Yet its sonar experts said they too found large moving targets. Well Rines' systematic sonar sweep is going smoothly, Wyckoff is rediscovering the difficulty of taking pictures in Loch Ness. Moisture has seeped in and ruined the camera. They will have to send for a replacement; the timing couldn't be worse. If the side scan picks up the target, it may reveal more. But interpretation can be difficult. With sound waves bouncing off the steep sides, the Loch is notorious for generating misleading sonar images. Even changes in the water temperature or thermal can create apparent targets where none exist. Whatever the target was, the tow fish passed beneath it and failed to pick it up. Still, it's a tantalizing start. Even Arnie Carr is beginning to believe there may be something here. For Rines, this unconfirmed hit is an encouraging sign. Could the creature he and thousands of others believe they have witnessed still be here? ...(music)... The sightings began when a new road gave travellers their first good views of Loch Ness. It was here in 1933 that two local residents reported seeing an enormous animal rolling and plunging on the surface. An account of their sighting in the local paper brought the news of the beast to the rest of the world. The Loch Ness Monster has been a media phenomenon ever since. The Intrepid, armed to the teeth, set out to capture the beast, to no avail. Capture an image proved to be the next best thing. Some photographers resorted to outright fraud. Others succumbed to the Loch's powers of deception. Boat weights (?), wild life, and floating debris have all been mistaken for monsters. But one photograph stood above the rest. ...(music).... Boyd's investigation led to man named Christian Sperling, who claimed that he and the surgeon, Dr. Wilson, had been part of a plot to dupe a London newspaper. The object in the photograph was a one-foot plastic neck that Sperling had grafted to a toy submarine. This confession dealt a powerful blow to the Loch Ness Monster. But to American journalist, Richard Smith, the confession didn't ring true. With Rines' support, Smith has come to Loch Ness to find out if the hoax story may, itself, be a hoax. Is this a one-foot model, photographed from up close, or the four-foot neck of a living animal, shot from a distance? To find out, Smith has built floating necks, one and four feet high. His plan is to photograph them from different vantage points to see which one matches the original photo. Smith's experiment is possible only because the discovery of a new version of the surgeon's photo. The narrow strip of the far shore line, and the absence of near shoreline show how the picture was framed. And the ripples around the object provide another clue. Analysis of the ellipse shows that the camera was pointing at an angle of 19 degrees down from the horizon. Using these clues to guide his experiment, Smith has recruited a surveyor and a professional photographer to help him duplicate the surgeon's photo. Down on the shoreline where Sperling said the photograph was taken, Smith tests the "one-foot" model. The next morning, the team get their first look at the prints. To Rines and Wyckoff, the one-foot model doesn't match the original photo. The four-foot model is more convincing. Smith is convinced; now it's up to the doubters. A short way down the Loch, Alastair Boyd decided to take up Smith's challenge, with the ever skeptical Shine lending a helping hand. With the one-foot styrofoam model, they hope to prove the photo was a hoax. They too are careful to angle their camera at 19 degrees. On the left is the recreation. On the right is the original. Despite the near identical images, Smith has reservations. Boyd's experiment shows that a one-foot model can produce an image much like the surgeon's photo. The picture might be a hoax, but Boyd has no doubt that the creature in the Loch is real. Day three of the expedition. With the camera still out of commission, Wyckoff has joined Rines aboard the sonar boat for a night run. Tonight they will concentrate on Urchin Bay, where the ruins of a fourteenth century castle overlook the deepest part of the Loch. After several hours of routine searching, there is a flurry of activity. A number of targets have appeared on the print-out. One catches Arnie Carr's attention. He estimates that it's five meters, or sixteen feet long. Using the GPS relay system, they come about to search the same area again. If the target is still there on the second pass, it's probably stationary debris. If not, it's moving. To marine biologist Arnie Carr, the size and density of the mark on the print-out indicate a large, solid mass, very different from a school of fish. Carr's analysis makes photographic back-up essential. The next morning Wyckoff's team is back in action. They've replaced their video camera with a professional underwater model. With the new camera performing even better than expected, the expedition is back up to speed. There is a sense of anticipation that the long search is about to pay off with an exciting zoological discovery. ...(music)... If Nessie is an animal, as the eye-witnesses say, the implications extend well beyond Loch Ness. Long necked monsters have been reported in northern lakes all over the world, from Lake Ciarre (?) in Siberia, to Lake Champlain in North America. Could these other lake "monsters" be flesh and blood too? Cryptozoology is dedicated to the study of cryptids, or unknown animals. In almost every case, the search is triggered by eye-witness reports, a source of evidence most scientists disregard. But eye-witness evidence sometimes leads to remarkable discoveries. The Okapi in 1901; the mountain gorilla in 1912; and in 1994, the pseudo oryx in Vietnam. These were brand new species unknown to science. Rines' conviction is shared by Roy Mackal, a pioneer in the field of cryptozoology. Mackal, a molecular biologist by training, came to Scotland in the 1960s and joined a local group of enthusiasts who kept a constant vigil on the Loch. His work helped persuade Rines that there was something here worth investigating. It's been 30 years since Mackal interviewed eye-witnesses, and the descriptions remain the same. ...(music)... Long before Sir Peter Scott, when the Highland tourist industry made it popular, people were convinced that Nessie was a prehistoric relic. Plesiosaurs were cold-blooded marine reptiles that co-existed with the dinosaurs during the Jurassic and Crutatious periods, feeding on fish in the warm inland seas. But the oceans are home to a variety of prehistoric relics. From the massive megamouth shark, discovered in 1976, to the coelacanth, a fish once thought to have died out at the time as the plesiosaurs. Could a small population of plesiosaurs have escaped extinction, taking up refuge in Loch Ness? The Loch's geological origins hold the answer. Loch Ness straddles the Great Glen, a massive geological fault tat nearly cuts Scotland in two. As the land masses on either side of the fault slid by each other, they created and area of shattered rock or breccia. Each time an ice age descended on the northern hemisphere, the glaciers returned, repeatedly carving out this breccia to form a deep basin. Plesiosaurs could not have survived in Loch Ness since the age of dinosaurs, because for much of that time, it was a solid block of ice. When the glaciers finally retreated eleven thousand years ago, they left behind a deep pool of frigid water and a shallow passage to the sea
 The River Ness. Could Plesiosaurs have used the river to enter the Loch since then? It's an unlikely scenario. Even if they had somehow escaped extinction in the open oceans, these cold blooded reptiles would have had to adapt to the near freezing temperatures of the Loch Ness. Warm blooded mammals have the metabolism to thrive in cold water. And one primitive species of whale had a serpentine neck. It's known as an archeocyte. (?) But can Loch Ness sustain a breeding colony of these animals? ..(music).... Adrian Shine and fish biologist Alan Butterworth have set out this morning to explain the Loch's ecology. The dim light stifles plant growth, and in effects it ripples up the food chain, starting with the tiny plankton that feed on vegetation. Because of this limited food supply, the number of fish living in Loch Ness is surprisingly small for so large a lake. But there's another possibility
 Migratory salmon which pass through the Loch on their way to spawn. There is only one other plausible explanation for what Nessie might be
 A visitor from the sea. A large sturgeon could pass in and out of the Loch undetected, as could a large eel. Eels have been known to reach ten feet in length in the open ocean. Either one would explain the sonar hits. ...(music)... But the eye-witnesses don't buy it. Retired Chief of Detectives for Inverness, Ian Cameron, along with seven other people, reported one of the longest sighting on record, lasting almost an hour-. Day five, the Loch is flat calm, a good day for Nessie-hunting. By now, Rines has complete faith in his battle-tested sonar team. The pressure is on the untried camera crew. For today's last push, Rines has decided to focus, again, on Urchin Bay. Late in the morning, the boat's fish finder records a target at a depth of 25 meters. This is the expedition's biggest challenge, imaging a moving target under water. Minutes later, the target is out of range. Just when they seem closest to an answer, the team runs out of time. Wyckoff has learned the hard way that tracking and imaging a moving target in the murky waters of Loch Ness requires resources well beyond the means of this expedition. And something even money can't buy
 Luck. But Rines has achieved his primary goal, finding out if there is still something here. Reports of monsters in Loch Ness demand skepticism, especially given its long history of hoaxes. And the evidence from biology and geology seem to rule out Plesiosaurs or any other large, resident predator. But a lake so deep could well have a few secrets left. Someday, a more plausible explanation may emerge. Perhaps an occasional visitor from the sea. Until then, the unexplained sonar hits and the conviction of the eye-witnesses will keep the legend of Loch Ness alive.	Daybreak in Astoria, Oregon.  The RV Atlantis, one of the world's most sophisticated research vessels, sets sail for waters 200 miles off the Pacific Coast.  A team from The American Museum of Natural History and the University of Washington is launching this expedition - to attempt a daring feat of engineering on the seafloor, a mile and a half down.  Their purpose
 to delve as never before into the wonders of deep sea volcanoes.  Towering volcanic chimneys, covered with animals unlike any other, were discovered only 20 years ago.  And this newly revealed world inspired one oceanographer with the bold idea of trying to raise these massive structures to the surface.	It also seemed impossible.	But now, undersea robots make this risky venture conceivable.  The team first must map in precise detail the volcanic seabed far below.  A robotic submersible, called Jason, will be their electronic eyes.  Jason trails behind it a steel armored, fiber optic cable, it's communication link to the ship.  As the cable reels out, the ship must hold completely stationary.  Navigating by GPS, a computer controls the ship's propellers, keeping it within a few meters of the target.	The center of activity on this vast research vessel is a cramped and steamy room packed with engineers and scientists.	This is mission control for Jason operations.	The robot, now on the seafloor, is piloted toward the chimneys.  And all are eager for their first glimpse of a hidden volcanic world.	Jason's lights illuminate only about 30 feet ahead in these pitch black waters.  They fly the robot toward a billowing plume, venting from the seafloor.  Its smoke-like appearance comes from mineral particles in the scalding fluid.	They are tempted to move in for a closer look.  But these "black smokers" reach over 700 degrees Fahrenheit - hot enough to melt lead.	Some of these chimneys tower as high as 15-story buildings.  And, though sunlight never reaches them, they are blanketed with life.	For the past 10 years, geologist Veronique Robigou has struggled with the question of how these chimneys grow and sustain such a wealth of unusual creatures.  The birth of a chimney starts when molten rock far below the seabed heats up water circulating through the cracks.  The hot water rises, carrying dissolved metals - such as iron, copper, and zinc - from deep within the crust. When this hot, acidic fluid hits near freezing seawater, the metals come out of solution to form the rocky walls of the chimney.  The hot, or hydrothermal fluids that build these structures are also vital to the life that thrives here.	An intense curiosity has driven these scientists to pursue a more hands-on approach, to explore this living system.	But to haul a massive chimney up from the seafloor, the engineers first must know what they are grappling with.  These 2-D video images won't be enough.  As night falls, the team prepares to try a cutting-edge technology. They want to create 3-D maps of the structures accurate to within centimeters. To generate maps in such detail, the robot, Jason, must hover like a hummingbird, and move precisely around the chimneys.  At each new position, Jason will take pictures that a computer will later compile in 3-D. Pinpointing Jason's exact location is critical, and requires navigation beacons, called transponders, that send acoustic signals to guide the robot. The transponders are dropped to the seafloor in a special carrying cage.  It is now 4
00 a.m., but on a ship that never sleeps, operations run night and day.	With their new navigation equipment, they no longer need the joystick to pilot Jason.	Now, a computer program has control of the robot.  Jason begins taking sonar scans of the chimneys, as well as stereo video and digital photographs.  To complete the 3-D imaging, the robot and the scientists work around the clock.  A week later, with tens of thousands of digital photos, a seascape of the ocean floor is stitched together.  So dark is this undersea terrain that wide expanses like this have never been seen before.  From the composite pictures, individual chimneys can be studied in detail.  On the ship's main deck, computers churn through millions of sonar data points to create a 3-D map - although the first image is something only a computer scientist could love.	These are the most detailed maps ever made of the ocean bottom—the result of nearly two weeks of deep sea imaging, and countless hours of data crunching.  With this virtual seafloor in 3-D, the team can now plan their recovery of the chimneys.  They have illuminated at least one small part of the deep ocean.  The site they have mapped in the North Pacific is part of the longest geological structure on Earth, a deep sea mountain range over 46,000 miles long, known as the Mid-ocean Ridge System.  It stretches around the planet like the seams on a baseball, and marks where the great plates of the Earth's crust are spreading apart.  All along this vast network, volcanic eruptions give birth to new ocean floor.  And molten rock deep under the seabed creates the scalding black smokers that stream from vents and chimneys.  But only a tiny fraction of this ocean inferno has ever been explored.  Now, deep sea technology makes it possible to reach this frontier.  And with the chimneys mapped, the scientists onboard are eager to visit them in person, to pursue the mystery of how life flourishes in this volcanic world.  They will travel to the depths in a submersible called Alvin.	On the seafloor, each square foot of its titanium hull can withstand over 700 tons of pressure.  For biologist Chuck Fisher and pilot Pat Hickey, the descent will take over an hour - plenty of time for anticipation.	Through Alvin's porthole, the aqua of the surface waters soon shifts to indigo, and then to inky black.	And this alien world is full of surprises.	The deep seafloor was long considered a barren desert.  Yet, as Chuck and Pat steer toward the hot vents, the "critter count" increases.	But how could life exist down here, in the cold and eternal darkness? Once, scientists assumed that any animals on the seafloor had to depend on food drifting down from the surface.  But there is not nearly enough to explain the wealth of life found at hot vents - like the lush mats of tubeworms.	Tubeworms are Chuck Fisher's passion.  These animals are unlike any other, and when first discovered, scientists couldn't imagine what or how they ate.  They have no mouths or stomachs, yet these creatures thrive wherever cracks on the seafloor release hydrogen sulfide, a product of volcanic activity.  This caustic acid pours from the chimneys—often called sulfide structures.  Chuck and Pat fly to a 60-foot tall chimney called Smoke and Mirrors, named for its billowing plumes and shimmering water.  It is blanketed with tubeworms.	Grabbing these slippery creatures with a robotic claw is painstaking work.	They have spent hours huddled in this six-foot diameter sphere.	Pat releases the ballast that has kept them on the seafloor.  And they prepare for the long ascent.	The dangers of the open sea make the mission to recover a black smoker chimney all the more daunting.  Even the routine recovery of a submersible is fraught with peril.	As Chuck frees himself from the confines of the sub, his students tend to the tubeworms.  To keep them alive at the surface, the tubeworms are rushed to a refrigerated room.	But the key to how they survive at all lies under the microscope. These worms harbor inside their bodies a remarkable source of food
 tiny, single-celled bacteria.  These microbes are able to produce food using hydrogen sulfide and other chemicals that flow around the chimneys.  Each microbe is invisible to the naked eye.  But when billions clump together, they appear like cottony webs, draping the seafloor.  As plants at the surface use the energy of sunlight, these microbes use energy stored in chemicals to grow and multiply, supplying food to other creatures.  Their discovery in the deep, nearly 20 years ago, stunned scientists.	The larger creatures in this world either live off microbes within their bodies or prey on one another.  Giant spider crabs, snails and sea stars, the fish and the octopus - All are ultimately dependent on tiny, single-celled organisms, and the volcanic fluids that flow from the rocks.  This is a world where the energy for life springs not from the sun, but from the geothermal forces of the Earth itself.	The best way to explore the links between biology and geology may be to bring a chimney to the surface - not just to understand life here today, but also the possible roots of life nearly four billion years ago.	When life took hold on the planet, around four billion years ago, there was a vast network of hydrothermal vents - perhaps providing the geochemical energy to spawn and support life.  There is now evidence that the surface of this early Earth was bombarded by meteors and asteroids.  The safest harbor for life may have been in the deep.  The geology and chemistry of the vents have changed little in billions of years.  Scientists have shown that the combination of high pressure and minerals found here can produce ammonia, an essential building block of life.  And by delving inside a chimney, they may find clues to how life itself originated.	With the mapping and reconnaissance of the chimneys complete, the team must now prepare for its next, and more daunting mission.  As these scientists know, the challenges of working in the ocean are as great as its mysteries.  Here, on Vancouver Island, preparations for the recovery mission move into high gear.	The engineers are tackling the tricky problem of how to detach black smoker chimneys from the seafloor.  Today, they are testing a Stanley underwater chainsaw, fitted with diamond-studded teeth.  It will be operated by a robot called ROPOS.  But nothing they do here can anticipate all of the problems they will face with volcanic chimneys.	Even worse, the blade could get trapped, and the destabilized chimney could come crashing down on the robot.	From the time they set sail, the team will have three weeks to bring the chimneys to the surface.	As night falls, they navigate their way through Puget Sound, and into the North Pacific.  It's been nearly a year since the team last visited these waters and the volcanic ridge far below.  During this time, the seafloor could have changed drastically.  They launch ROPOS on this first, critical dive, not knowing for certain what they'll encounter a mile and a half down.	Flying toward the heart of the chimney field, they are on the lookout for familiar terrain.	They left markers to guide them back to the chimneys they selected last year.  Their detailed maps tell them what these targets should look like. But until they find them, the team can't be sure that the chimneys they plan to recover are still standing.	The dynamic world of deep sea volcanoes is prone to change.  They will never forget the sobering lesson they learned a few years ago from a monstrous chimney called Godzilla.  When first sighted, this chimney rose over 140 feet - a skyscraper on the seafloor.  But when geologist Veronique Robigou went back to visit Godzilla, she was in for a shock.	The most likely explanation was an earthquake.  The top-heavy Godzilla was toppled by one of the many tremors along this active volcanic ridge.  But then, the giant rose again.  Just a year after Godzilla's fall, it was covered with life, and had grown new spires nearly 15 feet high.  If Godzilla could rise and fall this fast, what about the chimneys they plan to recover?  Two of the structures at least are still upright.  But they may have grown unwieldy.	This metal hoop will gauge the chimney's size.  Keith needs a gentle touch with the joystick.  Hooping the structure is like threading a needle - a mile and a half down.  One wrong move could damage the chimney.	While only a first step, hooping Phang is a huge relief.  The team's other targets also look good
 A hot black smoker known as Finn; a larger structure called Gwenen, blanketed with animals; and a fourth chimney, Roane, named for a Celtic spirit of the sea.  In the morning, a new ship arrives on the scene, the John P. Tully, a Canadian Coast Guard vessel.  A massive winch and pulley system at the ship's stern will be used to haul the chimneys from the seafloor.  The Tully's transit from Vancouver Island has been rough.  Ferrying people and equipment from ship to ship will be even rougher. Strong winds and wild seas are the greatest threat to this mission.  And now, there are gusts up to 30 knots. Engineer Vern Miller makes it safely onboard, but the storm still endangers the team's carefully laid plans.  First, they intend to capture each chimney within a metal cage.  This cage holds a loose steel cable that can be cinched up, like a lasso.  The robot will then saw the chimney from various angles until it is weak enough to break off.  Finally, a line will be floated to the surface, so that the structure can be pulled from the seafloor.  But plenty of things can go wrong.  The line for the recovery is over 8,000 feet long, and one small snare could wreak havoc.  These plastic fasteners should prevent tangles.  They will break, one by one, when the line is pulled from the basket.  Packing the line will take nearly 10 hours.  But waiting for calm seas could take even longer.	While concerned about losing time, they hold operations - as the storm rages on.  Two nights pass, and the winds are still threatening.  Time is running out.  They have to begin.  They lower a cage designed to capture the first chimney.  It travels down suspended beneath ROPOS.  The engineers keep careful watch, fearful that in the rough seas, their delicate equipment could crash into the ship.	Two hours later, Keith Shepherd has the chimney called Phang lined up.	ROPOS moves in to tighten the cable.  With its left claw, the robot grasps the cage for support . . .	. . . and pulls the cable taut with its right.	In the control room with Keith, Bob Holland is in charge of the dexterous pulling.	Once the cable is secured, they can move ahead with the sawing.  But a final tug brings a surprise.	A crack appears, along what seems to be a natural fracture.	The chimney may now be unstable.  They gingerly tighten the cable to keep Phang together, and prepare to plunge their chainsaw directly into the brittle structure.  Scalding fluid jets out, but the blade keeps moving.	They cut from various angles, well below the crack, without the chimney toppling.  But no one can predict how Phang will hold up when they try to pull it from the seafloor.	The time has come to take the risk.  With this 8,000 foot line, they will try to haul Phang to the surface.  Operations switch over to the second ship, the John P. Tully, where Le and the other engineers wait.  Floats have brought the line to the surface.  And a zodiac retrieves it from the waves.  The engineers make certain that the line is free of snares as it is threaded over the A-frame and through the heavy winch.	For nearly an hour, they reel the line in, anxious to see what lies at the other end.	The crack in the chimney is now a clean break.  But two large pieces are still intact.	What struck John Delaney a decade ago as a wild and impossible feat now is becoming a reality.  And bringing Phang to the surface is just the beginning.  This relatively small chimney was always intended as a test case.	There are three more structures still waiting on the seafloor far below.  Roane will be next.  Like Phang, this chimney is riddled with natural fractures.	One large fracture line inspires John with a bold thought
  Why not forgo the sawing, and simply lasso and pull on the chimney, assuming it will break at the ideal spot?  But not everyone is keen on the idea.	But Le concedes to John's plan to do no sawing at all.  The hope is that this will save precious time lost to weather delays.  The wisdom of the plan will soon be measured.  If Roane remains stuck to the seafloor, the tension on their heavy winch will rise.	As they reel the line in, their own tension builds.	The chimney is still anchored to the seafloor, and the tension on the line is nearly enough to rip their heavy equipment from the deck.	While it means a major setback, Le is prepared to cut the line and start over.	Roane has broken free from the seafloor.  One hurdle is past.  But what lies ahead will not be simple.  They appear to have a multi-ton chimney on their line, and no one knows how difficult it will be to handle.	At the surface, two huge pieces of Roane hang from what seems a fragile thread.  One slip, and this precious haul could plunge back to the depths.  And that's not all that could go wrong.	Now, they must handle two swinging rocks at once.  Even after traveling through a mile and a half of ocean water, Roane is steaming at nearly 200 degrees Fahrenheit.  Its surface is covered with tubeworms, some still alive.  Its interior is filled with billions of microbes.	While the scientists have their samples, no one wants to endure the same uncertainty again.  The team will no longer count on natural fractures. The remaining chimneys will face the chainsaw.  At nearly 600 degrees Fahrenheit, Finn is the hottest black smoker they will target.  Sawing this chimney creates a new passage for scalding water.  The geologists know that the hotter the chimney, the more fragile it should be.  At the surface, Finn's delicate nature becomes apparent.	What they fear is a heart-breaking loss turns out to be less grave. They have still recovered two-thirds of the structure, and now have a window to its interior.	The pieces, glittering with chalcopyrite, also known as fool's gold, are scientific treasures.  They hold precious information about the geology and chemistry that supports life in the deep.  The next morning, in the final hours of the cruise, the fourth chimney, Gwenen, emerges steaming, without a hitch. She is blanketed and filled with life.  It's a fitting end to a journey of great travails, but even greater success, for scientists and engineers alike.	This is just the start of wide-ranging research into these remarkable habitats from the seafloor, and a first step in bringing these structures and the stories they tell to the public.	After they are thoroughly studied, the chimneys will travel to New York City, to The American Museum of Natural History, for permanent display.  Hokkaido.  Japan's northernmost island.  A remote frontier where Russia meets the Far East.  In this magical place lives an ancient race called the Ainu. They claim their land is a gift from the gods who turned boiling mud into beautiful mountains and forests.  Even today, Ainu people worship the natural world around them.  A world in which all creatures are sacred.  Seen through the eyes of a rare and remarkable culture, this is the story of life in Hokkaido's Garden of the Gods. Long ago, voyagers in the Indian Ocean chanced upon a large, floating object of mysterious origin. Its suggestive feminine shape launched many a sailor's fantasy. Some believed this was the forbidden fruit that tempted Adam, and somewhere nearby must be the original Garden of Eden.	In the middle of the Indian Ocean lies the Seychelles, a remote group of islands that pose a baffling puzzle.  	In central Japan, a spider weaves her web in a field of growing rice. Rice has been a part of Japan for so long that it has shaped the land. Indeed, it has become so much a part of the Japanese landscape that it has created a unique environment essential to both the people who created it and the wild animals that now share it. It's April now. The days are lengthening and it is getting warmer. Spring is on its way. This tree is the oldest living thing on earth. Nearly 5,000 years old, it is called Methuselah, named after the longest lived of all the biblical patriarchs. Enduring droughts and storms, it was a seedling when the pyramids were built. But this tree is not in Egypt. It grows near Las Vegas, on a remote hillside. Methuselah's hidden connections to thousands of years of human history are only now being discovered. No one paid much attention to this living fossil, until one man became obsessed with extracting its secrets. Relentlessly he probed, uncovering clues to our prehistoric past. His discoveries led to a startling idea
 that this magnificent tree could hold the key to immortality itself. But the Methuselah tree has an enemy. Will it survive to let us unlock its secrets? Your roots go a long way back, two and a half thousand years before Christ was born. Twenty-six foot tall and still growing, you are the oldest living thing on earth. Rock solid and transfixed, you've taken life slowly, unlike our human race. That's us down there, Las Vegas, glowing in the desert. Are you sad? Are you jealous? If you could speak what would you tell us? You live in the White Mountains of California, where the climate is so harsh little else can survive. It's no surprise you look more dead than alive. Adversity is the secret of your success. You have taught yourself to thrive in this parched landscape with little food or water. Like war-time children, brought up on a meager diet, you far outlive your vigorous cousins further down the mountain. Your scrawny bodies atrophy on the outside, while preserving a hidden vitality within. You survive on a lifeline only 10 inches wide, a stripe of bark-covered tissue which manages to carry all essential nutrients from your roots to your needles.  Twenty-five-sixty-six B.C., not long after you'd taken root, the largest stone building in the world is about to be occupied. King Cheops, had built the great pyramid of Giza as a tool for himself. He is lying on his deathbed. The Pharaoh exhales for the last time. His breath contains millions of carbon dioxide molecules. Imagine those molecules of spent breath cast adrift into the atmosphere. Riding the jet stream, crossing oceans and continents. A few reach a land that would later be called America. Perhaps you were too young to remember. You were a mere sapling when one entered your body through a tiny pore of a needle. From the location of the obsidian lava flows archaeologists have established that the Indians would cover a distance of 150 miles in the course of a year. In the six weeks of summer when the weather opened up the mountaintops for hunting they would venture up to your domain.  One summer it was so cold that it left you scarred for life. The few cells that grew that year were damaged when the water inside froze up, expanded and burst the cell walls. Tree rings were examined under a microscope. The jagged black line clearly showed cell death in the year 1627 B.C. What could have caused temperatures in that year to fall so dramatically? Could tree rings be a record of some cataclysmic event in another part of the world? That acid taste of death came from a distant island in the Aegean Sea. The eruption of the volcano on Santorini was probably the biggest bang in history. Its devastating effects are thought to have wiped out the Minoan civilization of Crete. The exact date has always been in dispute. Could a tree 7,000 miles away provide the answer? The Santorini frost ring made people realize that tree rings could date events in antiquity with incredible precision. But since the early 1960s, a group of tree scientists have been frustrated by the limitations imposed on the art by the age of the oldest living tree. They wanted a dating instrument that would go back much further. His technique is to slide together sequences of rings from wood of different ages until they line up. By 1969 the world had it's first unbroken dating record, going back nearly 9,000 years. It was a perfect reference, which could be used to check other dating systems. It arrived at a time when the complicated chemistry of carbon-dating was found to be flawed. Carbon-dating depended for it's accuracy on there being a constant level of radioactive carbon in the atmosphere. However in the 1960s this was found not to be the case. Bristlecones came to the rescue. Scientists took wood of a known date and then subjected it to radio carbon dating to see how far out it was. They discovered it could be out by as much as a thousand years. Archaeology was turned on its head. Dates always assumed to be right were wrong. The leading theory of how European history evolved had to be revised. You see we'd all believed that the influence of the Eastern Mediterranean had radiated outwards to the barbaric north. We'd thought Stonehenge was inspired by the sophisticated Mycenaeans of Greece. In fact it turned out that Stonehenge was built long before. The rising population forced families to move up to 12,000 feet where they established the highest settlements in America. Anxiety was soon to turn to terror, not only for you, Methuselah, but also for the Indians. The white man was coming. If one prospector hit pay dirt, thousands of others followed. Each time a seam of silver or gold was struck, they swarmed all over the mountain staking their claim, greed being the human curse. The richest silver mine was called Cerro Gordo. In 1870, it supported a town of nearly 5,000 people, a wild and lawless place. And Jody knows how they got there. The smoke was a by-product of the extraction of molten silver from the ore. At its height, the mine yielded 2,000 tons of silver a year. But success for the human spelled disaster for the Bristlecone. How profligate we must seem to you, when a golf course consumes a million gallons a day, whereas you can get by on a hundred gallons a year. Sixty miles from Las Vegas was a town specially designed to boom and bust. They called it "Doom town." One hundred thirty miles east of this "achievement" was a Mormon town called St. George. It lay directly downwind of the bomb. Agatha Mannering was in her garden and was given no warning of what was to come. She became a human guinea-pig. You were lucky to be upwind of the test site. That's how you escaped so lightly with only a trace of Strontium 90 in your rings. Ironically, in attributing bristlecones with such supernatural qualities, Schulman may have been closer to the truth than he realized. The genetic material contained within your seeds is perfectly preserved. Our cells are programmed to die.  What's your secret? Is it your Spartan existence, a slow metabolism guaranteeing your place in Never Never Land? Perhaps one day by studying your most personal chemistry, scientists may unravel the elixir of life. Schulman died at the age of 49. A memorial service was held in the shadow of your branches. Since then, other scientists working with bristlecones have died prematurely. Is this a curse, Methuselah? Revenge for Schulman's final gift to the world? Don Currey was a geography student, and the article made him realize that bristlecones might help him date glacial deposits in Nevada. On the crest of a glacial moraine, a particularly old and grizzled specimen caught his eye. By pure chance he'd chosen a tree that would turn out to be even older than you. But he was faced with a problem. Not having the experience to know what to do next, Currey took a more direct course of action. He took the slab back to his motel room and started to count the rings. It was only then that the full horror of what he had done began to dawn on him. He had discovered the world's oldest living thing and killed it. Fate had dealt a cruel blow. Fate had one last hand to deal the victim of Currey's chain saw. The slab was laid to rest in the casino of the small town it once looked down on.	In the world of birds, nearly all males rely on their looks to attract a mate. A lyrebird, like so many, uses his feathers. The Count Raggi's bird of paradise has gauzy plumes spouting from beneath his wings. Bare patches of brilliantly colored skin can also prove quite arresting. Many males flaunt their spectacular plumage in dramatic dances, as the Riflebird does. But nature does not endow every male bird with such spectacular good looks.	Australia is home to eight different species of Bowerbird. This one, the Tooth Billed, is continuing to arrange his collection of upturned leaves in a way he hopes will impress any female that comes by. No other male animal woos his mates by displaying inanimate objects in this way, except, of course, us.	Both Bowerbirds and human art lovers must find something rewarding in constructions which carry, in Andy Goldsworthy's words, "the touch of a person." And just as every human artist has his or her individuality, so does every male Bowerbird.  In an obscure museum in eastern Europe, a fossil hunter has made a startling discovery. While randomly sifting through a set of drawers he found a collection that hadn't been examined for 30 years.  The paleontologist, Per Ahlberg, had found a new piece of evidence in a 400 million-year-old detective story
 how and why creatures first left the water to live on land. For over a century scientists have searched the world for fossils that can help them unravel the mystery. Now a series of new discoveries is shaking up long-held views on how evolution fashioned this profound transformation, how it happened that fish left the water for land and became the ancestors of us all. In north-central Pennsylvania, near the Appalachian towns of Hyner and Renovo, stretches an ancient sandstone formation known as Red Hill. It was here that paleontologists Neil Shubin and Ted Daeschler discovered extraordinary new clues in one of evolution's most enduring mysteries
 how ancient creatures left the water to walk on land. The story began to take shape back in the 18th century with a simple but crucial observation, a vast array of animals showed striking similarities. They all had four limbs. They are tetrapods.  So are dogs. So are lions, tigers and bears.  Non-tetrapods have a wide variety of body plans. Some have hundreds of legs. Some have none. But all tetrapods, beneath the skin, share similar features. Sometime during the four-billion-year history of life on Earth there were primitive tetrapods from which all four-limbed, air-breathing creatures descended—amphibians and reptiles, birds and mammals.  Lobe-fin fishes were common during a time in Earth's history called the Devonian Period, a hundred-fifty million years before the age of dinosaurs began. Tetrapod's fossils were plentiful in rock layers younger than the Devonian, but older rock layers yielded no tetrapods at all—only more primitive creatures like sponges, worms and some fish.  In 1881, on the Gaspé Peninsula of Quebec, a crucial discovery was made by a Canadian farmer. He stumbled upon the most perfect fossils of lobe-fin fishes ever seen, in rock from the Devonian period. Called Eusthenopteron, the layout of its fin bones showed a striking resemblance to the bone structure of tetrapod limbs, and with a clarity never before seen. What they thought they'd clinched was the sort of fish from which we all came, an ancestor with fins that were verging on limbs. But could they find creatures that looked more like tetrapods—animals with the beginnings of true arms and legs? In 1931, fossil hunters got lucky. A team of Swedish scientists on a geological expedition to Greenland came upon a 360 million-year-old Devonian creature that definitely was not a fish. It had the telltale bone structure of a tetrapod. It appeared to be a milestone along the evolutionary path from living in water to living on land. It fell to Erik Jarvik to analyze this crucial new discovery. He spent years digging hundreds of fossilized bones out of the rock to try to reconstruct the anatomy of the creature. Jarvik was a brilliant anatomist, incredibly painstaking. He began working on Ichthyostega in 1948, but didn't complete the work until two years before his death in 1998. And during Jarvik's nearly 50 years of research no one else was able to study the fossil. Jarvik did release two papers during the course of his research comparing Ichthyostega to the fish Eusthenopteron. He was convinced that Ichthyostega had been a true tetrapod with a ribcage, a pelvis attached to a backbone with interlocking spurs, and four limbs with five digits each that would have enabled the creature to walk on land. Somewhere in the rocks there may be other fossils of four-legged creatures from the Devonian Period that would help fill in the evolutionary sequence from water to land. There may be more what are often called "missing links." Charles Darwin called them "transitional forms" in his 1859 masterwork on evolution. Some transitions occur when there are dramatic environmental changes. Creatures not well suited to the new environment die out. But, just by chance, some members of a population will be able to survive
 those with thicker fur if a climate turns colder; those with longer bills if a major food source develops deeper flowers. The most popular explanation for why fish evolved to walk on land was proposed by Harvard paleontologist Alfred Sherwood Romer. Romer based his hypothesis, known as the "drying pond scenario," on a view long held by geologists that the red color of Devonian rock meant it had been a time of severe drought. Romer suggested that limbs evolved as fish adapted to making this desperate march across land. These would have become the first tetrapods, our ancestors. Unable to have the fish frozen, she left it with a taxidermist until Dr. J.L.B. Smith, a prominent South African scientist, could come identify it. Coelacanths are a group of lobe-finned fishes that lived during the Devonian Period and were thought to have gone extinct over 76 million years ago. Smith was convinced the Coelacanth could actually move about on the ocean floor using its lobed fins. With little left to study, Smith was determined to find another coelacanth, alive, and offered a reward to local fishermen. Jenny Clack had long dreamed of solving the mystery of how and why creatures first walked on land, but it seemed a remote possibility. What turned up was the notebook of a geology student who had visited Greenland years earlier. In one corner he'd made an extraordinary note
 he'd found remains of Ichthyostega, the creature Erik Jarvik had discovered. It took six years to raise the funds for the expedition, but finally Jenny Clack headed off. Accompanying her was her Ph.D. student, Per Ahlberg. Even with maps and detailed notes Ahlberg and Clack feared they'd never find the right spot. When they explored the mountain at a lower elevation, Clack saw something. They had found the most complete tetrapod specimens since Erik Jarvik's expedition 56 years earlier
 fossils of a four-legged Devonian creature called Acanthostega. Acanthostega had eight fingers on one hand, suddenly calling into question one of the most basic assumptions behind the previous hundred years of research. Ahlberg and Clack now believe our earliest ancestors with legs must have had numerous digits, and then somehow evolution reduced them to five over the eons. Acanthostega's legs would have been useless for walking. And what's more, it could never have lived out of the water for long. It breathed primarily with gills, like a fish. The evolution of legs was apparently not triggered by the need to walk on land. Stunned by these revelations, Clack checked her findings against a fragment of Ichthyostega which she'd found in Greenland. Her team prepared the specimen and counted the toes. There was more that Jarvik had not seen. Clack found that Ichthyostega's legs were also not made for walking. They, too, were more like paddles. In 1995 Daeschler opened up a Red Hill rock and discovered a nearly perfect bone. It was the first piece of a Devonian tetrapod ever found on the North American continent. More able to carry its own weight than either Acanthostega or Ichthyostega, Hynerpeton could possibly have walked on land.  Finding these fossilized plants prompted the Red Hill team to rethink some old ideas. Perhaps the late Devonian environment wasn't as drought-ridden as experts had thought for nearly a century. Perhaps it was more like a rainforest. The Earth may once have been barren, but the findings in Pennsylvania suggest that by the end of the Devonian, the Earth was densely forested and etched with rivers. These were bordered by something completely new, swamp. The first four-limbed creatures may have evolved in this wholly new ecosystem, just the kind of environmental shift that can trigger major evolutionary change. Some of these new niches were the margins of this watery world. In the tangle of vegetation creatures with limbs and fingers would have a real advantage over those with fins. And there was definitely something to escape from. The Red Hill team found evidence of a predator of terrifying proportions. A fish Keith Thomson had named Hyneria. The revised picture of the Devonian environment opened up new ways of thinking about the forces that drove the evolution from fish to tetrapods. Limbs seem to have evolved not after a fish ventured onto land, but before. They were useful to navigate through swamps, to avoid predators, or, perhaps, to lay eggs on shore, out of harm's way. Limbs and fingers evolved because they gave the creatures who had them a distinct advantage in the swampy Devonian world. Using them to walk on dry land was a happy accident. More of nature's tinkering would be revealed when Per Ahlberg, now of London's Natural History Museum, visited eastern Europe. He began rummaging around in a forgotten drawer of an obscure fossil collection at a museum in Latvia, and a piece of bone caught his eye. It turned out to be a jaw fragment from a Devonian creature that showed both fish and tetrapod characteristics. Ahlberg named the creature Livoniana, after the region in Latvia where it was found. And to confirm his suspicions that it really was a transitional fossil, he ran it through something called a "cladistic analysis." It's a database that lists all the anatomical features that distinguish fish from tetrapods. The analysis shows Livoniana to be clearly a transitional creature. It fits on an evolutionary tree about midway between fish and tetrapods. Undaunted by deadly hydrogen sulfide fumes, two explorers venture into the dark recesses of a wild cave. Inside, toxic gases bubble up through the stream. Gas monitors warn the cavers of concentrations that could kill in minutes. Yet, to their amazement, everywhere they look, life is flourishing, unfazed by the poison in the air or relentless darkness.  The explorers get out, but they are stunned! How are the creatures here able to live at life's edge in acid, toxic gases and darkness? What mysterious process is eating away this cave? And is it unique? Scattered across the earth over 50,000 caves have been found. Most have been formed by water. Others have been carved by flowing glaciers or sculpted from volcanic lava. But the origin of some caves remains a mystery. Today, explorers are penetrating further than ever into the depths of this underground universe, transforming our understanding of how caves and the hidden life within them began. Just beneath the surface of the earth lies a vast unknown wilderness—a world of timeless darkness and eerie silence; of vaulting halls and maze-like passages; of mineral formations so exquisite they seem sculpted for some great cathedral, yet have been taking form by themselves for eons. They bear names both exotic and whimsical
 fishtails, draperies, bacon, stalagmites and stalactites. The quest to understand one of the world's most mysterious caves began in the Guadalupe Mountains of New Mexico. Two hundred fifty million years ago, this range was a massive barrier reef called El Capitan. It lay beneath an inland sea covering the American Southwest. As the sea evaporated, the reef hardened into a rock called limestone. Over time the earth shifted, lifting the rocks 8,000 feet above the sea floor. But what else besides flowing water could have removed such a massive quantity of rock? And there were other riddles. Why were some rocks so full of holes they looked like Swiss cheese? And other rocks, 20 feet high and covered with mud, turned out to be something else entirely. It would take years to unravel the mystery of these gypsum blocks. In the meantime, gypsum would be found in other Guadalupe Caves, including one discovered only a few miles away from Carlsbad. Following the sound of the wind to the bottom of a pit in Lechuguilla Canyon, three cavers uncovered an extraordinary place. Perhaps the gypsum had washed into the caves from the surrounding gypsum plains. Deposited by the ancient sea, these plains stretch for miles beside the Guadalupe Mountains. But when Carol analyzed Carlsbad's gypsum, she discovered it was chemically different from the plains. There was only one other way it could have been formed
 when sulfuric acid reacts with limestone it dissolves, leaving gypsum behind. Where could acid as caustic as that in a car battery have come from? Carol and Dave began to search for a source. They knew that around the Guadalupe Mountains lay major deposits of oil and gas thousands of feet underground. They also discovered that an undesirable chemical tainted these deposits. Carol knew that something deep within the oil fields was producing the hydrogen sulfide gas, but what? A chemical analysis revealed it bore the telltale signs of life. Something living was eating the oil and giving off hydrogen sulfide. Scientists would soon discover an even harsher environment where microbes could survive. The revelation came when a research submarine stumbled on volcanic cracks in the seabed, spewing out minerals and chemicals. Around these cracks, colonies of microbes clumped together in thick mats lived in total darkness. Instead of using energy from the sun, they fed on chemicals and seemed undaunted by temperatures that far exceeded those of Yellowstone. These extraordinary microbes were nicknamed "extremophiles," because they could tolerate extremes of pressure, heat and darkness. As long as there was water and a chemical source of energy, life could indeed survive deep beneath the surface of the earth. But could it set in motion the formation of a cave? And a startling concept. Biology, not just geology, was at work. Life itself was helping to shape the world beneath our feet.  At the bottom of the pit, Diana climbs through the hatch door that protects the cave. As the air pressure changes, winds can blow though the entrance tunnel at speeds up to 50 miles per hour. Once inside, she will be plunged into absolute darkness and totally dependent on battery-powered lights. Next, microbiologist Penny Boston rappels into the pit. Boulder Falls is named after all the rocks that came loose the first time explorers ventured down. To reach the bottom, Penny and Diana lower themselves on a single rope tied to an anchor and control their speed with a hand brake. If they don't apply enough friction, they could spiral into an uncontrollable deadly descent. Penny and Diana wonder if odd formations hanging from the ceiling could be fossilized bacteria. They call them "u-loops" and take a sample to study back in the lab. Lechuguilla is considered a dead cave because it's no longer being etched out by sulfuric acid, but this doesn't mean that it's devoid of life. Although the microbes that set in motion the cave's formation are long gone, Penny and Diana believe that others have taken their place. They decide to investigate why the walls are decaying and covered by rust-colored patches. To test this theory, Penny and Diana place chemicals on the walls that will react if they come in contact with living microbes. Where they get hits they collect samples. Back in the lab they hope to prove that bacteria are here, making a living in this extreme environment. If these samples show that extremophiles are surviving here, far from the life-giving sun, they must be getting their energy by eating minerals in the rocks. But the greatest contamination comes from the necessity to camp underground for days. Urine is left in designated places, but solid waste and trash have to be carried out. To conserve precious batteries for the long trek back, everyone turns in early. Since there's no difference between day and night, some find it hard to sleep—a reminder, perhaps, of how out of place humans are in this underground world. But does life exist in Lechuguilla cave? Back in the lab, Penny and Diana examine their samples with an electron microscope. Magnified a hundred thousand times, the images reveal the extreme life that thrives in Lechuguilla's darkness. Here, tiny microbes appear as distinct circular shapes. Many appear firmly attached to the rocks. Penny and Diana hope to figure out exactly how the microbes are enlarging the cave walls. They find clues in a rock sample rich with the mineral manganese. To be sure, they need to grow their samples in the lab, but less than one percent of all microbes can be cultured with standard techniques. For microbes that won't grow in culture, Diana extracts DNA to figure out who is there. But Lechuguilla's rock-eating bugs have one important trait in common. If microbes are still eating the walls of a cave as old as Lechuguilla, what role might they be playing in a younger cave still forming? Because of the toxic gases, few venture beyond the stone staircase that descends to the mouth of the cave. Diana and Louise carefully follow the stream that pierces the heart of Cueva de Villa Luz, which means lighted house in Spanish. It's named for the many skylights that connect the cave to the surface. But this influx of fresh air is no match for the deadly gases seeping into the cave. As they venture further into the black recesses of the cave, their monitors beep incessantly, signaling a rise in gas levels. But despite the increasing darkness and toxic fumes, they find more life. Deep inside the cave they find clues. Diana is mesmerized by strange formations dangling from the ceiling. At first glance they look like stalactites, but unlike stalactites, which are hardened limestone, these are soft, gooey strings of mucus. Because they drip like a runny nose, they're nicknamed "snottites." Diana is struck by how similar they look to u-loop rock formations found in Lechuguilla. But there is something else amazing about this slime. The scientists are shocked. Not only are microbes beneath the cave producing hydrogen sulfide, it forms sulfuric acid as it bubbles up in the stream—bacteria inside the cave are making acid. Diana examines a snottite. Wherever sulfuric acid eats away the limestone, pasty white gypsum is left behind. Finally, scientists can observe microbes in the act of creating a cave. But is life as powerful a force as the flowing water shaping the cave? Although the scientists are not sure, one thing is clear
 these microbes play a vital role. But this gas bubbling up from below not only drives the cave's formation, it helps fuel the food chain of this subterranean world. Cut off from the sunlight, bacteria feast on the hydrogen sulfide, and, in turn, become food for the insects and fish. The expedition ends abruptly, with many unanswered questions about the physical limits of life and its impact on caves. Just as at Villa Luz, hydrogen sulfide produced by microbes deep in the earth bubbles up though the spring and forms sulfuric acid. On the walls above, tiny droplets gleam in the light. They seem like ordinary condensation. But a needle-like probe reveals that the droplets are sulfuric acid. Although it's not as strong as the acid at Villa Luz, it's still dissolving away Kane's limestone and leaving gypsum behind. And like at Villa Luz, colonies of bacteria are making this acid. But how much did they shape the cave? The scientists devise a test of elegant simplicity. Chips of pure calcite, the mineral in limestone, are placed in plastic tubes and submerged in the springs beside the microbial mats. In some, both acidic water and microbes are allowed to flow freely over the limestone chip. In others, water is allowed in, but a fine filter keeps out the microbes. To understand the full impact of life on Kane Cave, Annette and her colleagues have spent years analyzing its microbial mats. To their surprise, instead of simple colonies, they contain communities as diverse as a city block. There are microbes eating hydrogen sulfide, making sulfuric acid and dissolving the limestone. Below them are bugs that live off the waste of the rock-eaters, making methane gas or even possibly new minerals. But the greatest surprise is the discovery of a primitive extremophile closely related to those found thousands of miles away at undersea volcanic vents. There are hints that these organisms descend directly from the earliest forms of life that emerged on Earth some 3.5 billion years ago. If extremophiles represent ancient life, they also give us a glimpse of how this life survived here on earth and perhaps elsewhere. Both astronomers and geologists believe that other planets and moons in our solar system have subsurface conditions similar to Earth's. If extremophiles can survive in harsh environments here, why not beneath the surface of some distant planetary body where liquid water exists?  It's hard to imagine a more alien, exotic world than the underground realm of caves. While their sculpted beauty is breathtaking, the invisible dark life they contain is even more extraordinary. These microbes, with their unique strategies for survival, raise the possibility that there is far more life in the universe than we ever imagined. And on earth, much of it remains undiscovered beneath our feet. They are among the oldest flowering plants on earth. They outlived the dinosaurs and may outlive us. There's more than 25,000 species. But what is it about orchids that inflames human passions? What is the mystery behind the orchid's power of seduction? Over the last three centuries, dozens of people have died while hunting them. And this man came within an inch of joining them. While in the jungles of Colombia, he and his friend were kidnapped by terrorists. Then after nine months of captivity... Now safely home on his family's estate in England, you would think he has had enough botanical adventure. But only 14 months since his release, Tom Hart Dyke has returned to the jungle. What could possess a man to risk his life for a flower? A member of an eccentric community that dates back to the Victorian era, Tom Hart Dyke is an orchidophile, an orchid fanatic. For two years, he traveled the world hunting for orchids, and then was captured by guerillas in Colombia and held hostage for nine months. Since his release he's spent almost all his time at orchid fairs and in the greenhouses on his family estate. This obsession with orchids is not uncommon. In his 1939 book The Orchid Hunters, Norman McDonald wrote, "When a man falls in love with orchids, he'll do anything to possess the one he wants. It's like chasing a green eyed woman or taking cocaine, it's a sort of madness." They are the largest family of plants on Earth, with over 25,000 species that come in all shapes and sizes. Most share a few key characteristics that distinguish them from other flowers. Orchids can only be cut symmetrically in one direction. They're called zygomorphic. Other flowers, like daisies, are symmetrical no matter how you slice it. They touch and talk... ...and then tally the score. Any orchid worthy of a prize has to be meticulously described. The winning orchid becomes the new orchid to beat. But win or lose, the fairs and contests incite the passion of orchid lovers everywhere. If he's successful, his grandmother will join the ranks of many illustrious people. Finding a new species of orchid to name after Tom's grandmother is not going to be easy. Over the last two hundred years, there aren't many places that orchid hunters haven't been. But Tom's research has come up with Papua New Guinea. At Kew Gardens, the world's oldest orchid conservatory, Jeff Wood, a leading authority on South East Asian orchids, agrees. Tom's mission takes him to Jayapura on the western half of New Guinea. Before he goes into the jungle, he needs to find a guide. And since orchids are protected under CITES, the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species, Tom's guide will need a permit to collect orchids. He suggests that they head to the Baliem Valley, a place renowned for wild orchids. But it must be said that a botanical party in that area was recently held hostage for four months, and two of their members were beheaded before the Indonesian army could rescue them. This is not a safe place. So Tom enlists the support of Hungarian-born anthropologist Kal Muller, who's lived on the island for the past ten years. Kal is taking them on a two-day march from where the road ends. There they'll find the last settlement before undisturbed primary cloud forest. But once again, there's potential danger
 the Dani tribesmen are headhunters, although the last reported incident was in 1974. Nevertheless, Tom is eager to hunt orchids and quickly gets out his books to see if Kayu, the Chief's son, and the village elders can guide him. The Dani may be hunters, but hunting orchids isn't quite their game. They still agreed to take Tom deep into the jungle tomorrow. The next morning after breakfast, for the first time since he was released by the kidnappers fourteen months ago, Tom is back in the jungle hunting for orchids. Within a couple hours, Tom demonstrates the same behavior that drove his Colombian kidnappers crazy. But Tom would, for a flower named Dendrobium lawesii—pretty, with its hanging bell-like flowers, and much sought after, but definitely not a new species. That totals over 2,000,000 blooming orchids. And then there's at least another 3,000,000 orchids at different stages of growth. With more than 200 workers, an automated conveyor system, computer controlled climate, nearly a million and a half square feet of greenhouses covering an area of five city blocks, and more than five million plants, this is one of the largest orchid factories on Earth. Science and industry have conspired to democratize the world of orchid collecting. And Kerry could have sold Tom the Dendrobium for which he risked his life for $25. But to an orchid hunter, it's not enough to just own a treasure trove of orchids. The thrill is in the hunt. Tom's been up since dawn, trekking to the far side of the Dani tribe's hunting grounds. There he immediately makes an important find. Could this be the orchid to name after his grandmother? It's not exactly an Elizabeth Taylor orchid, or even a Barbara Bush. Agus thinks that it's a member of the group or genus Bulbophyllum but can't identify the species. Tom decides to bank this plant in case they find nothing more impressive. He takes a photograph and GPS reading, both vital for a formal identification. Later that night he can't find the plant on his computer. Could this be a new species? First, they had to work fast, because the original phrag had to be sent back to Peru, under the terms of the Convention on International Trade of Endangered Species. But, as with any orchid that arrives at the I.D. Center, Higgins enters its description into their database while John Beckner checks the files. That same day, in a special supplement to Selby Garden's scientific journal, the phragmapedium was officially introduced to the world. The honor of naming it went to the man who brought it through the door, Mike Kovack. This is an orchid hunter's dream. If Tom can find a new orchid as beautiful as Phragmipedium kovachii, he will have found a tribute to his grandmother worthy of the Queen of England. It's déjà vu all over again. Both Tom and Agus may be out of their depth. They're having difficulties with the genus and subgenus, let alone being able to recognize the subtleties of species and subspecies. This grassy glade is orchid heaven. Paphiopedilum wilheminae, a slipper orchid. If this doesn't give you orchid fever, nothing will. On the other orchid's female sex organ, buried on the underside of the column, millions of pollen grains are precisely positioned to come into ultimate contact with tens of thousands of little orchid eggs. That's a lot bang for the buck. While the male wasp is at it, the orchid glues its pollen sack onto the insect's head. When the wasp is frustrated enough, it goes off to another orchid, and this time the orchid grabs the pollen sack and conception is complete, at least for the orchid. It's that special undefinable quality that drives Tom to risk his life for an orchid, and may even infect Kal with orchid fever. It's Tom's last day in the Baliem Valley, and with Kal successfully initiated into the orchid cult, he's fired up to find his grandmother something more than that tiny Bulbophyllum. He's taken Agus down to the river, and within seconds they spot three unusual species. But hiding away beneath an overhang, they find something really special. Could this be the treasure that Tom has been seeking? An undiscovered cross between two different species of orchids? Flushed with success at their astonishing find, Tom decides to pay for a feast. He's leaving the valley tomorrow and wants to thank the villagers for all their work. It's a well-earned night of celebration, but tomorrow is the moment of truth. When Tom returns to Jakarta, there he will consult the experts to learn if he has succeeded in finding a new species to bear his grandmother's name. Once in the city, Tom discovers he's almost back to square one. With better reference books, he and Agus quickly find that what they thought was a new hybrid is actually a well-known species. And the other plant they found is, in Tom's opinion, unworthy of his grandmother's name. He's got to go back into the jungle. He's heading for the Van Rees Mountains, one of the last places in the world considered virgin territory. Less than half of this island has been explored by western scientists, and where they've gone, the finds have been astonishing. In the last 10 years, 25 new species of mammals, 16 new species of insect and seven new species of frog have been found. Relatively speaking Tom's chances are good. The nearest landing strip is a small missionary outpost on the edge of Lake Homes. After consulting where to go tomorrow, the downside of bringing in the professionals becomes clear. Tom's toilet paper technique for pressing specimens isn't up to professional orchid collecting standards. It's clear that Tom, an amateur, is going to have to work hard to keep up with Agustina. On their first day in this new territory everybody is excited about the astonishing range of orchids. But Tom's strong desire to find a plant for his grandmother is beginning to rub up against a growing sense of competitiveness, and it's Agustina who scores first. Tom isn't impressed. What Agustina has found is at best a subspecies of Dendrobium orchid, and Dendrobiums are the second most common genus on the Island. Orchids are known to excite. The English Herbal Guide in 1653 advised discretion
 "Orchids are hot and moist in operation under the dominion of Venus and provoke lust exceedingly. The name "orchid" derives from the Latin, Orchis, which means testicle." The next morning Tom is first to score. Agustina goads Tom to climb a 35-foot tall tree. With Tom safely back down on the ground, Agustina and Julius get out the books, and the news is good. Agustina is confident that there are enough differences between the well-documented Dipodium pictum and the plant that Tom has found to make it worth collecting. Tom can't contain his one-upmanship. There's nothing new about this large flower, spotted 70 feet in the air. It's just that a few days ago Agustina firmly asserted that Tom would never see a Coelogyne orchid flowering this time of year. Tom's rubbing it in. Tom knows it's a Coelogyne asperata, already a described species, but he gets the satisfaction of proving Agustina wrong. Tension is high among the orchid hunters. There's a growing sense of urgency to cover more ground. Then, three hours from camp, Agus makes what may be the find of the trip. It's a plant to baffle the professionals. Agustina agrees it's a member of the orchid family, but has no idea what species it is and doesn't even have a clue what genus or group of species it's from. The last time a whole new genus of orchid was discovered was more than a decade ago in Ecuador. The team is in a situation that most botanists can only dream of. For a few moments, the orchid commands the hunters' reverential silence. They survived the dinosaurs, but will they survive the passion of the orchid hunter? The flower that commanded their awe is not a new genus or even a new species. It's dismissed as common. And regrettably, the Dendrobium that Agustina thought was going to bear her name, was actually discovered by J. J. Smith when Papua New Guinea was still a Dutch Colony. The new species of Dipodium is the well-described Dipodium pandanum. The only plant that offers a ray of hope is the very first Bulbophyllum that Tom found in the Baliem Valley. The only contender that might bear his grandmother's name, is the plant that Tom described as a "pile of cack!" In fact, Tom's grandmother's nickname is Crack. So why not? Bulbophyllum "Crack's cack." But even "Crack's cack" will not stand. Two days after this conversation, Jeff Wood from Kew Gardens called Tom to tell him that the plant is not new. It's called Bulbophyllum orbiculare. In the waters off the east coast of South Africa, 300 feet below the surface, divers search for a creature that existed before the time of the dinosaurs, a living fossil. Some call it the, "Ghost Fish, King of the Sea," others, "Monster of the Deep." For over half a century the search has persisted. Those who come in contact with it are changed forever. ...a creature that offers tantalizing clues to the evolution of all life on Earth, including us. A creature thought to have been extinct for over 50 million years. Ancient Creature of the Deep up next on NOVA. In Sodwana Bay, South Africa, a team of divers prepares to attempt a descent of several hundred feet into the Indian Ocean to search for a mysterious, ancient creature. Everything is planned down to the minute. For a quarter of an hour, they drift down through a world ever quieter, ever colder, ever darker. Then, at a depth of 300 feet, something catches their eye. A great primitive fish, a Coelacanth—its ancestors date back 400 million years, to a time when all earth's creatures lived under water, and the great transition to living on land was about to begin. Was the Coelacanth, with its fleshy, leg-like fins, the missing link in evolution from fish to land animals? Marjorie Courtenay-Latimer was then the 31-year old curator of a small natural history museum in East London, South Africa. She remembers well how her life was turned upside down by the mysterious Coelacanth. On December 22, 1938, a fishing trawler steamed into the East London harbor. On the deck was a pile of sea life dredged up after a freak storm. But these fish were not all meant for market. When putting together new exhibits at the museum, Marjorie often obtained samples from local fishermen. Marjorie had been an avid collector since childhood. She knew instinctively that this was an important find. Although she was able cart the fish back to the museum, this was 1938, and there was no easy way to refrigerate and preserve the specimen. She inquired at the local mortuary. In desperation, she sent off a note and a sketch to a professor at Rhodes University, 100 miles away in Grahamstown. Professor J.L.B. Smith was trained as a chemist, but his passion was ichthyology, the study of fish. His work in this field would soon change the face of science. Professor Smith's onetime secretary and archivist is Jean Pote. For J.L.B. Smith, it was more than rare; it was an impossibility. If that drawing were correct, this fish should have died out with the dinosaurs. Smith was confused and puzzled. He almost hoped he was wrong about the identification of this creature. But if he was right, the implications were staggering. Despite his initial excitement, he was unable to examine the fish in person for nearly two months, leaving Marjorie Courtenay-Latimer to deal with this strange creature alone. Marjorie was left with no choice. In order to save the fish for scientific study, she had it skinned and mounted. But without any preservatives, the internal organs had to be discarded. This was later described by Smith as one of the most terrible tragedies in science. "That first sight hit me like a white-hot blast," Smith later wrote. "It made me feel shaky and queer, my body tingled. I stood as if stricken to stone." Since J.L.B. Smith identified the strange fish, he was able to christen it. He named the genus "Latimeria," after the woman who had saved the fish for science, and the species, "chalumnae" after the river near where it was caught. John Maisey is a paleontologist at the American Museum of Natural History in New York. Coelacanths first appeared, along with the other major groups of fishes we know today, about 400 million years ago. Then the Earth was, more or less, one large landmass. Over time, this super-continent separated into what is now essentially the modern globe, leaving Coelacanth fossils on every continent except Antarctica. John McCosker is an evolutionary biologist at the California Academy of Sciences. But Marjorie's fish was all they had. And it was only skin and bones. The innards had been lost. Were the Coelacanth's internal organs like those of other fishes or more like those of amphibians, reptiles and mammals? This would become J.L.B. Smith's life's work, to find another Coelacanth, and this time an intact specimen. Mike Bruton works today as an ecologist, here in South Africa. He studied under J.L.B. Smith. Smith felt certain that if Coelacanths were native to the highly fished waters off East London, they would have been caught many times before. He reasoned that Marjorie's fish inhabited the deep, tropical reefs to the North and had been driven toward East London by currents running down through the Mozambique Channel. Smith's leaflets, in English, French and Portuguese, offered a hundred-pound reward, an enormous sum for a local fisherman. But he still faced tremendous odds against finding a second specimen. After all, the Coelacanth had proved amazingly adept at eluding discovery. As with the first specimen, caught by trawler fishermen, Smith was counting on those who made a living from the sea. And like Smith, biologist John McCosker knows where to ask when looking for a particular fish. The fishermen of the Comoros Islands would prove to be a godsend for J.L.B. Smith. The Comoros are a small group of volcanic islands, then controlled by the French, just north of Madagascar. Here, men have fished in the same way for over a thousand years, and were said, occasionally, to pull out of the water a fish they called "Gombessa." As a South African, Mike Bruton remembers the story of the second Coelacanth well. Major General Duncan Ralston was a lieutenant at the time and the senior navigator on the flight that took J.L.B. Smith to the Comoros. The fish smelled strongly of the formaldehyde Hunt had used to try to preserve it. And it was a bit the worse for wear, having been carted across the island by the fisherman who caught it. Nevertheless, after 14 years of searching, Smith finally had his Coelacanth. Malan was a creationist and the father of South African apartheid. Aiding Smith in his evolutionary research was dangerous politically, but South Africa's prestige was at stake, and Malan welcomed the publicity. In his lab, Smith began the first ever dissection of a Coelacanth, peering into a world never before accessible to science. What he discovered was that the Coelacanth is different in many ways from all other modern fish. Not only did it have strange, limb-like fins, it had no real backbone. Instead, Smith found a more primitive structure called a "notochord."  This kind of oil-filled skeletal structure is unique. Most adult vertebrates have well-developed backbones, especially those that live on land, including human beings. But it was the limb-like fins that really caught the attention of Smith and the world. They had their own internal skeleton, more like our limbs than the fins of a normal fish. Once again, the press trumpeted the Coelacanth as the missing link, a creature that bridged the gap between fish and primitive land animals. Through his research and his book, Smith's name became forever tied to the Coelacanth, like Marjorie Courtenay-Latimer's. But what of the Comoran fisherman who actually caught the fish? He is seen here getting his reward. His name is Ahmed Houssein. He says he got the reward, but other fishermen took credit for the catch. The French team found a series of contradictory features. In some ways, the Coelacanth looked very primitive, with organs and glands similar to those of sharks and rays, and a tiny heart, which is little more than an expansion in the main blood vessel. In other ways, the Coelacanth resembled tetrapods, those four-limbed creatures that include everything from the very first land-dwellers to human beings. So was the Coelacanth the closest living relative of tetrapods—the missing link? Some scientists said yes, others no, as they continued to explore this mysterious creature's anatomy. In the snout of the fish, a strange jelly-filled cavity was discovered. It initially puzzled researchers but is now thought to be an elaborate electro-receptive organ. These specialized features may help to explain why Coelacanths have survived for 400 million years. Their outward appearance has changed little, but internally, they must have adapted to changing environments as the Earth itself was transformed over time. Phil Heemstra has been studying Coelacanths for over two decades, and has been fascinated by the way they reproduce. The huge Coelacanth eggs, filled with nutrients to feed the growing embryo, were discovered by the French in 1955. They were at first thought to be released and fertilized on the ocean floor, until a freshly dissected specimen yielded a surprise. Although fossils had shown tiny coelacanths inside an adult, researchers couldn't tell if the adult was about to give birth, or had eaten the little ones. Now they knew
 coelacanths give birth to live young, and have done so for 200 million years. Well before mammals came along, the Coelacanth was using a mammal-like reproductive strategy, insuring that most of its young would survive. The man responsible for this chamber is Hans Fricke, a zoologist at the Max Planck Institute in Germany. He has been obsessed with the Coelacanth since childhood. Jago was custom made by its pilot, Jurgen Schauer. Jago was brought to the deep blue waters off the Comoros, where, along with biologist Karin Hissman, Fricke and Schauer could pursue the Coelacanth. Then, at 9 p.m. on the 17th of January, at a depth 600 feet, there it was—a Coelacanth. Schauer immediately radioed Fricke with the exciting news. As expected, Coelacanths were found to live in a fairly uninhabited ecosystem and seem to have no real predators. They aggregate during the day in volcanic caves, and at night have been known to migrate to depths of over 2,000 feet. The Coelacanth moves unlike any other fish of this size. Its oil-filled body allows it to maintain neutral buoyancy and float in any position. Six fins are almost constantly in motion like oars in the water
 upper and lower fins toward the rear of the creature, plus two pairs of limb-like fins, front and center. If the coelacanth swims like a land animal walks, does that, too, suggest it's our closest living relative among the fishes? To this day the evidence is inconclusive. Until recently, most researchers put Coelacanths nearest to tetrapods on an evolutionary tree. But now, a group known as lungfish is thought to be an even closer ancestor, based on new DNA evidence. They took a photograph but did not purchase the fish, thinking Indonesian Coelacanths were already well known to science. But they soon learned the uniqueness of their sighting
 no scientist had ever found a Coelacanth except near South Africa and the Comoros Islands. Then, ten months after the initial sighting, Mark and Arnaz had a visit. Like all of its predecessors, the creature soon found life at the surface impossible. But before the great fish died, the couple took it out to deeper water to get photographs in a more natural setting. When DNA samples of the Indonesian Coelacanth were sequenced, they suggested that this was a new species and dissuaded scientists from the idea that the Indonesian fish was a stray. In fact, from the DNA analysis, it seems that the two populations were separated many million of years ago. J.L.B. Smith didn't live to hear the story of the Indonesian Coelacanth. In 1968, after years of ill health and in constant pain, Smith took his own life. He was 70 years old. The final riddle
 the Coelacanth may never have stepped onto land, but if this living fossil was able to avoid extinction and detection for so many millions of years, what other strange and wonderful creatures may also be down there? For over half a century this creature has attracted the scrutiny of scientists worldwide, yet so many questions remained unanswered. Do Coelacanths live in all the world's oceans? How large are their populations? How long do they live? In the warm waters of San Diego, a team of marine biologists sets out on a routine dive. They're surveying the native eelgrass in this coastal lagoon. This is the alien, a seaweed called Caulerpa taxifolia. All seaweeds are algae, but this one is extraordinary. Caulerpa taxifolia is perhaps the largest single-celled organism in the world. One plant can grow nine feet long, and it spreads uncontrollably, turning lush marine landscapes like this into acres of green weed, an Astroturf®-like carpet and nothing more. Today, about 40,000 acres of Mediterranean coastline is clogged with Caulerpa, and many scientists believe this beautiful sea is lost. Is America next? What can be done to stop this Deep Sea Invasion? Up next on NOVA. This is Caulerpa taxifolia, a seaweed. And it's the most threatening underwater plant on earth. It can grow anywhere, at the astounding rate of one inch a day, pushing out everything in its path. Getting rid of it, if that's even possible, would require an all-out war, a biological battle between a weed and the scientists who understand the danger. Within days, the infested lagoon was cordoned off like a crime scene, banned from human use and guarded by the police. Everyone now realized what could happen if they didn't act fast. The impact of alien species has been underestimated before. Africanized bees have killed more than a thousand people from Brazil to the United States, and now they threaten the American honey industry. With no natural predators, European gypsy moths have destroyed oak forests from Maine to the mid-west. Where Meinesz had expected to find the usual variety of Mediterranean sea life, all he could see for hundreds of yards was a dense, bright green mat of weed he'd never seen before. Everything was smothered in it. As he studied the extraordinary new plant, he realized it was a giant variant of a tropical seaweed, or algae, called Caulerpa taxifolia. Yet how could a tropical plant survive in the colder waters of the Mediterranean? He decided to find out what was going on. Back in the laboratory, he compared Caulerpa taxifolia with other specimens of the same family from around the world. This new plant was bigger, tougher and more vigorous than any other specimen of Caulerpa, and it normally lived thousands of miles away in the tropics. It was growing so fast and dense that it was swamping the dark green native possidonia. There was something else, too. The coastal waters of the Mediterranean are normally home to some 600 species of animals and plants. Yet the seabed around the mysterious new algae was almost devoid of other marine life. It seemed like something out of science fiction. What was a gigantic tropical algae doing flourishing in the temperate waters of the Mediterranean? When he saw it, Boudouresque was also shocked by the invasion. He immediately agreed to investigate whether the algae was harming the Mediterranean animal life. The animal he chose as a test case was the sea urchin, which lives on plants and is easy to observe in the laboratory. He set up a simple experiment. Almost immediately the urchin began to put out little suckers, wave its spines and struggle to turn itself over. In less than a minute it had completed the maneuver. In another jar, Boudouresque had urchins fed exclusively on the new algae. The time they took to turn over crept up from two minutes, to five, to 20. Boudouresque suspected the urchins were finding the taxifolia inedible and were starving to death. After a month on an exclusive diet of taxifolia the turning-over time had reached 30 minutes. It soon became clear that some even preferred to die rather than eat the distasteful seaweed. The findings were very disturbing. If this new seaweed took over the Mediterranean, would other sea animals react in the same way? Would the whole food chain be disrupted? It was the concentration of the toxin in the plant that was so unusual. The toxin is called "caulerpenine," and the concentration was higher than in any other algae Pohnert had ever analyzed. Pohnert discovered that although the toxin was not lethal to humans or animals, it made Caulerpa almost totally inedible. And if nothing would eat it, there was nothing to stop its advance. If it took over, the Mediterranean's animal life would be forced to flee or starve to death.  Doumenge argued that algaes like taxifolia are constantly moved around the world by sea currents and frequently lie dormant in the water for years, until a temperature change brings them to life. Doumenge suggested Meinesz was worrying about nothing. The growth of the taxifolia was not a danger, merely a sign of the evolving character of the Mediterranean Sea. Doumenge passed on his thoughts to the French Ministry of the Environment, which breathed a sigh of relief. If the algae was not dangerous but part of a pattern of global change, there was not much the French government could be expected to do against such a natural occurrence. But not everyone was convinced. Over the next 18 months the algae spread, as Meinesz had feared it might. In 1990, there were sightings at Cap Martin, about two and a half miles east of Monaco, and at Toulon, almost 125 miles in the opposite direction. By late 1991, there were some dozen patches of the algae dotted along the French Riviera. Local newspapers picked up the story. There were alarming and lurid headlines
 "The Green Menace," "Ecological Crime," "Mutant Algae." The plant now acquired a new name
 "the killer algae." Almost immediately, Belsher found that Meinesz, if anything, had underestimated the size of the infestation and the rate it was growing. It was, as Meinesz had already observed, bigger, faster growing, and denser than any algae ever seen before. Belsher's maps revealed that the Mediterranean seabed was being transformed more quickly than at any time in recent history. Entire marine ecosystems were being affected by the Caulerpa infestations. Researchers found that fish populations around the invasive taxifolia beds were falling measurably. In some places, half the fish had disappeared. Fish, like urchins, appeared to find the taxifolia too toxic to eat. They tried freezing it to death with blocks of dried ice, but their efforts were no match for the scale of the problem. They even tried sucking it up with an underwater vacuum cleaner. The trials quickly showed that it would take an army of divers many years to make an impact on the algae. Meinesz went back to the lab. He suspected the key to understanding the plant's erratic spread was knowing how it reproduced. The sticky juice inside the taxifolia contains microscopic particles called gametes or reproductive cells. These are normally male and female and act like sperm and egg. Meinesz studied slides of the taxifolia looking for the red dot that identifies the female gamete. He couldn't find a single female gamete. There could be only one explanation. The taxifolia in the Mediterranean was spreading, not through sexual reproduction, but by a process known as vegetative reproduction. It's a form of cloning. It was an important breakthrough that finally made sense of the strange spread of the taxifolia.  But no one acted, and Meinesz could only watch in horror as the weed continued to spread. Around this time, a dramatic discovery in Switzerland would soon throw new light on the algae's origins and confirm Meinesz's fears that there was something very unnatural about this plant. He set about processing dozens of samples of taxifolia from all over the world, including the Red Sea and areas of the Pacific. Nothing matched. Each time, the DNA fingerprint was different from the Mediterranean strain. It was a mystery. Eventually there was only one strain left to try. It was a perfect match. But this was not a wild plant; it had been bred by humans. It was a sample of Caulerpa taxifolia taken from an aquarium tank. Jousson's discovery proved beyond a reasonable doubt that the taxifolia in the Mediterranean had not drifted in from the tropics. Monaco's argument that the appearance of taxifolia was part of a natural cycle of change in the sea did not hold up. It wasn't long before people also realized that if the findings were right, the most obvious source of the alien invasion was the Monaco Oceanographic Museum itself. But Doumenge was in the minority. Even Jacques Cousteau, when he later found out about the issue, told the French Minister of Environment that there might be cause for concern. The search for an answer lay in tracing the aquarium plant to its original source. The trail led from Monaco to an aquarium in Stuttgart, Germany. Here, during the 1970s, the staff made a curious discovery. At the time, people everywhere had been trying to find a plant that could be used to decorate tropical fish tanks. The world's leading aquariums imported wild specimens from the four corners of the globe, but nothing seemed to survive in the artificial environment of a tank. In other words, a collector in the 1970s, had, by accident, selected an unusually big and robust sample of the plant in the wild, and it was this exceptional plant which had been grown in the Stuttgart aquarium. But there was also a second possibility. Aquarium tanks use chemicals and lights to artificially recreate the natural balance of the sea. Could this manmade brew have caused the original wild strain to change or mutate into a more invasive plant than its wild cousin? To avoid the disaster overtaking the Mediterranean, the officials in California knew they had to act fast. Within days, they'd settled on a radical campaign of eradication. The chosen weapon was chlorine, which kills everything in its path. The chlorine, with an approximate strength of household bleach, acts almost immediately. Within hours, the taxifolia is dead. It's an extreme solution and expensive—more than a million dollars a year—but it seems to be working. In early 2003, no new growth of taxifolia was found. It's encouraging, but the lagoon will still have to be monitored for many years. The slug is unique in producing an enzyme that enables it to eat the plant and neutralize its toxin. It's like a vampire, sucking out the juice and leaving a dying husk. Meinesz would like to release thousands of these tropical slugs into the sea to attack the taxifolia beds. While they could never eradicate the existing Caulerpa, he believes they could slow down the spread. But it's not nearly as straightforward as it sounds. There are two problems. The French authorities are understandably wary of introducing yet another alien species into the Mediterranean and have so far refused to fund the research. Yet Meinesz is sure the slug has evolved such a specialized and exclusive dependence on Caulerpa, it won't attack anything else. The other problem is that this little slug from Florida can't survive in the deeper, colder, Mediterranean waters. Meinesz is now calling on the world's scientists to find a related slug that can tolerate the lower temperatures and munch the taxifolia problem away. In the meantime, no temperate ocean is safe, as Australian Broadcast News reports a new infestation. It was actually Australia's second Caulerpa attack. But this one was much bigger than California's and harder to handle. The government quickly started testing methods to control it. Huge quantities of salt would kill the weed, but the infestation was so large, they worried there wasn't enough salt in all of Australia to work. As World War II comes to an end, scientists discover the secret of the atom, unleashing death and destruction on an unimaginable scale. Now they are racing to discover the secret of life. In 1962, a Nobel Prize is awarded to James Watson, Francis Crick and Maurice Wilkins for their groundbreaking work on DNA. It is one of the greatest achievements in the history of science, often described as the key to unlocking the secret of life. Watson's casting of Franklin as villain works as a literary device, but who she is in his book and who she was in real life are quite different. And unfortunately, Franklin wasn't around to defend herself. She died at the age of 37, a decade before The Double Helix was published and became a best seller. As Francis Crick wrote to Watson, "Your book is misleading and in bad taste. It does not illuminate the process of scientific discovery, it distorts it." Who was the real Rosalind Franklin? And what is her contribution to one of the greatest breakthroughs in science? From an early age, Rosalind stands out. She enjoys memory games, and an aunt writes, "Rosalind is alarmingly clever. She spends all her time doing arithmetic for pleasure, and invariably gets her sums right." While Rosalind excels academically, the outside world is encroaching. The Nazis are on the march. As Jewish refugees flee the Nazi onslaught, the Franklins are active in finding safe haven in England for those who manage to escape. This technique can reveal the hidden atomic structure of matter in its crystalline form. Atoms are too small to see under light microscopes, so crystallographers shoot invisible X-rays at them, which then bounce off, or diffract, onto a detector, such as film.  In 1939, as Franklin steps into the world of science, Cambridge University appoints its first female professor, and Britain prepares for the German invasion. She joined the war effort doing research on coal. Her experiments led to a better gas mask, a valuable contribution to England under attack. She published five landmark papers, still cited today, and she was awarded her Ph.D. She took a flat on a little street behind the Church of St. Sulpice in the 6th arrondissement. She wore the latest in Paris fashion, Dior's "New Look" for the new woman. She shopped in the fresh air markets and took great pleasure cooking for her friends. Franklin was gaining an international reputation, speaking at conferences and publishing in professional journals. An avid hiker, she took trips with colleagues to Norway, Wales and the Alps.  Franklin is offered a position at King's College in London, a highly prestigious research center. She is hired by J. T. Randall, the director of the biophysics labs, to create an X-ray diffraction unit to investigate the structure of proteins. She accepts the offer, but writes to a friend, "To change the banks of the Seine for a cellar on the Strand seems to me quite insane." In 1943, after a decade of work, Oswald Avery and his team at Rockefeller University transferred DNA from a disease-causing strain of bacteria into a harmless strain. The harmless strain turned virulent, strongly suggesting a link between DNA and heredity. DNA was thought to consist of sugar and phosphates in long chains of some unknown shape. It also appeared to have just four other chemical ingredients, called bases. But how could such a simple molecule be responsible for the diversity of all life on Earth? Some believed that discovering the structure of DNA would lead to an answer. That was Franklin's assignment when she arrived at King's College London, in January, 1951. Despite the war-ravaged facilities, King's College was the place to be for DNA research. Maurice Wilkins, a physicist fresh from the Manhattan Project, took some of the first X-ray diffraction images of DNA here. He had to improvise at every step to cope with the lab's antiquated technology. Franklin quickly adjusted to the physical limitations of the lab, but not to the segregated boys' club culture of King's College. To make matters worse, there was confusion over who was in charge, Franklin or Maurice Wilkins. At the time of her arrival, Wilkins was on holiday. While he was gone, his Ph.D. student, Raymond Gosling, was put under Franklin's supervision.  The stressful relationship between Wilkins and Franklin arose from a miscommunication that originated with the director of the lab, J. T. Randall. Sir Aaron Klug, Nobel Prize winner and former president of the Royal Society, was Franklin's last collaborator. After her death, he studied her notebooks and letters, including the one from Randall. The situation was inflamed by a basic personality clash. Franklin—articulate, passionate and always up for a good debate—and Wilkins—soft-spoken, deliberate and shy—just couldn't get along. Yet another barrier was social class and a private life entirely separate from the lab. Despite all the tensions of the lab, Franklin applied herself to the task with single-minded determination, setting her sights on solving the structure of DNA. But now a new player was about to enter the game. Watson goes to a conference in Naples where Wilkins shows one of his early, fuzzy diffraction images of DNA. Watson tries to meet Wilkins and wrangle an invitation to work at King's College. Wilkins does not take the bait. But shortly after, Watson is invited to the Cavendish, a famous research lab at Cambridge University, headed by Nobel Laureate, Sir Lawrence Bragg. There, Watson is assigned an office with another physicist turned crystallographer, Francis Crick, an old friend of Wilkins'. Crick and Watson immediately click. Despite the hostile environment, within months of her arrival at King's, Franklin is producing amazing results. Franklin's discovery that there are two forms of DNA is perhaps the most crucial step toward the ultimate discovery of its structure. The A is a drier, more crystalline form of DNA and produces more detailed images. The B is wetter and how DNA occurs in living cells. It produces a simpler image, but reveals a key clue to solving the structure of DNA. The X shape in the middle is the diffraction signature of a helix. In the audience that day is James Watson, sent by Crick to gather intelligence on Franklin's labors. Crick and Watson are planning to use a different approach to solving the structure of DNA
 model-building. The model of DNA touted by Watson and Crick is an embarrassing failure. Lawrence Bragg, the head of the Cavendish Lab, is humiliated and forbids Watson and Crick to continue their model-making. To Franklin, the incident is an affirmation of her training
 that experimentation and patient analysis of the data will reveal the answer. But what Franklin may not know, is that her unpublished findings will continue to make their way to Watson and Crick. And they are getting there through the deputy director of her own lab, Maurice Wilkins. But while Crick and Watson speculate, Franklin continues to analyze and collect new information. In May, 1952, she sets up the X-ray diffractometer to take an image of the wetter form of DNA, the B. Now, scientists use DNA crystals, which give better results than these microscopic fibers. Twenty of them bundled together are about the thickness of a human hair.  In May, 1952, Franklin's perseverance and exacting techniques pay off, producing the sharpest image yet of the B form of DNA. She labels it "Photo 51" and puts it aside while she continues her work on the A form. But around this time, Franklin will acquire another nickname
 The Dark Lady. She is so unhappy at King's, she arranges to leave. She agrees to finish analyzing her data, write up her findings and stay until the end of the year. In the midst of this transition, someone gives Photo 51 to Wilkins. Meanwhile, at the Cavendish, a new researcher moves into the lab with Watson and Crick
 Peter Pauling, the son of the renowned guru of chemistry from Caltech, Linus Pauling.  The answer was no. Pauling makes some of the same mistakes that Watson and Crick had made on their first model, a three-stranded helix with the bases on the outside. But Pauling's mistake will be discovered as soon as he publishes. Watson then reports that he runs into Maurice Wilkins. Wilkins shows Watson Photo 51. "My mouth fell open and my pulse began to race," Watson says in The Double Helix. It is the clear X pattern, the signature of a helix, that ignites his excitement. But there's more. The number of lines in the photo shows that each twist of the helix has 10 units, or molecular building blocks. And the dimensions of the image correspond to a helix of 34 angstroms per turn. Wilkins gives this crucial information to Watson. On the train back to Cambridge, Watson sketches Photo 51 on his newspaper and reports to Crick. Based on Franklin's data, Crick and Watson go to Lawrence Bragg, the head of the Cavendish lab, and he gives them permission, once again, to build a model. They begin on February 4, 1953. In the MRC report, Franklin places DNA in a class of molecules with a certain type of symmetry, as these simple drawings in her notebook illustrate. The implications of that symmetry would be obvious to an expert like Francis Crick. Two strands, each with the sugars and phosphates running in different directions
 an anti-parallel double helix. But where do the bases go? On the outside, as Watson and Crick depicted in their first model, or the inside, as Franklin had told them?  Now that they have discovered the secret of life, they have another problem to solve. How are they going to prove it? Once again, they need Franklin. She travels to Cambridge to review the model. According to Brenda Maddox, Bragg, of the Cavendish, and Randall, of King's, approach the editors of Nature to engineer a solution. They agree to publish three articles within a single issue
 Watson and Crick's article first, Wilkins and his collaborator next, and last is Franklin and Gosling's article. Its position at the end suggests Franklin's findings merely confirm Watson and Crick's model instead of providing the essential data used to formulate it.  Sir John Maddox, later editor of Nature for two decades, shows how Franklin's contribution was obscured by Watson and Crick with a single guarded sentence. Franklin had written her own article a month before she saw the model. Inserted by hand into the original text is the sentence, "Thus our general ideas are consistent with the model proposed by Crick and Watson." Indeed, her ideas were consistent with their model, because they largely based their model on her ideas. In fact, Rosalind Franklin could be said to be Watson and Crick's unknowing, and unrecognized, collaborator. By the time the articles appeared in Nature, on April 25, 1953, Franklin had taken her new position at Birkbeck College in London. Franklin's virus work secured her international reputation and brought many invitations to speak in the United States. In 1956, she celebrated her 36th birthday while visiting universities in California, and climbed Mt. Whitney, one of the highest peaks in North America. But near the end of her trip, Franklin was suffering from severe abdominal pains. On her return to England she was diagnosed with cancer. There is speculation that her work with X-rays may have triggered the disease. Don Caspar, an American colleague, recalls her struggle to climb from the basement lab to her fifth floor office upstairs.  Her epitaph reads "Scientist
 her research and discoveries on viruses remain of lasting benefit to mankind." She died April 16, 1958. That same day, the London Times carried an article acclaiming her virus model, which was unveiled at the Brussels World Fair. In 1968, James Watson published The Double Helix, his personal account of the discovery of the structure of DNA. In his book, Watson casts Franklin as uncooperative, unattractive and "incompetent in interpreting X-ray pictures." And yet, Watson admits he needs her findings. He even boasts of using her work without her knowledge or permission, saying, "Rosy, of course, did not directly give us her data. For that matter, no one at King's realized they were in our hands." Franklin's family and colleagues protested Watson's portrayal of, as one put it, "that gifted girl who could not defend herself." Watson declined NOVA's request for an interview. Those who admire Franklin take solace in her uncompromising dedication. For Rosalind Franklin, the joy of science was in the work itself and its ultimate reward, the betterment of humankind. April 20th, 1918
 In the skies over northern France, Allied and German fighter aircraft are locked in a ferocious dogfight. One of the contenders in this aerial battle is the legendary German ace, Manfred von Richthofen
 the Red Baron. His distinctive red Fokker triplane is in hot pursuit over the Somme Valley; in its sights are two British Sopwith Camel fighters. First one, and then the second are swiftly eliminated by the deadly marksman. They are the 79th and 80th kills of the Red Baron's career. In 1917, the U.S. entered World War I, and the first American troops landed in France. Eventually, American arms would turn the tide against Germany, but in the spring of 1918, the Germans launch one final offensive to break the stalemate of the trench war. A feeding frenzy of souvenir hunters scavenged the red triplane as rumors flew that von Richthofen was dead. It was a huge propaganda coup for the Allies. But who shot down the legendary Red Baron? For his daring attack on von Richthofen's tail, Captain Roy Brown was officially credited by the Board of Inquiry with the famous kill. The Canadian airman became celebrated as the pilot who shot down the Red Baron, but there were dissenting voices. Several Australian gunners claimed to have brought down the triplane when they fired on it from the Morlancourt Ridge overlooking the river Somme. The crucial question that has perplexed investigators is whether Captain Brown, attacking from above and behind, could have fired the fatal shot. And if Brown were not responsible, which of the many Allied soldiers on the ground was in a position to have killed the legendary Red Baron? His destiny seemed clear. He would join the Imperial German Army, where his athleticism and horsemanship would lead him into the cavalry. But in only the second month of the war, air reconnaissance revealed the hidden direction of the German advance on Paris. The early air forces had proved their worth. Yet these aircraft were still fragile, underpowered and unarmed. Pilots and observers took to the skies brandishing rifles and service revolvers. The aerial arms race was about to begin. Stranded in the cavalry, von Richthofen envied the exploits of the new knights of the air, the young men who took to the skies to gather vital information for the ground forces below. Von Richthofen transferred to the German Air Service and in May, 1915, traveled to Cologne to join an observer flight-training program.  It was an unpromising debut. But von Richthofen would soon get the chance to show his true talents, his hunter's instinct and deadly marksmanship. The breakthrough came with a dashing young French aviator named Roland Garros, already famous for winning a string of air races in the pioneer days before the war. Now he had become a test pilot for Raymond Saulnier, a leading aircraft designer. In February 1915, Garros intercepted a German reconnaissance aircraft. Within seconds he sent it burning to the ground. The kill was followed by at least two more victories.  But his success was brief. Soon after, his engine failed behind enemy lines and Garros was captured. Meanwhile, a brilliant young Dutch designer working for the Germans, Anthony Fokker, came up with an improved solution to the firing problem. Capturing Garros aroused German interest in Fokker's work. By the autumn of 1915, the German Air Service had the upper hand. With their synchronized front-firing gun, the Fokker monoplanes or "Eindekkers" were arriving at the front with their ambitious young pilots. Among them were Max Immelmann and Oswald Boelcke.  The young German aces were admired and envied by Manfred von Richthofen, who was still stuck as a gunner in twin-engine bombers. He wanted to become an aerial fighter like Oswald Boelcke.  Von Richthofen saw his destiny. While von Richthofen learned to fly, Boelcke and Immelmann were preying on Allied reconnaissance planes and inventing the first fighter tactics. Slow two-seater spotter planes like the British BE2C were particularly vulnerable. To counter the threat, Brigadier General Hugh Trenchard responded with a new tactic. He ordered that all Allied reconnaissance planes had to be supported by at least three other armed aircraft. Greater safety in numbers gave the Allies a better chance. But more aircraft in the skies meant an escalation of aerial combat, or dogfighting.  As the Great War entered the spring of its third year, both sides launched major offensives to break the stalemate between the trenches.  Into this arena stepped Manfred von Richthofen. Now qualified as a pilot, he cut his teeth flying support sorties, first in a two-seater, then in an Eindekker fighter. But, as the carnage of Verdun and the Somme dragged on below, Allied pilots began flying new, speedy biplane fighters armed with synchronized machine guns. The seesaw of technological advantage now swung back to the Allies. Boelcke hand-picked his flyers. One was the young man he'd inspired to become a fighter pilot, Manfred von Richthofen. Boelcke drilled his new protégés with his tactical principles. His Jasta 2 squadron quickly notched up victory after victory.  Toward the end of 1916, the new Jastas were gaining the initiative. With the arrival of the fast Albatros fighters in September, German air supremacy was regained. Hawker, the daring British ace, was buried beside the wreckage of his airplane. He was von Richthofen's eleventh kill. On January 10th, 1917, Manfred von Richthofen was appointed leader of his own squadron, Jasta 11. Fast gaining a fearsome reputation, the new commander painted his Albatros bright red. The legend of the Red Baron was born.  Throughout the spring of 1917, the German Jastas wreaked havoc. On the ground, the Allies launched an attack on the stronghold of Vimy Ridge that cost both sides a total of some 30,000 casualties. In Bloody April, Allied losses in the skies outnumbered the Germans' by four to one. Von Richthofen's personal tally was now 52 kills. He was the leading ace of the war.  In the wake of their severe losses, the British began delivering new aircraft to the front
 the SE5A, a fast and powerful climber; the Sopwith Camel, one of the most maneuverable fighters ever; and the Bristol, a versatile two-seater that could hold its own as a fighter. The pendulum of war began to swing back to the Allies.  The Germans couldn't replace aircraft as quickly as their opponents could, so they tried a new tactic. They combined Jasta squadrons into larger units that could be moved around to key pressure points on the front line. These mobile fighter wings, the famed "flying circuses," proved highly effective. The first one was led by von Richthofen. Despite the great success of the "flying circus," von Richthofen was no longer so sure of his own invincibility. In a skirmish with British two-seaters, the Baron suffered a severe head wound that nearly cost him his life. But in the remaining months of his life, the Baron acquired a vital new combat advantage. Anthony Fokker, the designer, had been working on a revolutionary new fighter aircraft, the Dr 1 triplane. In August 1917, he delivered it, personally, to von Richthofen. The Dr 1's triple wing gave it the ability to climb rapidly and turn on a dime. In von Richthofen's skillful hands, it was a lethal machine. As the war entered its fourth year, the aerial arms race reached a climax. Such deadly aerial warfare was unimaginable back in 1905, when the Wright brothers' offer to develop a military aircraft had been rejected. The United States had fewer than 300 unarmed airplanes when President Wilson declared war on Germany in April 1917.  As fighting erupts, May stays above the combat as instructed. But when he sees a triplane tantalizingly close, adrenaline takes hold and he decides to attack. The pilot is Wolfram von Richthofen. Von Richthofen fires again, but at least one of his guns jams, and May is reprieved.  Manfred von Richthofen, the greatest ace of World War I, was dead, shot through the chest by a single bullet. Von Richthofen's uncharacteristic errors have perplexed scholars, but above all, controversy continues over who brought him down. The RAF officially credited the kill to Captain Roy Brown of 209 Squadron. But was it, in fact, a bullet from Brown that struck the Baron? Von Richthofen's body was taken to an RAF base at Poulainville where several medical examinations were carried out. They showed that he had been mortally wounded by a single .303 bullet that entered several inches below the right armpit and passed up through the chest, emerging just below the left nipple. Both Allied aircraft and ground gunners used the same .303 ammunition. Although mortally wounded, had von Richthofen somehow managed to wrestle his aircraft safely to the ground? Eighty years after the event, an important new piece of evidence surfaced in a letter from the son of an Allied soldier who claimed to be the first to reach the crashed triplane.  If von Richthofen was still alive on the ground, the shooter must have fired at him no more than 20 seconds or so before he landed. Was Captain Brown at the right spot and at the right angle to have fired the fatal shot?  Darbyshire's statement was a vital clue. After the war, Captain Roy Brown chose not to make further statements about his attack on the Red Baron. When contacted in the 1930s, Roy Brown continued to refuse to answer any direct questions. Captain Brown probably fired on von Richthofen from behind and above left. But as the medical reports showed, the Baron was hit by an upward-traveling shot to the right side. After more than eighty years, most of the evidence fails to support Brown's claim. So who did fire the fatal shot?  A low-damage, low-velocity hit would indicate a long range shot. Moreover, one of the medical orderlies actually found the .303 bullet that had killed the Baron.  Australian Gunners Buie and Evans were in range and could have hit von Richthofen, as they claimed, some 20 or 30 seconds before he is known to have died. But, by their own testimony, they were firing face on to the triplane so they could not have hit von Richthofen on the right hand side. Perched on the slope was the Australian gunnery sergeant, Cedric Popkin. He had followed the fight and now swung his Vickers gun through 180 degrees in case the red triplane re-appeared. He was in luck. Though he was their greatest foe, the Allies buried Manfred von Richthofen alongside their own dead on April 22, 1918, with full military honors.  With the new evidence about von Richthofen's death, we may be closer to the truth, but eyewitness testimony always leaves room for doubt. The circumstances surrounding the Baron's death will continue to be shrouded in mystery.   In death, Manfred von Richthofen became an icon of a period that saw the dawn of aerial combat and modern warfare. His legend grew, not merely because of his 80 victories, a score which would not be beaten until World War II, but because his dashing career recalls a brief era of innovation and heroism, although it came at unthinkable cost to human life. In four short years, aerial combat had evolved from an amateurish sport to a deadly efficient killing operation. But now the evidence of von Richthofen's death suggests a final irony. If he indeed was killed in action by an old fashioned gun from the ground, the Red Baron may never have lost a dogfight. Kilimanjaro
 the name in Swahili means "shining mountain." At almost 20,000 feet, it rises above the clouds. Kilimanjaro is the highest free-standing mountain and one of the tallest volcanoes in the world. It supports a surprising variety of environments from lush tropical rainforests to frigid polar-like glaciers. But in recent years, the glaciers which surround the summit have been shrinking; in the last century, 80 percent of them have disappeared. An island in the sky, the highest mountain in Africa, Kilimanjaro. Forty miles wide, covering an area 50 times the size of Manhattan, its massive flanks create their own microclimate. The water which flows off Kilimanjaro is vital to the mountain's varied plant life. And the isolation of its forests has allowed for many species to evolve. It's a paradise, especially for those who want to study its unusual environments. Robin has also spent his life overcoming a personal tragedy. At the age of two, when Robin and his family were living here, he contracted polio, leaving him permanently disabled. The same infection killed his father. Robin has always wanted to climb this mountain. It will be a supreme test of his abilities, but he feels an urgency to do it now. For Michael, as for Robin, this will be an adventure. Michael will be one of the few Tanzanians to try to go up Kilimanjaro. The mountaineering equipment is too expensive, so most of the people who live around the mountain have never climbed it, except for those hired to support foreign expeditions. But these Tanzanians view the mountain as an essential part of their local culture because it provides them with fertile soil for their crops. The local Tanzanians have developed what they call the tree-farming system, where huge trees provide shade for the crops growing below. It's the water flowing off Kilimanjaro that is so vital to the health of the mountain and to the Tanzanians who live around it. The question Robin and Michael need to answer is whether the shrinking glaciers will also dry up Kilimanjaro's vital water supply. The answer is not a simple one. While the melting glaciers supply some of the water, there is also rainfall generated in the extensive forests on the slopes of Kilimanjaro. The mountain has evolved numerous ways to trap the water. As Robin and Michael walk up, seemingly every surface has mosses, ferns and other plants growing so that moisture can be retained. The whole cloud forest acts as a gigantic sponge, making it a naturalist's paradise. As Robin and Michael get higher and higher up in the cloud forest, they begin to see some of the plants that have made Kilimanjaro so famous. Because the mountain is so isolated, it has evolved many of its own species, indeed it's said that there are more species unique to Kilimanjaro than there are to some entire countries. Joining Robin and Michael is German geologist Volker Lorenz, a world expert on volcanoes. Another geologist, Kevin Dougherty, already knows the mountain well and is the team's leader. They must carry all the normal supplies plus the extra film equipment. That means a total of fifty porters will be needed for the early stages of the climb. It's going to be a tough trip for everyone. The Tanzanians all come from the lowland area around the mountain, so they are not acclimatized to high altitude living. Finally, after many hours of packing, the expedition begins. After two days of climbing, the team is above the trees and are now at the same elevation as the clouds. They've reached a region of heathers that grow in this dry soil and, like many other plants on Kilimanjaro, can reach unusual heights. Volker and Kevin are trying to determine precisely how the craters collapsed, because this may forecast what happens to Kilimanjaro in the future. Until recently, scientists assumed that the roof of the craters had simply caved in. Volker is concerned that Kilimanjaro may do what St. Helens did in 1980, not erupt, but suffer a landslide, ripping open the side of the mountain and releasing a pyroclastic flow that devastated a huge area around it. The forests for seven miles around St. Helens were completely wiped out. Robin is lagging behind the others. The strain of crossing the great volcanic crater of Shira is beginning to show. It's taking him twice as long as the rest of the party to get from camp to camp, even though he is pushing himself as hard as he can. But he has climbed mountains of a similar height before, and he is determined to climb this one. The team has a problem. They are trying to get up to the Western Breach, the dip in the side of the mountain caused by a landslide, but much more snow has fallen than is normal for this time of year. Kilimanjaro is famous for the mist and bad weather that can descend on the mountain. Together with the cold and the altitude, it can make conditions hard for any expedition. After a while, it becomes too difficult for Robin, and the porters suggest that they take turns carrying him.  Robin and Michael find themselves descending into a sheltered dip beside the mountain. Here, there is a valley full of giant senecio, a plant that usually grows to only a few feet, but, here, towers above them. All the plants in the Barranco Valley have been forced to adapt to the tough mountain environment. These lobelia have evolved a unique survival strategy
 they store a type of sugar which prevents the plant from freezing each night and losing moisture during the warmer days. Meanwhile the team is still concerned that there might be too much snow on the mountain. Kevin decides to send an advance party to see if the route is passable. Kilimanjaro's notoriously turbulent weather system can close in on a climbing expedition with frightening speed. Kevin's principal worry is whether Robin will be able to make it. When the advance party returns, they report the route to the summit is just passable, although very difficult because of the heavy snow. Each individual team member must now decide whether they should go up or down. Michael will now try to answer some of the questions that Robin was most concerned about, particularly whether the disappearing glaciers on the top of the mountain are important sources of water. At 18,000 feet, walking up the rock-face of the Western Breach is a phenomenal physical challenge. With little oxygen in the air, every step becomes a real effort. The team is worried that if they don't get up the Western Breach fast enough the strong sun will melt the recently fallen snow and release rock falls. After an exhausting twelve hour climb, they finally emerge on the plateau just below the summit. This is where the great glaciers surround the volcanic crater of Kilimanjaro. All the indicators show that the volcano may have erupted within the last several hundred years, meaning it can still be regarded as potentially active. To determine just how active Kilimanjaro might become, they need to descend into the bowl at its center. By taking the temperature of these fumaroles, they can estimate where the magma lies below the crater surface. The fact that there are such high temperatures and sulphur deposits on the inner ring of the crater indicates that there is active magma close to the surface. Volker estimates just 400 feet below. Just like the side of the mountain, the crater walls here are very steep and potentially unstable, making a landslide a serious possibility. It could also expose the molten rock at the center of the volcano.  It's the rising warm air given off by the volcano that sculpts the glaciers into such fanciful shapes. And it's atmospheric radiation that causes most of the water from the glaciers to evaporate. Early the next morning, the team sets off to reach the actual summit, still almost a thousand feet above the crater plateau. This will be their last climb through the snow. When Hans Meyer first climbed the peak, he named it "Kaiser Wilhelm Spitze" after the German emperor. But after Tanzania achieved its independence in 1961, it was renamed "Uhuru Peak," as a symbol of African liberation. The word uhuru, in Swahili, means simply "freedom."  Robin's decision, though a personal setback, contributed to the safety and success of the expedition. For the team, six days of strenuous walking had put them into position on the barren plateau just below the summit. From there, some climbed another 12 hours to reach almost 20,000 feet. On the island of Madagascar, 500 miles off the coast of Africa, there lies a strange and mysterious place. It is filled with bizarre landscapes and creatures that exist nowhere else on Earth. Shut off by battlements of razor-sharp cliffs, this is a true lost world. For 2,000 years, the forbidding cliffs of Ankarana have kept the human world at bay. But it's not just the dizzying heights of these thousand-foot limestone walls that discourage intruders. These rocks are lethal. Over the eons, rain has turned the mountain into a million knives of stone, pointing to the sky. This is no place for climbers, at least not human ones. Following an underground stream, the two come upon some signs that the bats might have company—some very large company. First, some footprints. Next, an imprint in the mud looks like a big reptilian belly. Then, half a mile into the underground passageway—a face to face encounter. Around the globe, crocodiles, and their cousins the alligators, are known as dedicated sun-worshippers. Being cold-blooded, crocs need the heat to maintain their body temperature. If they aren't warm enough, they can't hunt, and eventually, they will die. It's not hard to share Olivier's awe. Crocodiles are the last surviving vestige of an ancient and powerful group of animals, the ruling reptiles. The first crocodilians date back 200 million years to the age of dinosaurs. And some of the early crocs were huge—35-foot monsters that ate dinosaurs for breakfast. No one knows exactly how crocodiles were able to survive when all the other large reptiles went extinct. In fact, at one sacred lake, people go out of their way to make the crocodiles happy. According to an Ankarana legend, once upon a time, a sorcerer became angry with the local tribe. As punishment, he turned them into crocodiles. A lemur is no match for a motivated foosa. Trying to escape, the queen heads for the highest and smallest branches, which should be too weak for the heavier foosa. From there, the only way out is to jump. Luke spent months trying to trap and study foosa in other forests of Madagascar. But in Ankarana, he's caught three foosa in just a week. This foosa looks healthy and well-fed. It's lucky to be living in Ankarana because elsewhere in Madagascar, its habitat is being destroyed at a disturbing rate. A few miles away from Luke's camp, Olivier Behra is gathering evidence about another fearsome predator, Ankarana's strange crocodile. Some of his best sources are the local fishermen. This fisherman, called Kaffu, lives near the river where Olivier spotted the big crocodiles. As Kaffu says, he hasn't been catching any crocodiles, but he has noticed where some are building their nests.  Without this kind of inside information, it might have taken Olivier weeks to track down a nesting site. So the temperature is okay. But what is there to eat? Even if there's not a lot of big game, it turns out that an adult crocodile can live for months on one good meal. Welcome to the future. PBS Digital When you're spending a million dollars on a 30-second commercial, you want your leading man to have just the right look. But what if the script says your leading man is a dog? Is this the right look? Or is it this? Or this? Fact is, dogs come in more shapes and sizes than any other mammal on the planet, and there's no shortage of opinions about what's sexy in a dog. Not bad for a dog who was abandoned and brought to the Las Vegas pound. That's where his trainers found him five years ago. Tonight, NOVA tells the true story of dogs. How did a fierce wolf become a playful puppy? Why do they come in so many shapes and sizes? And what does the future hold for our oldest and closest animal companion? Dogs and More Dogs, right now on NOVA. In many ways, the Levines are a typical American family, always on the run. Perhaps life would be better, some of them believe, if only they had... Little creatures can help a geneticist like Mike Levine explore life's mysteries, but he's never been able to understand the passion that people have for their big, messy, demanding canine companions.  Which is why Mike recently found himself checking out potential new family members. And while he doesn't fall in love, he is unexpectedly intrigued. The Levines come home with a little mixed breed dog named Taxi. Fulfilling every one of Mike's expectations, Taxi's first day includes throwing up in the living room, peeing in the kitchen, and shedding hair everywhere. All of which, the boys and Lily get over quickly. It's not so easy for Mike. He's trying hard, but a month into this grand experiment, Taxi remains for him less a beloved companion than an example of a fascinating evolutionary mystery. Wolves are one of nature's elite predators. They hunt with a rare mix of endurance, speed, ferocity and teamwork. Yet these skilled killers were the first animal to be domesticated. The mystery is
 how? Some say humans made it happen. If so, it's a good bet it wasn't by taming adult wolves. But a baby wolf, that's another matter. They're pretty irresistible. Perhaps our ancient ancestors did the same
 finding a wolf pup, falling in love with it, and bringing it home to raise as a pet, essentially adopting it. And perhaps they keep at it, even though the majority of pups grow into unpredictable and dangerous adults or simply run away.  If so, early humans might have ended up with a wolf like this. Her name's Maya, and she lives at Wolf Park, a research facility and tourist attraction in Indiana. Here, staff biologists have turned raising tame wolves into a science. Their process begins with a midday raid on a den filled with 10-day-old pups. They've found that the first step in raising tame wolves is to take them from their mothers at a very early age. For the next four months, these puppies are with people 24 hours a day, 7 days a week. It's tricky
 do the wrong thing and you can wind up with a grown wolf that's unpredictable and dangerous. All this care produces wolves that aren't threatened by human smells and sounds. Even so, everyone at Wolf Park moves carefully when they're with the wolves. Sudden and unexpected gestures can provoke a serious bite. These animals are only superficially tame; they certainly aren't dogs.  For Ray Coppinger and other dog experts who reject the adoption hypothesis, the challenge has been to find an alternative. How else might the journey from wolf to sled dog—and all the other diverse forms dogs take—have begun? Not every animal can take advantage of this resource. Most wild animals run away when humans approach. The few that don't, have a real advantage. They're going to get most of the food, and that means their offspring are more likely to survive. Each new generation becomes increasingly tame. That's how natural selection works. It's a classic, if somewhat unexpected, example of survival of the fittest. It's also, according to Coppinger, the best way to explain many of the physical differences between dogs and wolves. Was it the lure of our leftovers that ushered in the era of animal domestication, or was it a matter of puppy love? Either way, what's critical is that tamer than average individuals somehow gain an advantage and become more likely to breed. Traits like coat color, or the way a dog carries its ears or tail, are determined by its genes. Genes are pieces of DNA, and they often come in subtly different versions. Every dog gets one copy of every gene from mom and one from dad. These genes can be mixed and matched in countless ways, but if the parents don't have it, the pup can't get it. What does tameness have to do with ears, and barking and coat color? Belyaev and his colleagues immediately went looking for an explanation. They checked the foxes' adrenaline levels—that's the hormone that controls the "fight or flight" response—and they found they were far lower than normal.  Suddenly, it all started to make sense. As Belyaev bred his foxes for tameness, over the generations their bodies began producing different levels of a whole range of hormones. These hormones, in turn, set off a cascade of changes that somehow triggered a surprising degree of genetic variation. Most dog biologists now believe something very similar to what happened to these foxes also happened to a population of wolves more than 10,000 years ago. And the rest, as they say, is history
 the world's first domestic animal. Low-ranking wolves are adept at sucking up to their more powerful pack mates. Dogs use many of those same skills with people. This intimate bond between humans and dogs goes back a long way—according to one controversial theory, a very long way.  Even a tiny slice of six thousand-year old dog tooth contains DNA, and DNA is a window into the ancient origins of the dog. To geneticists, these changes are the ticking of a crude kind of clock. Leonard's tests and earlier experiments show that clock has been ticking for dogs for a long, long time. This theory suggests that dogs started accumulating these mutations 100,000 years ago, back when Neanderthals and Homo sapiens were still duking it out for survival. Today, Salukis are an unusual breed, just as they were thousands of years ago in Egypt when these creatures were the play toys of Pharaoh's court. The Saluki is an engineering marvel. Its long legs mean it can cover almost 10 feet in a single stride. Its tiny waist allows it to tuck those legs way up when running—twice in every stride all four feet are off the ground. Human intervention in animal breeding is so common today, it's widely assumed we've been doing it forever. But 6,000 years ago, no one knew about oxygen uptake and cooling the blood, which is why most biologists scoff at the idea that this sophisticated running machine was intentionally bred. It's the glory of evolution run fast-forward. Humans set the conditions for success, reward those animals in each generation that do the job best, and nature does the rest. That same basic process produced big, aggressive guardian and war dogs, and small, quick vermin hunters like the early ancestors of these ratters. According to Levine, subtle changes in this software could produce remarkable diversity and do it without changing the DNA that makes a dog a dog. All these dogs could have the same genes for leg growth, the only difference may be in when those genes are turned on and off. The frustration for geneticists like Mike Levine is that, so far, they haven't been able to crack the code of the regulatory DNA. Even without being able to read the regulatory DNA, scientists are convinced of its importance in determining an animal's physical shape. But what about inherited behaviors, like the unquenchable desire some dogs have to retrieve? Could they, too, be influenced by when genes are turned on and off? At that point, a signal from the genes closes this critical social window. In wolves, that signal comes when they're about three weeks old, which means dogs have five times as long to form social bonds. When genes are turned on and off may also determine why some breeds are so much better at characteristic activities like herding, tracking and retrieving. All of these have their roots in the instinctive way a wolf hunts. Every predator hunts in basically the same way. It starts with "search," which turns into "eye-stalk" when a potential meal is found. Once close enough, "chase" begins. "Grab-bite" brings dinner down, and "kill-bite" finishes the job. But dogs get their food from people. Even hunting dogs like this pointer don't need to hunt for a steady meal. That means there's no downside if the genetic signal for an instinct like stalk or chase is exaggerated, weakened, or even turned off completely. Tracking, pointing, retrieving, herding, many of the behaviors we most value in dogs today, are simply aspects of what a wolf does to survive. Give a dog a job, say, to follow a scent, reward the ones that do it best, and over thousands of generations a distinct behavior will evolve. The result is the most diverse mammal on earth. There's more than 400 different dog breeds and more than 400 million dogs. That's thousands of times more dogs than wolves. In evolutionary terms, the dog is a real winner. Once primarily working animals, dogs today are mostly pets. They're frequently chosen more for what they look like than what they can do or how they behave. But a preoccupation with appearance is not without consequences. All purebred dogs are products of intensive breeding, and every year more and more of them suffer from an ever-growing list of genetic diseases. These animals are badges of wealth, a declaration that the owner is rich enough to keep and feed an idle pet. Like lavishly appointed homes, dogs are status symbols. But as more and more people can afford them, some way has to be found to anoint a few with the mantle of aristocracy. So the dog show is born, a competition that's soon restricted to purebred animals. And since few if any of these dogs herd or hunt, their quality is judged solely on appearance. In this world, ideas about status, competition, and the importance of parentage and bloodlines quickly become inextricably combined. And the legacy endures
 a preoccupation with bloodlines and appearance. In the show ring, only purebred dogs are allowed to compete, and they're judged on how closely they match a written description of perfection, called the breed "standard." Charlotte McGowan has been showing dogs since she was eleven. Of the ten papilons that live with her, all the adults have earned the right to be called champion, and the puppies will soon. What's more, she's convinced she's only begun to tap the greatness in this gene pool. Like most champion show dogs, Bibi is the product of inbreeding. Her offspring will be too. Inbreeding is the only way to finely control what the next generation will look like, but it comes with a well-documented downside. Here's why. Determined not to give up all they've created, the dog breeding community has turned to science. If scientists can develop genetic tests to identify those dogs with bad genes, breeders believe they can do the rest. If only it were that simple. Only a few bad genes have been identified, and even then it's uncertain whether enough breeders will make the sacrifices required to weed them out. Proton scans, a fancy form of MRI, provide Overall with information on the dog's brain activity and structure. It's her hope she'll discover levels of certain brain chemicals that correlate with this intense shyness. In this case, having an inbred extended family is a good thing. Because the genes of dogs and humans are so similar, other scientists are using dogs to discover clues to some of the most vexing of human genetic diseases. With the help of Dobermans like Blitzen and Donner, and a dachshund named Beau, Emmanuel Mignot has already made a discovery that could improve millions of human lives. Beau has narcolepsy. At moments of high emotion, he loses muscle control and appears to fall asleep. Good canned food is enough to bring on an attack. On the rare occasions when Beau slips off into the hall, everyone knows there's no reason to race after him. It's another example of how dogs help us. It's six months now since Taxi came to live with the Levines, and most of them have grown to love him. Even Mike admits having a dog is sometimes "kind of nice." The Levines are determined to do the best they can by Taxi. Given the long strange journey dogs have made with us, do any of them deserve less? In the elementary school of Oguchi, Japan, the silence is more striking than the voices of children. In a spacious classroom, commanding the undivided attention of his teacher, 11-year-old Daiki Sato sits alone. Since kindergarten, he's been the only student in his class, because of a startling decline in birth rates.	Yet, rising longevity is not just transforming the industrialized world. More children in developing countries are surviving than ever before. Today, the largest generation of youth in history is entering their reproductive years, igniting an explosion of births. As global population climbs from over six to nine billion, the social and environmental strains will be enormous. Join us for a journey across four continents as we peer into the demographic divide reshaping our world and confronting us with stark choices for the future. World in the Balance
 The People Paradox, up next on NOVA. Deep in the heart of India, towers the Taj Mahal, a lavish mausoleum built to honor a queen who died giving birth to her 14th child. It's a haunting symbol for a country that will soon surpass China as the world's most populous nation, with over a billion and a half people. Beyond its walls, lies the urban sprawl of India's fastest growing state, Uttar Pradesh, with more people than all but four nations in the world. Its population of 177 million is crammed into an area the size of Colorado. Every three years, its numbers swell by another 10 million. If this battle isn't won within two decades, India's population, instead of stabilizing, could nearly double by 2050.  Yet Ravi is well aware that if progress is going to be made, the lives of women here must improve. After delivering a baby girl, Gooday begged doctors to be sterilized, but she was overruled by her mother-in-law and husband. Having a second son raises the odds for Gooday that at least one boy will survive, especially since one in 10 children in Uttar Pradesh dies before age five. Gooday has lost three infants. On the edge of the Deccan plains, barefoot children walk towards their school in the rural village of Saswad. The daily rhythm of life here masks an unusual event unfolding in the heart of the village. Newly married couples play games to get to know each other as they wait to have their wedding portraits taken. The gathering has been organized by social worker Manisha Gupta to help young men and women bridge India's stark gender divide. Social taboos pushed aside, girl and boys in separate groups hear frank talk about sex and how to use birth control. Daughters are seen as an economic liability because parents must provide a dowry of cash or gifts to marry them off. A common Hindu wedding blessing prays that a wife will bear eight sons, but if she doesn't have any, there could be a price to pay. And that's why Manisha tries to intervene early.  Gender discrimination takes place even among the wealthy. Upper class parents, committed to a two-child family, have sonograms to make sure that they've conceived a son. Although this doctor refuses to reveal a fetus's sex, not everyone is as ethical. Millions of females are aborted, leaving India with 35 million fewer women than men. Abidi Shah, a social worker, has seen that when women have greater access to education and job training, their status rises. Sixteen years ago, she visited a village on the outskirts of New Delhi. Dismayed by the plight of young girls there, she decided to act. First Abidi had to convince a skeptical community to let her teach vocational and health classes to adolescent girls. Next, she had to show the girls themselves how education could improve their lives. One young woman who attended the program was Bimla. At age 13, her father had arranged her marriage and forced her to drop out of school. Bimla was just the kind of girl Abidi wanted to reach. She told Bimla that she could legally use the pill, even without her family's permission.  With help from Abidi, Bimla learned tailoring. Soon she had enough money help her husband buy a new house and send their children to school. Yet these opportunities may be hard to come by, even as change sweeps across India. To keep pace with its growing population, the country must create six million new jobs a year. But even its dazzling economic growth of eight percent is not enough to prevent unemployment, already widespread, from rising. And a new problem is looming as population pressures confront a vast number of towns and villages with chronic water shortages. India is poised on a knife edge. Headed in the right direction, it will still take years to reach the coveted two-child family. And what if the average family size turns out to be slightly more? And the same is true for the world. If global fertility stays even slightly above this magical two-child number, by mid-century our population could nearly double, from six to 11 billion. Around the world, in Japan, the population is careening in the opposite direction of India's. 300 children once studied here, in the elementary school of Oguchi.. But once this lone fifth grader graduates, no new students will fill his place, because of a startling decline in birth rates.  With crowded streets and packed trains, Japan hardly seems to be in need of any more people. But if fertility stays at its low rate of 1.3 children per woman, by the end of the century, Japan's population of 126 million, will shrink in half. Tomoko Omuro is a leading television journalist. At age 29, she became one of Japan's first female anchors. By age 37, Tomoko had become an editor-in-chief, supervising a team of producers and reporters. Her husband of nine years often asked her when they might start a family. At 41, Tomoko gave birth to their daughter, Asumi. Her initial ambivalence about motherhood is becoming increasingly common.  But besides wanting careers, there's another crucial reason that more women are working. There's a saying that Japanese men live at the office and commute to home, often catching the last train, at midnight. Now as more women join their husbands at work, they're discovering that the long hours required by most employers make having a family, certainly a large one, difficult.  Three hours from Tokyo, near the elementary school of Oguchi, one can glimpse the flip side of the country's falling birthrates. By 2050, one in three Japanese will be over the age of 65. In Oguchi, this is already the reality.  But with more women working, there's often no one at home to care for the elderly. The stress on families is mounting, especially since neither the government nor private industry has been able to fill the gap. If the Ohnos should get sick, the only nearby nursing home is full. Japan's population pyramid looks like India's turned upside down, reflecting how the elderly dramatically outnumber the young. The Japanese now live longer than anyone else, with men averaging 78 years and women 84. But this good news is tempered by a sobering reality in aging countries. There will soon not be enough young people entering the work force to support those retiring. Not only will there be fewer workers, but as the population declines, there will be fewer consumers.  To keep its workforce from shrinking, an aging country like Japan would need to take in 600,000 immigrants a year. Yet the Japanese resist, obsessed by preserving their own ethnicity. In stark contrast, America's workforce continues to grow as a result of immigration. The United States is now the third most populous nation, and will remain so for the next 50 years, as our numbers climb from around 300 to 400 million people. Economically, this growth keeps us vibrant. Yet our productive economy also uses more resources than any other nation and generates one quarter of the greenhouse gases contributing to global warming. In fact an American child will consume and pollute more over a lifetime than 30 children born in India.  Across the industrialized world, the average family size is now at or below two children. This stunning change has slowed population growth, yet it also signals the advent of global aging. Confronted by the prospect of shrinking populations, many countries now encourage couples to have more children. Ironically, they're finding that it maybe easier to cut fertility than it is to raise it.  In 1950, sub-Saharan Africa had one third as many people as Europe. By 2050, this African population will be triple the size of Europe's. Africa's population pressures will not just create economic refugees, but environmental ones as well. To meet rising demands for food, fuel and shelter, the continent's forests are disappearing at the fastest rate in the world. As countries struggle to obtain a decent standard of living, natural environments are increasingly strained. The degradation not only threatens Africa's unique wildlife, but creates hardships for people who live off the land.  Many African states have now embraced family planning. One of the oldest and most successful programs is in Kenya. In the '70s and '80s, this east African nation was the poster child for runaway growth. But two decades of family planning cut fertility from around seven to four children per woman.  According to demographic models, Kenya's falling fertility places it on the threshold of a profound transition. The challenge for every country is to pass rapidly through this second stage, and bring birth rates back into balance with death rates, allowing the population to stabilize.  Just as Kenya stands ready to reap the benefits of falling birth rates, the country is facing a stunning demographic reversal. For the first time in modern history, death rates are rising not falling. Six to nine percent of all Kenyans are infected with HIV-AIDS, causing life expectancy to plummet from 65 to 49 years. In Kenya, AIDS and population growth have become tragically linked. Florence dropped out of school and searched for ways to support her family. But with few skills, her options were bleak.  Eventually, Florence had to break the news to her siblings that she, too, was infected with the deadly HIV virus. Today the epidemic is spreading fastest among women. In fact, an African woman's greatest chance for getting infected is within marriage where condoms are rarely used when families are hoping for children. There may soon be a breakthrough that will save women's lives. At the Population Council in New York City, scientists have discovered compounds that prevent the HIV virus from infecting human cells. Called microbicides, the hope is that they will chemically block or kill the virus during intercourse. The goal is to develop a vaginal gel that can protect women from disease if their partners fail to wear a condom. In several sub-Saharan African countries AIDS has reversed population growth. But in most, births far exceed deaths because only 18 percent of women here use birth control, in contrast to 60 percent of women worldwide.  The toll of unwanted pregnancy can be seen in the wards of Kenyatta National Hospital. Half of all adolescent girls in the country bear children by age 19. Many don't have the means to care for their babies and attempt illegal abortions.  But the doctors here stress that there's an obvious solution to this problem.  In contrast to most African nations, Kenya has started its demographic transition. Its fertility rates have fallen to around four children per woman, although not yet as low as India's average of three. With fewer babies being born, a changing age structure has opened up a rare window of opportunity for both countries. This strategy transformed the once poor nations of South Korea, Taiwan, Singapore and Hong Kong. As fertility fell, these governments took money once spent on children and created jobs for young adults entering the work force. The economic gains of these "Asian Tigers" stunned the world. It took until 1800 for global population to reach its first billion. In two centuries, the numbers increased six-fold. Our world is now headed towards a day of reckoning. If fertility drops just below two children, by mid-century, global population could stabilize at around nine billion people. With projections uncertain, what will the demands for energy, food and water be in the future? How will the other species with whom we share the planet fare? The next few decades will be a critical time to ensure the trend to smaller families and plan realistically for global aging.  Amber
 its jewel-like beauty has held humans spellbound for thousands of years, but inside an even greater treasure glows.  Suspended in time, these tiny prisoners have tales to tell of a world that belonged to the dinosaurs, of enemies long extinct, of supercontinents that no longer exist. Now scientists can peer deeper into these time machines than they ever did before, opening the door to the unthinkable, bringing dinosaurs back to life. Host David Attenborough takes you on a quest for amber. Jewel of the Earth, right now on NOVA. Within this remote African forest lives a great ape. It's one of our closest living relatives, yet to many, it's a complete stranger. It's the bonobo. The tributaries of the great Congo River lead to the only place on Earth that's home to an amazing ape, the bonobo. This has always been a difficult place to travel. Even now, the journey takes many days. As the river snakes into the heart of Africa, it's easy to feel you're going back in time. It took years of constant observation to gain the trust of these shy animals. When studies began, researchers estimated there were fewer than 55,000 bonobos in existence. Hidden away in this distant jungle, these endangered apes are still largely unknown to the rest of the world. Unlocking their secrets has proved slow and arduous.  The male bonobos posture at each other from either side of the boundary line. But the females take a very different course of action. They all get together. While chimps may practice warfare and aggression, bonobos are more sociable and inclined to get along with their neighbors. Together, the behavior of these two great apes appears to reflect both sides of human nature. Simply watching bonobos reveals how unlike chimps they are, especially in ways we consider most human. And there are other surprises. Scientists had assumed that all great apes fit into hierarchies dominated by males, like the chimps.  But female bonobos aren't dominated by males; female bonobos are in charge. This was so unexpected that when researchers first reported it, they were met with resistance and disbelief. But bonobo society is matriarchal, difficult as it was for some scientists to accept. But at mealtime, it's unmistakable
 sisterhood is power. Although males and females search for food together, females decide how it is shared out. Sometimes this happens at a very young age. When this bonobo was three years old his mother died. Since then, he's had no influence within the group. The other youngsters will play with him, but the play sometimes gets rough. When things seem to be getting out of hand, a mother bonobo intervenes and winds up biting the orphan on the hand. When she disappears, the young bonobo remains behind, studying the orphan's injured hand. For a long time scientists argued that such traits like kindness and empathy belong to people alone. But observing these animals and other great apes has led to a new interpretation.  A bit like a handshake or a hug, it lasts only a few seconds. But these brief sexual contacts have an enormous impact on the overall calmness of bonobo life. Intimacy makes it hard to stay angry. Bonobo disputes might begin aggressively, but sex can smooth tensions, even in mid-charge. So what caused bonobos to evolve this more peaceful coexistence which chimps did not? The difference may be a result of their food-rich habitat. Chimps have less food available, and what food there is, dominant males get to first. So female chimps spend much of their time alone, searching for food and vulnerable to male aggression. Since the mid-1970s, scientists made great progress in understanding the bonobo. But by 1994, it became increasingly difficult to study them. Genocide in neighboring Rwanda de-stabilized the whole of Central Africa. The fighting spilled over into the Congo, as extremist militias and refugees fled across the border. Over the next few years, the violence and political upheaval in the Congo escalated. Reeling from tensions with Rwanda, the Congo's government itself was overthrown. Factions from neighboring countries lined up behind Congo rebels and government forces in a struggle for power. In 1998, the country plunged into a full-blown civil war and the violence reached far into the jungle. Even bonobo researchers came under suspicion. The scientists were rounded up and forced out, lucky to escape with their lives. More than 20 years' worth of observations, of valuable records of individual bonobo lives came to an end. In a starving country, the forest animals are destined for the pot.  But the meat was not just for starving families. As the war progressed, an army of professional poachers illegally took more and more animals from the forest. During the war, 250 Congolese park wardens lost their lives. During the war the number of babies arriving at the orphanage spiraled. There were reports that bonobos in the wild were facing extinction, that soon these refuges would be the only place that bonobos could be found.  The forests seemed empty. Bonobos have always been difficult to find, but now no one knew if they were there at all.  Frances is also worried about the fate of her local tracker, Papa Bosco, whose family remained in the area throughout the terrible years of the war. Now the villagers hope life can return to normal. A new bonobo study would bring sorely needed cash to this community, but are there any animals left? Frances heads straight into the forest. They are looking for any signs that bonobos are still using the area. There are no knuckle prints, but there is a good sign further down the trail. But with the light fading, they are forced to return to the camp. Next morning their hopes are raised again, when they find some old sleeping nests in the canopy. A new nest is the most compelling evidence so far that bonobos are somewhere around. They decide to go home and then stake out this area early the next day.  But there's even better news. The bonobos have survived, and they're thriving. Frances's study site, Lomako has fared better than some. One third of the bonobos around the study site Wamba were killed during the war. Over the whole country there may be fewer than 30,000 left.  Bonobos are clever primates. They have proven themselves capable of change. It's long been known that bonobos, like chimps, are highly intelligent apes. But intelligence is only one trait they share with us.  Bonobos may reveal further surprises, but only if they're able to survive. For now, Jef Dupain has put his bonobo research on hold. Instead he is trying to encourage local people to rebuild their farms in order to reduce dependency on bushmeat.  Research at Wamba Forest has started up again, and Frances White continues to work towards re-establishing the site at Lomako. Her goal is to find the specific animals that she identified and tracked before the war.  Imagine an alien that can float through space, with a giant brain shaped like a doughnut, eight arms growing out of its head, and three hearts pumping blue blood. This alien lives right here on Earth. It's called the cuttlefish, a flesh-eating predator who's a master of illusion, changing its shape and color at will. It can hypnotize its prey or even become invisible. How does an animal that's related to a slug manage such clever tricks? NOVA dives into a stunning and bizarre world, as researchers probe the surprising brainpower and explore the conjuring magic of one of the strangest creatures alive today. Kings of Camouflage right now, on NOVA. Dive into the oceans off Europe or Australia and you might encounter a strange and elusive animal. This is nature's greatest master of disguise, the cuttlefish. Its visual wizardry and clever behavior have fascinated and mystified scientists for years. Captivated by these bizarre creatures is marine biologist Mark Norman, based at The Museum Victoria in southern Australia. Cuttlefish have been performing their own brand of magic for millions of years in oceans around the world, though not in the Americas. So what else are these peculiar animals capable of? Cuttlefish often have favorite stomping grounds. And it's Ronald's local expertise which brings Mark face to face with his first broadclub cuttlefish. Cuttlefish are often hungry and on the lookout for a tasty treat. Sneaking up in coral camouflage is one hunting trick. But if this fails, the broadclub cuttlefish gives up all attempts at being inconspicuous and instead pulls out all the stops with a dazzling show that seems to stun its prey and leaves it helpless. So how does cuttlefish skin work its magic? The secret lies in specialized layers of skin cells. One little pigment cell is this little ball of color, all tightly bound up so you don't see it. And it has muscles attached to it. And the muscles can pull that pigment sac out into a little disk of color.  Along with color and pattern, the skin can change its texture, too, pushing up bumps along its surface. To match their surroundings, cuttlefish rely on their eyesight. As strange as it may appear to us, their w-shaped pupils provide excellent vision. Visual cues go straight to the brain, and the brain, in turn, sends instructions right to the skin cells. The cuttlefish's electric skin usually works for self defense, to make it disappear into the background. But clearly, the broadclub found a new use for its changeability. Back in Indonesia, Mark Norman wants to know exactly what triggers the broadclub to turn itself into the ultimate exhibitionist. Mark's first offering of small crabs—their favorite food—is welcome. But it doesn't trigger too many light switches. It's all about positioning. If you don't want to lose one of your arms, you've got to get just the right grip on your prey. Every cuttlefish starts off with the same hungry determination, but Mark can't fool them for long. As alien as they seem, cuttlefish do share something with us
 big brains. While humans have one of the biggest brain-to-body ratios among mammals, cuttlefish and octopus top the list for all invertebrates. But does a big brain necessarily mean cuttlefish are intelligent? Looking for answers is Jesse Purdy, a comparative psychologist at Southwestern University in Texas. But how do you measure an animal's brainpower? Here at Southwestern, cuttlefish are being tested for the most basic levels of learning. For example, if you put a wind up plastic fish into a cuttlefish tank, at first it mistakes it for food. But once it realizes how unappetizing the toy is, from then on, the cuttlefish will ignore it. One question is whether or not the cuttlefish can learn to associate the toy fish with the promise of food. The next step is to see if the animal can learn to do something in order get fed, like pressing a button on a vending machine, or, in their world, hitting a jar to receive a reward. For any creature, when it comes to intelligence, what matters most is how it helps you survive in the real world so you can pass on your genes to a new generation. Giant cuttlefish can grow over three feet long. Eye to eye, the big males try to outdo each other with the most intimidating body patterns. Smaller females seem unimpressed. During mating, males outnumber the females, sometimes 10 to one. And they're all looking for the chance to pass on their genes. While a female lays eggs beneath a rock, a big male tries to monopolize her, staving off the other hopeful suitors. The cross-dressers' success is all the more impressive because the females often play hard to get, as Roger Hanlon has seen firsthand. The little guy may have crossed one hurdle, but a female's welcoming embrace alone won't guarantee reproductive success. It's the male's job to hand over the sperm. But once he does, fertilization is up to the female. She's already mated with multiple partners and is storing their sperm in pouches under her arms. So whose sperm wins out in the end? There's only one way to find out. Roger was part of a team that extracted DNA samples from all the participants—the mother, her partners, and the babies—to find out, "Who's the daddy?"  Over the course of a couple of weeks, each female will lay hundreds of eggs sired by many fathers, filling up the crevices on the undersides of rocks. With such a short lifespan, it's even more surprising how smart these creatures seem to be. For nearly 20 years, Jean has been running tests with cuttlefish and their more famous cousin, the octopus. To test her cuttlefish, Jean has created a special enclosure, fashioned from a plastic trash barrel, which the animals must try to escape from. Thirteen research subjects with names like Bubbles, Goofy and Crook, are tested three times a day over several months. Their job is to negotiate a simple maze and to find their way out as quickly as possible. In each trial, only one of the two exit doors is open. The cuttlefish has to look for clues to pick the right one. If there's a piece of plastic seaweed in the enclosure, then the striped door will lead to freedom. So, can a cuttlefish learn these rules? The cuttlefish are able to recognize and remember at least two rules or conditions for finding the open exit. That's a level of intelligence much more common among creatures that possess a backbone. The cuttlefish's big brain, together with its amazing camouflage, probably evolved so they could survive in dangerous environments filled with hungry fishes. But one cuttlefish might have acquired another secret weapon. This is a place of the weird and the wonderful, where standing out or blending in all depends on whether you are predator or prey. It's one of the few places you'll find the rare mimic octopus. This enigmatic animal has made a huge impression on Mark, despite the fact it's only a couple of inches long. Like its big brothers, this cuttlefish has to grow fast and is often on the hunt. But to catch a tiny glass shrimp takes very good eyesight and patience. Clearly, the flamboyant stands out from the rest of the cuttle pack. But is it just a big bluff or the real thing? Is it poisonous or not? Mark has to take her back to venom labs in Australia to unravel her potentially deadly secret. Toxins could be anywhere, from the skin to the inner organs. If the flamboyant's bite is toxic, its saliva will contain the poison, just as in the blue-ringed octopus. But it could also be mixed with its ink. Mark needs to analyze all body parts. But beyond any potential medical use, the toxin is exciting to Mark because it helps explain the flamboyant cuttlefish's oversized confidence. Evolution means change, so maybe in a few million years, the flamboyant will march on eight legs right onto the beaches. Or the broadclub will hypnotize its predators as well as its prey. Perhaps the Australian giants will invent even more daring strategies to outwit their rivals. Cuttlefish continue to dazzle with their outward displays, but exactly what goes on inside their heads will remain, for now, the real mystery. Flowering plants delight our senses; we love them in our gardens. Yet it is little appreciated that they are the basis of our food. In fact, humans would not have evolved without them.  The origin of flowers is one of botany's most enduring mysteries. Darwin called the mystery "abominable." Now two teams of scientists have set out across China to solve that mystery.  One team is searching for the clues that are held by living plants. The other believes it has found an extraordinary fossil that could be the world's first flower. Together, can they solve this evolutionary mystery? Tonight on NOVA, The First Flower. Flowers hold a special place in the natural world and in the human heart. But flowering plants are not just fragrant, decorative objects, they are essential to human life. Almost all our food, including wheat, corn and rice, is derived from them, as are many medicines, old and new. Sun Ge searched for more than a decade, through these layers of rock, without success. One day a student dropped off three new fossils at his office. The first two were plants Sun Ge had seen before.  The fossil was unlike anything Sun Ge had ever seen before. At the top of two simple branches were structures that appeared to enclose seeds. An enclosed seed is a defining feature of a flower, today. Could this be an early flower?  Dilcher is one of the world's leading paleobotanists, which is the study of ancient plants and their fossils. His passion is trying to understand the origin of flowers. Before flowers, the Earth was covered with green plants like ferns, pines, and the now-extinct seed ferns. Their reproduction was relatively slow and inefficient. Pollination was mostly carried out by the wind. Flowers take enormous energy for a plant to produce. They may be beautiful, but that beauty is, in one sense, a burden. So why have flowers at all?  While Sun Ge and Dilcher are studying evolution from the ancient fossil record, Yin is taking a different path. He is documenting the outcome of that evolution through a catalogue of living plants. Their first stop is an alpine meadow at 14,000 feet. Hinkley barely gets of the car before he sees what makes the Hengduan Mountains so special. Cypripedium tibeticum is a rare species of the much sought after lady slipper orchids, named after the unusual pouch created by a modified petal. Whether it be finding one rare flower or one unique fossil, they are both essential parts of understanding the evolution of flowering plants.  The unique conditions allowed many of the flowers here to survive the last Ice Age. In other countries around the globe thousands of species of plants were stripped clean by the glaciers. The Hengduan Mountains have, in effect, served as a safety deposit box of temperate diversity.  The fossil record shows that, while flowering plants evolved rather late, they came to dominate the Earth. But clarifying the steps of flowering plant evolution has been difficult, in part because most plants decompose before they ever become a fossil. Usually only fragments remain, which is one of the things that makes this strange new fossil from China so extraordinary. The details of the plant are beautifully preserved. Some of the rock layers here in northwestern China date back 150 million years to the Jurassic Period, the heyday of dinosaurs. If Archaefructus could be proven to be a Jurassic flowering plant, it would surely be one of the world's very first.  To understand why this fossil that looks nothing like a flower could be one of the world's first, you have to understand what the function of flowers is. The story of flower evolution is integrally linked with that of its pollinators, like insects and birds. This co-evolution has been largely responsible for their remarkable diversity. It is believed that there may be as many as 400,000 different species of flowering plants, including things as different as roses, wheat and even apple trees. Dilcher believes that this fossil from China, while not beautiful, is the first plant to have the basic pollen- and seed-producing organs of a modern flower.  Right or wrong, Sun Ge and Dilcher are in for a contentious fight if they want to prove that this is the world's first flower. Wilson contracted gangrene but managed to fight off amputation of his leg. He was left with a severe limp that he nicknamed his "lily limp." But Wilson's legacy, and that of the regal lily, lives on, literally, in your garden. And among those specimens is the very one collected by E. H. Wilson in that narrow valley in China
 Lilium regale. The study of plants has been essential to man throughout human history because of their importance to food, medicines and economies. Understanding them requires figuring out how they are interrelated, which is done in part by classifying—sorting and trying to arrange them into a family tree of plants. Solving that abominable mystery is what Dilcher and Sun Ge are trying to do. They've returned to the site of Sun's original discovery in Beipiao, China, to learn more about the fossil's original habitat. Is the Archaefructus one of those early evolutionary stages of flowering plants that Darwin looked for? A prototype, or early test model, for the flower? At the time Archaefructus was living, this area was a large inland lake, and Dilcher and Sun Ge believe Archaefructus evolved at the edge of the lake.  Else Marie Friis, a leading paleobotanist in Stockholm, has analyzed Archaefructus, as well, and disagrees with Dilcher and Sun Ge.  Friis believes that Archaefructus shows signs of having adapted to live in the water, which would mean that it is a more evolved plant, and not the first flower. She, too, is looking for the world's oldest flower but has taken a different route.  Hour after hour, Friis would sort through the fragments of plants. Then one day she saw something that startled even her. By looking piece by piece at these bits of plants, she discovered that some of them were tiny, whole flowers. Here were flowers, millions of years old, that are, in effect, still in bloom. In very special sediments, these tiny flowers had turned into charcoal and were preserved intact. The oldest of these tiny flowers has been found to be 120 million years old. Sun Ge and Dilcher dated Archaefructus at just over 140 million years old, based on the other fossils found in this area. This put it in the Jurassic period, the age of dinosaurs. Leo Hickey, at Yale University, has taken another approach to tracing the first flower
 a kind of scientific reading of the tea leaves.  Hickey discovered that leaves have very different patterns in their veins, and understanding those patterns was a clue to their evolution. The most advanced leaves have veins that are straighter and efficient, like good plumbing. But leaves can only take you so far in this analysis. The electron microscope brought into focus previously unseen detail of plant pollen. Pollen is far more common in the fossil record than are leaves. Seeing the intricate details of individual pollen grains allowed scientists to identify the distinctive pollen from flowering plants and then figure out when that pollen began showing up on Earth. Their answer? This was a startling discovery. It could help answer Darwin's question about when flowering plants began, but it puts into doubt the age of Archaefructus.  In the spectacular Hengduan Mountains, the scientific controversy about Archaefructus seems much less heated. But what is happening here is revealing new clues to what these arguments are all about. The way the family tree was sorted out for centuries was by comparing various features of plants, like their leaves or pollen. Differences in these structures were indicators of evolutionary change, and the basis for figuring out where it belonged on the family tree. Their lower altitude cousins have evolved quite differently. Different as these rhododendrons may at first appear, their basic features, like leaves, are quite similar in structure.  In the last 40 years, Professor Yin and the Chengdu Institute of Biology have catalogued thousands of different species of plants in the Hengduan Mountains. Finding the relationships of similar looking rhododendrons is relatively easy, but classifying the hundreds of thousands of known plant species quickly becomes overwhelming.  Just a few blocks away from the fabled herbarium at Kew Gardens, scientists have a new tool to sort this all out. Today, genetic material, or DNA, from living plants is helping to build a more accurate family tree. This slimy glob is the plant's DNA and is made up of the four familiar bases, A, C, T, and G. Mark Chase, the head of the laboratory, translated that DNA evidence into a massive computer matrix. Thousands of base pairs of DNA for each plant are put into the matrix, and then compared with other plants. The color coding of the base pairs helps to identify differences. It is the multi-species plant equivalent of the human genome project. The computer analysis was so complex it required a consortium of scientists, including Doug and Pam Soltis of the University of Florida.  The closer the DNA sequence, the closer the evolutionary relationship of two plants, which then allows them to group similar plants into related families. The results aren't so easy to get your hands around. Now with the assurance of DNA insight, the family tree of living flowering plants has largely been written.  Andy Darragh is in charge of tending to a garden at Kew that is organized by the old family tree of plants, it's called the Order Beds. He's got the somewhat overwhelming job of trying to bring order to the new order.  Perhaps the biggest surprise from the DNA evidence is that when all the number crunching was done, one plant showed up at the very bottom of the family tree of living flowering plants, Amborella, the oldest branch of the family tree—a plant so rare that it is only found in the remote Pacific island nation of New Caledonia.  Archaefructus is an example of this. We don't know where it would fit in the new molecular tree because we do not have its DNA.  Dilcher and Sun Ge are working on that complete picture. They have compared the leaves, pollen and other visible structures of Archaefructus with Amborella. Their analysis claims that Archaefructus looks more primitive and therefore evolved first. That is why they call it the oldest flowering plant, the first flower that we know of. Today Archaefructus can be seen in its proper environment, in this visiting exhibit at the California Academy of Science. Here they have a diorama that recreates life in northern China more than 100,000,000 years ago. Growing at the side of the lake is a model of Archaefructus.  By being here, it is a reminder that by giving us food and medicine, fragile flowering plants did far more to change the future of our world than any of these powerful monsters. Meanwhile, who knows what clues to the evolution of flowers may be growing in this vast safety deposit box of plant diversity in Western China and elsewhere around the world? Or how long those clues will last? The United Nations has declared the Hengduan Mountains to be under ecological threat from growing urbanization. Several international organizations have called for an increased effort to protect this region before its diversity is lost forever to the modern day glacier of environmental destruction.  The strange bones are the start of an adventure. A team of researchers launch an expedition to hunt for a long lost killer, as fearsome as any top predator today.  On a continent full of unique animals, they're on the trail of a powerful, prehistoric lion. For years, scientists have had only fragments of the lost predator to study, and its mysteries have remained unsolved.  Now, struggling in difficult conditions, the scientists have only a short time for a breakthrough.  It's a daring search, deep below the ground...  ...and a race against the threat of fossil poachers, who could steal the precious bones.  The team will work for three intense weeks to rescue the remnants of a unique ancient beast.  Right now, on NOVA, Bone Diggers.  The Australian outback
 a vast, trackless wilderness filled with extraordinary creatures, including more than 200 different kinds of marsupials, which carry their babies in a pouch.  The attachment was a mysterious photo. It was taken in a newly discovered cave. It may be the find of a lifetime
 the skeleton of an animal that's puzzled Australian scientists for over a hundred years.  Following directions that came with the email, Long and his colleagues set off on three full days of rugged driving, deep into the Australian outback.  They're heading to the Nullarbor Plain, more than 700 miles of almost uninhabitable land.  Although it appears empty, the Nullarbor is home to many animals today, distant relatives of those enormous creatures that lived a million years ago.  Of all the prehistoric animals, one of the most mysterious is a marsupial lion called Thylacoleo carnifex. Very little is known about Thylacoleo. Fossil fragments have been found scattered across Australia, but never a complete skeleton. And that is what John Long thinks is pictured in the email.   In the middle of this desert, they'll be at the mercy of the elements. Temperatures in the daytime soar over a hundred degrees and then drop to freezing at night. And when the wind kicks up, it can literally blow the camp away. But this parched landscape was formed in a totally different environment than it is today.  Only a few of those caves are known to contain fossils. Concealing their location is critical, because there's a thriving international black market in ancient animal bones.   They spread out and never take the same route to the cave twice. Leaving tracks in the scrub could give away the location of the site to poachers, and priceless material could be lost to science.  For many members of the team, this kind of exploring is a completely new experience. They spend most of the first day at the campsite, learning to use their gear. Any mistake could be fatal.  No matter how experienced the scientists are, the winds at the cave entrance can be treacherous.  The next three weeks will be a test of endurance and patience. But it's also the chance for a unique scientific discovery.   Tomorrow the real adventure will begin.  The moment has come to descend into the dark depths of the cave.   It's a 50-foot straight drop from the surface.   Carefully, the team begins searching the enormous cave.  Piece by precious piece, they start to uncover ancient bones. Some are so fragile that just a touch could destroy them.  The floor of the cave is littered with fossils.  It looks like the cave was a prehistoric deathtrap. They find many of the bones directly under the small opening on the surface.  They break for the day, but there's a wealth of fossils waiting to be recovered. And they know that somewhere under this ancient soil is the big prize
 the skeleton John Long saw in the email, before they left Perth.  As they continue their hunt, they find of hundreds of bones. Many are familiar, belonging to species found at other sites. But then comes a stunning realization. This cave holds hidden treasure, unique new skeletons of extinct species, previously unknown to science.  Over the course of several days, they realize there's an entire community of ancient animals in the cave. They find eight new species of prehistoric kangaroo, and other lost animals that are many times bigger than their relatives today. It's an unprecedented discovery.  But just as they had feared, poachers have been here. In one part of the cave, there's evidence that poachers arrived before they did and raided some of the fossils.  Could the poachers have already stolen the skeleton from the email? Hours of searching pass, and then one member of the team makes a promising discovery.   They immediately recognize that these bones are fragments of a giant extinct lion—a tantalizing clue, but not a complete skeleton.   Every bone is still in place. The skeleton has been resting here in the darkness for thousands of years.  It's been a breakthrough day for the team. The find is a landmark in Australian paleontology. There's still a lot of work to do, and not a lot of time. They have an intense two weeks ahead of them as they face the challenge of bringing the precious skeleton to the surface.  They take samples for dating, because they want to know exactly how old the skeleton is.  They'll also try to recover ancient DNA from the bones, to look for clues about how Thylacoleo relates to modern species.  The skeleton's age and excellent condition make it even more valuable than the researchers had hoped, providing intimate details of the extinct lion's anatomy and behavior.   Before they can get the bones back to the lab, they need to prepare them carefully. One false move and the precious Thylacoleo  skeleton could disintegrate before their eyes.  They spend days brushing on a special glue to harden the bones. It's a tedious job, but they have to do it before they can even pick up any of the bones.  The skull indicates that Thylacoleo's bite was incredibly powerful, equivalent to that of a modern lion, more than twice its size.   The unprecedented haul of bones poses an unexpected problem for the team. They can't possibly take all the fossils back to Perth.   But if they leave anything behind, it may not be here when they come back.  They decide to take the eight new species of kangaroo, and several Thylacoleo specimens, including the rare intact skeleton. John Long personally tags and wraps each fragile bone for the journey back to the museum.  But there's still one final hurdle. The difference in air pressure above and below the ground makes the wind howl through this narrow opening. One wrong move and their precious cargo could be smashed to bits against the limestone rock. Fortunately, their treasure makes the trip safely.  Nineteenth century naturalists were the first to identify and describe Thylacoleo bones, and even with only fragments to go on, they realized how unusual a creature it was.   But the name raised more questions than it answered. Marsupials share the characteristic feature of a pouch the females use to nurture their young. The specific bone structure needed to support a pouch in marsupials has been found in Thylacoleo skeletons.  Rod Wells has been studying Thylacoleo most of his career. The best fossils he's had up 'til now are bits and pieces of skulls and teeth. So he starts his investigation of the new, complete skeleton with the parts he knows best, and right away he finds surprises.   Most of Thylacoleo's marsupial relatives today are plant eaters, but it seems clear that it was a hunter, like other lions.  Since this skull is so well preserved, it promises to deliver clues that have eluded previous researchers.  The CT images are transformed into a plastic replica of the skull. Then Walters takes a set of precise measurements of the interior cavity. The final result is a remarkable three-dimensional cast of  Thylacoleo's brain.  Many of today's marsupials are night creatures with keen senses of smell, sight and hearing. These are traits also shared by big cats.  Somewhere in the new bones could be a clue to solve this problem. If Thylacoleo stabbed its victims with its large front teeth, how did it hold on to them while it finished them off?  The evidence suggests that this ancient marsupial lion is fundamentally different from other marsupials, which lack such powerful teeth, and from other lions, which don't have its slashing claw. But without obvious parallels to these familiar predators today, its hunting habits remain a mystery.  These images help decipher how the bones were connected to each other and where muscles would have been attached. This gives the scientists a new understanding of Thylacoleo's legs and an important detail about the hunting techniques of the ancient predator.  Legs that are powerful but low to the ground mean Thylacoleo couldn't run fast for any significant distance. Chasing its prey would be out of the question; it would never have enough speed.  As all of the new information about Thylacoleo's anatomy is falling into place, a scientific illustrator begins reconstructing its size and shape. The only things left to artistic license are the color and markings of its coat.  Thylacoleo ruled the Australian outback for more than a million years. Of the many large and formidable prehistoric animals, it was the deadliest, the king of beasts.  Scientists are sharply divided about what caused Thylacoleo and all the other giant animals in Australia to die out. One view is that the final climax of cold conditions toward the end of the Ice Age, 30,000 years ago, pushed the great creatures into oblivion.  But a rival theory places the extinction much earlier, around 50,000 years ago. At that time, climate changes were probably less severe. And the first humans to arrive in Australia, the ancestors of today's aboriginal people, were entering the continent.  There's no way to prove that humans hunted prehistoric Australian animals aggressively enough to kill them all off, but other human activities could have helped eliminate the beasts.   Whatever the reason, burning could have disrupted natural cycles of wildfire and re-growth, changing the vegetation and altering the habitat the giant animals depended on. Fires set by humans would narrow the range of plants to fire-resistant species. The landscape would turn to desert scrub land, and many of the browsing animals, like giant kangaroos, wouldn't have enough food to get by.  But exactly how big a role humans played in the extinctions, alongside climatic factors, is still hotly debated, and not only in Australia, but on other continents, where a similar pattern of extinction unfolded as the Ice Age ended and humans arrived.   Long after the magnificent skeleton takes its final resting place on proud display at the Western Australian Museum, research will continue on the unique role Thylacoleo played in the natural history of the outback. And the scientists who found it believe this is just the beginning of many more discoveries. Imagine sharing life with a person who seems to be you. Created from the same fertilized egg, you share exactly the same genes. So profound is their influence, everything about you appears the same
 the spaces between your teeth, the way you laugh, your body language. You are, in a word, identical. Or are you? So if genes don't tell the whole story of who we are, then what does?              Ghost in Your Genes, up next on NOVA. In the early 1990s, the biggest project ever undertaken in biology captivated the world.  The endeavor would reveal the chemical structure of each gene locked within our cells, the blueprint for life itself. Once the code was deciphered, scientists hoped to find the genetic cause and cure for every disease. They estimated that the human genome, the book of life, would contain around 100,000 genes.  Thirty thousand, twenty-five thousand...as the mapping drew to an end, it appeared that humans had about the same number of genes as fish and mice. So few genes didn't appear enough to explain human complexity. Even more startling, it turned out the same key genes that make a fruitfly, a worm or a mouse also make a human. Chimpanzees share 98.9 percent of our genome. So what accounts for the vast differences between species? Might genes not be the whole story? Pembrey was stunned. Angelman syndrome and Prader-Willi syndrome, two completely different diseases, were caused by the same genetic abnormality. As Pembrey looked at the inheritance pattern for the two conditions, he noticed something even stranger.  It was a complete surprise that the same missing strip of DNA, depending upon its parental origin, could cause different diseases. It was as if the genes knew where they came from. It was the first human evidence that something other than genes passed between generations. Something that could control genes directly, switch them on or off. But how exactly did these tags go about silencing a gene?  So what switched the agouti gene off in the thin mouse? Exercise? Atkins? No, a chemical tag called a methyl molecule. Composed of carbon and hydrogen, it affixes near the agouti gene, shutting it down. Living creatures possess millions of tags like these. Some, like methyl molecules, attach to DNA directly. Other types grab the proteins called histones, around which DNA wraps, and tighten or loosen them to turn genes on or off.  These tags and others control gene expression through a vast network in the body called the epigenome.  What distinguishes cells is not their genes, but how these genes are switched on or off by epigenetics. But occasionally, some epigenetic switches can be flipped. To turn off the overactive agouti gene, researchers gave pregnant mothers foods rich in vitamins like B-12, or folic acid, from which they could make those methyl tags that silence genes. Agouti mice revealed the impact of an epigenetic change, one that occurred without altering a single chemical letter in the agouti gene.  If the epigenome controls the expression of our genes, could it solve the mystery of identical twins? But, five years ago, symmetry appeared to break. Ana Marie was diagnosed with cancer and Clotilde was not. In fact, it's not unusual for one twin to get a dread disease while the other does not. But how? How can two people so alike, be so different? Esteller suspected epigenetics was the rest. To find out, he and his team collected cells from 40 pairs of identical twins, age three to 74. But why does the epigenome change, when the genome does not? Szyf and Meaney believe that experience itself changes the epigenome. To reach this startling conclusion they studied two kinds of rats
 those born to nurturing mothers who licked and groomed them intensely after birth, and those born to mothers who took a more paws-off approach.  To rule out a genetic cause, high-licking mothers were given the babies of low-licking ones and vice versa. Once again, the less-nurtured pups grew up markedly different, and not only on blood tests. But could such a mark, capturing memory, be found? The researchers focused on a gene which lowers the levels of stress hormones in the blood. It's active in a part of the rat's brain called the hippocampus. By extracting and analyzing the gene, they could compare how its activity varied between low- and high-licked rats. The most surprising phase of the experiment, however, was yet to come. Szyf and Meaney injected anxious rats with a drug known to remove epigenetic marks.  Although the work has yet to be replicated, it appears that Szyf and Meaney have linked personality traits, albeit in a rat, to the epigenome. This work is controversial. Still, many scientists now believe that epigenetic changes in gene expression may underlie human diseases. With no viable treatment, Sandra entered a clinical trial experimenting with epigenetic therapy. It was the result of a radical new way of thinking about the causes of diseases like cancer. The trouble begins, believes Issa, when our stem cells, the master cells that create and replace our tissues, overwork. As epigenetic errors pile up, the switches that turn genes on and off can go awry, creating havoc within the cell.  But could misplaced tags be rearranged? In 2004, Sandra and other patients began taking a drug to remove methyl tags silencing their tumor suppressor genes. Ironically, the drug, decitabine, was tried in conventional chemotherapy in the 1970s and deemed too toxic. Today, Issa is giving his patients a dose 20 to 30 times lower.  Roy has not been cured, but he has been cancer-free for two years. And he is not alone. As epigenetic therapy takes off, so do the expectations for this new science. Many believe that a multitude of complex diseases, from Alzheimer's to autism, may have epigenetic triggers. Bridget was eventually diagnosed with severe autism. As the girls developed, so did their differences. And, for a long time, doctors couldn't really help. Despite millions of dollars and years of searching, no single definitive autism gene had been found. But, in comparing the brain scans of identical twins discordant for autism, Kaufman finally saw the definitive data he was searching for
 an area in the brain linked to learning, memory and emotions—called the hippocampus—was smaller in the twin with severe autism. But how could the same genes create different brain structures? Kaufmann asked Andy Feinberg at Johns Hopkins University. Kaufmann and Feinberg are now searching for methyl marks in the DNA of identical twins discordant for autism. The work has just begun, but the hope is that by finding identical genes that differ in their expression, some causes of autism may emerge.  So the environment molds our epigenomes. But might it do more?  Bygren was studying the connection between poor nutrition and health when he stumbled on something curious. Overkalix offered Pembrey a unique opportunity to see if the events that happened in one generation could affect another decades later. Pembrey suspected the incidence of one disease, diabetes, might show that the environment and epigenetics were involved. So Olov trawled the records for any deaths due to diabetes and then looked back to see if there was anything unusual about the diet of their grandparents. In fact, a grandson was four times more likely to die from an illness related to diabetes if his grandfather had plenty of food to eat in late childhood. Because these ideas were so heretical, Pembrey knew the results could be dismissed as nothing more than a curiosity. To bolster the research, he needed to find out how a trans-generational effect impacted each sex and if it was linked to a specific period of development. So he and Bygren went back to the data. The more they looked, the more patterns started to appear. They discovered that when a famine was able to trigger an effect was different for the grandmother than the grandfather. The grandmother appeared susceptible while she, herself, was still in the womb, while the grandfather was affected in late childhood. This suggested what might be happening. Perhaps environmental information was being imprinted on the egg and sperm at the time of their formation. When Pembrey looked at the diagram, he was immediately struck by seemingly bizarre connections between gender, diet and health, connections that were most pronounced two generations later. Men, for example, who experienced famine at around age 10, had paternal grandsons who lived much longer than those whose grandfathers experienced plenty. Yet, women who experienced famine while in the womb, had paternal granddaughters who died on average far earlier. The diagram showed a significant link between generations, between the diet in one and the life expectancy of another.  Much about these findings puzzles researchers. Why, for instance, does this effect only appear in the paternal line of inheritance? And why should famine be both harmful and beneficial, depending on the sex and age of the grandparent who experiences it?  Pembrey and Bygren's work suggests that our grandparents' experiences effect our health. But is the effect epigenetic? With no DNA yet analyzed, Pembrey can only speculate. But in Washington state, Michael Skinner seems to have found compelling additional evidence by triggering a similar effect with commonly used pesticides. Skinner wanted to see how these chemicals would affect pregnant rats and their offspring. He checked that there were no genetic mutations and then proceeded to breed the rats. His discoveries were a revelation. Further work has revealed changed epigenetic marks in 25 segments of the affected rat's DNA. The implications, if they apply to humans, are sobering. And if a pesticide can generate such effects, what about stress, smoking, drinking? To some, the epigenetic evidence is compelling enough already to warrant a public note of caution. Might our lifestyle choices resonate down the ages, effecting people yet unborn? Such ideas remain, to say the least, controversial. But one thing many in the field can agree upon is the need to take a cue from the Human Genome Project and launch a similar effort, this time to decipher the epigenome. The hurdle is that, unlike the genome, which is the same in every cell, the epigenome varies from tissue to tissue, between individuals and over time. The end may be the realization that the code of life is more complex and interactive than we ever imagined.  Dover, Pennsylvania
 like much of the United States, Dover has become a town divided. Dover is split between those who accept Charles Darwin's theory of evolution and those who reject it. And that rift between science and scripture nearly destroyed the community. But some in Dover were offended by the idea that humans and apes are related, and that mural was removed from the classroom and destroyed. But many say intelligent design is the fraud. Eleven Dover residents sued their school board to keep intelligent design out of the classroom. And almost overnight, Dover was catapulted to the front pages of the nation's newspapers and the front lines in the war on evolution. With Dover split down the middle, a federal court would decide if intelligent design is legitimate science or religion in disguise. And the verdict would have consequences that reach far beyond the classrooms of Dover.  Up next on NOVA
 Judgment Day
 Intelligent Design on Trial. In October, 2004, a war broke out in the small town of Dover, Pennsylvania. It started when the Dover Area School Board passed a policy requiring that its high school science classes include a controversial subject called intelligent design. The Dover school board demanded that science teachers read their students a one minute statement claiming that gaps in the theory of evolution exist, and putting forward intelligent design as an alternative. The statement also directed students to an intelligent design textbook called Of Pandas and People that would be made available. The stage was set for a battle that would pit friend against friend and neighbor against neighbor.  Before it was over, this battle would land the school board in federal court.  Located in the southeastern part of the state, about 20 miles from the capital, it's a quiet, rural place, home to about 20,000 people, more than a dozen churches, and one high school.  When Bertha Spahr asked which school board member was interested in creationism being taught alongside evolution, she was told it was a local businessman named Alan Bonsell, who had recently joined the school board. When Bonsell had questions about how evolution was taught at Dover High School, Bertha Spahr and her biology teachers agreed to meet with him. Creationists like Bonsell reject much of modern science in favor a literal reading of the Bible. They believe the Earth is less than 10,000 years old, and that God created everything fully-formed, including humans, in just six days. In that case, a high school science teacher in Tennessee, named John Scopes, was accused of violating state law by teaching evolution. Loosely portrayed in the classic film Inherit the Wind, the trial turned into a courtroom showdown between legendary lawyer Clarence Darrow... ...and three-time presidential candidate William Jennings Bryan.  Scopes was found guilty of teaching evolution, and slapped with a mere hundred-dollar fine. But the verdict would have a chilling effect on science education throughout the country for the next three decades.  The chilling effect of the Scopes trial did not thaw until the 1960s. But as publishers slipped evolution back into their textbooks, creationists fought to teach their views in science class as well.  And at a school board meeting in the summer of 2004, Buckingham made it clear he wasn't comfortable approving that book. The school board put the purchase on hold. When Darwin asked for help identifying these birds, he was in for a surprise. But why, in this small chain of islands, had he found finches with such different characteristics?  Darwin thought all the different kinds of plants and animals we see around us today, including humans, could have arisen by this process.  The common ancestry of all forms of life was one of Darwin's great insights. But he recognized disturbing implications in the idea that humans had evolved from ape-like ancestors.  And about a century and a half later, many people in Dover, like the United States as a whole, agree. To this day, somewhere between a third and half the U.S. population does not accept evolution.  In Dover, hostility to the theory of evolution had already erupted in vandalism after a student at the high school painted a 16-foot mural depicting the evolution of humans from ape-like ancestors. The mural was on display in a science classroom, when someone removed it from the school and burned it.  Though Buckingham denied any involvement in the incident, when he reportedly announced he was searching for a biology book that included evolution and creationism, the school board meeting erupted in chaos. The controversy engulfing the school board caught the attention of local newspaper reporters, including Lauri Lebo, who grew up in the area.  Lebo began reporting on the controversy. But her interest in the issue was not just professional, it was also personal. Lauri's father had been the owner of a local radio station, but the oldies format wasn't paying the bills, and the electric company was about to put him off the air.  In her articles, Lebo would write about the 1987 Supreme Court ruling that would keep Buckingham from introducing any creationist text into biology class. In the meantime, Buckingham was in touch with two organizations known for questioning Darwin. He also found a conservative think tank in Seattle, named the Discovery Institute, which calls itself "the nation's leading intelligent design proponent."  Both the DVD and book use the same example to illustrate intelligent design's central tenet, explained here by proponent Steve Fuller. And just as those words on the beach are clearly the product of an intelligent being, the claim is that some aspects of life itself must be the product of a designer. But in the materials Buckingham received, God is never mentioned. The mysterious designer is called an "intelligent cause" or "intelligent agent." An emeritus professor at the U.C. Berkeley law school, Johnson wrote a book called Darwin on Trial, in which he laid the groundwork for the intelligent design movement. Armed with information on intelligent design, Bill Buckingham returned to the school board.  But the science teachers were not convinced. Now Buckingham was ready to take a stand. But when he put it before the school board, he came up two votes short. The board chose to purchase only the standard biology book co-authored by Ken Miller. Pandas was shelved.  On December 14, 2004, 11 parents of Dover school students, including Tammy Kitzmiller and Bryan and Christy Rehm, filed a lawsuit in federal court in Pennsylvania, alleging the Dover school board was violating their constitutional rights by introducing religion into science class. They would be represented by the A.C.L.U., which had joined forces with the organization Americans United for Separation of Church and State and Philadelphia law firm Pepper Hamilton. The School Board would be represented by the Thomas More Law Center, the firm that had told Bill Buckingham about the Pandas book. They notified the board of their refusal in a memo that proclaimed, "Intelligent design is not science. Intelligent design is not biology. Intelligent design is not an accepted scientific theory." On September 26, 2005, almost exactly a year after the school board devised the intelligent design policy, six weeks of testimony in the case of Kitzmiller versus Dover Area School District got underway in federal court in Harrisburg, Pennsylvania. By the time the trial started, challenges to the teaching of evolution had cropped up in dozens of other states. And intelligent design was attracting some heavy hitters. Presiding over the case would be Judge John E. Jones, III. Jones had been recommended for his position on the bench by Senator Santorum and appointed by George W. Bush. Before becoming a judge, Jones was head of Pennsylvania's liquor control board, where he banned the sale of Bad Frog beer because it showed a cartoon frog making an offensive gesture.  Members of the defense, however, were optimistic about their chances in Jones's courtroom. The parents who opposed intelligent design, or plaintiffs, had launched the lawsuit, so the burden of proof was on them. To win, the plaintiffs' lawyers would have to show the judge that the Dover School Board's one minute statement promoted religion or that board members had religious motivation. For help, the plaintiffs turned to researcher Nick Matzke and his colleagues at an organization called the National Center for Science Education, which tracks challenges to evolution in public schools.  To make their case before a judge who had no particular scientific training, the lawyers for the parents assembled a team of expert witnesses. Starting with Ken Miller, the plaintiffs walked Judge Jones through the conflict at the heart of this case. So how can scientists be so sure Darwin's tree accurately represents the history of life on Earth? Darwin believed that evidence for his idea of common ancestry would be unearthed in the form of transitional fossils. For example, if, over millions of years, fish gave rise to land animals, as evolutionary theory predicts, we should find fossils of extinct creatures that are part fish and part land animal. Many scientists think life began in the water, at least three and a half billion years ago. More recently, about 375 million years ago, the tree of life branched as primitive fish evolved into amphibians, such as today's frogs and salamanders, which live part of their lives on land. They called it Tiktaalik, which means "large, fresh water fish," in the language of the local Inuit people. And it's one of the most vivid transitional fossils ever discovered, showing how land animals evolved from primitive fish.  And just as evolutionary theory predicts, Tiktaalik suggests a tree of life, with one species giving rise to another over millions of years.  How dinosaurs evolved into birds, as seen in creatures like Archaeopteryx which has a long tail and teeth like a dinosaur, but feathers just like a modern bird. How ancestors of modern reptiles evolved into creatures now extinct that share a common ancestor with mammals. And, how, surprisingly, whales evolved from large land animals that returned to the water.  With each fossil, Padian refuted Pandas  claim that different life forms appear suddenly, by showing how fossils of extinct organisms bridge the gaps between species, resulting in a picture of gradual evolution, just as Darwin proposed. Lawyers for the parents may have impressed the judge and reporters. But many in Dover wondered, "Why is evolution taught as fact if it's 'just a theory?'" As the plaintiffs testified, that quest to investigate the unknown has led to the discovery of some of the strongest evidence for evolution. And, as Miller would testify, a genetics paper published less than a year before the trial had confirmed what has long been the most inflammatory part of Darwin's theory, the common ancestry of humans and apes. To solve this riddle for the court, Miller would show how scientists discovered traces of our evolutionary past buried in the very structure of a chromosome carried by all humans. And the deep understanding of evolution as proposed by Darwin has, with genetics, unlocked many of the secrets of life. So if evolution has stood up to all this scrutiny, what about intelligent design? Does it play by the same rules?  After three weeks of testimony on the nature of science, the evidence for evolution and the failings of intelligent design, the plaintiffs had presented their case. The question now was, "Could the defense prove that intelligent design is a scientific theory? What evidence could they muster to support this claim?"  Having ignited much of the controversy that resulted in the lawsuit, Bill Buckingham had made a surprise announcement. Citing poor health and struggles with Oxycontin as a result of surgery, he resigned from the school board and moved out of state. But when he hit the campaign trail, Bryan found himself again in the line of fire in the war on evolution. For the Rehms, this was particularly hurtful. Both are active in their church and run a summer Bible school program.  To make the case for intelligent design, the defense had lined up eight expert witnesses, including several members of the Discovery Institute, the Seattle organization that promotes intelligent design. But of those eight witnesses, five never testified. NOVA made repeated requests to interview members of the Discovery Institute to talk about this and other issues, but the institute set conditions that were inconsistent with normal journalistic practice. A scientist and senior fellow at the Discovery Institute, Michael Behe is the author of the popular intelligent design book, Darwin's Black Box and dozens of papers, unrelated to intelligent design, published in peer-reviewed science journals. Part of the defense strategy would be to show the judge examples of biological systems they claimed were too complex to have evolved by natural selection and therefore must have been the product of a designer.  Under the microscope, bacteria powered by flagella seem almost acrobatic. They tumble, corkscrew and pirouette, thanks to that whip-like filament.  And according to Behe, if any one of these parts is missing from the system, the motor can't function. Behe calls systems like this "irreducibly complex," a term he coined. And he argues such systems could not have evolved naturally. Using an electron microscope, DeRosier produces ghostly pictures like this one, revealing the inner workings of what's been called the world's most efficient motor.  Michael Behe has argued that the flagellum could not have evolved, since its parts have no function for natural selection to act on until they are fully assembled. And it turns out the two structures look similar for a reason. The syringe on the right is made of a subset of the very same protein types found in the base of the flagellum on the left, though the syringe is missing proteins found in the motor and, therefore, can't produce rotary motion. It functions perfectly as an apparatus for transmitting disease.  To emphasize DeRosier's point, Miller arrived at court making an unusual fashion statement.  But Behe testified, it's not just microscopic organisms that are irreducibly complex. Evolution, he says, fails to account for the network of organs and cells that defends us from disease.  The defense case included three expert witnesses. And on the last day of testimony, the final defense witness told the court about a creature that, by now, was familiar to everyone. As the legal teams battled it out in court, the clash between intelligent design and evolution was taking a toll on Dover. Throughout the trial, Judge Jones would never tip his hand about which way he was leaning on whether intelligent design is science. But science was not the only issue before the court.  But what evidence was there that the school board was motivated by religion? Months before the trial, when Bertha Spahr had unpacked the boxes containing the 60 copies of Pandas given by an anonymous donor, she found a clue. This information was handed off to The National Center for Science Education. The N.C.S.E. was helping the lawyers who were arguing to keep intelligent design out of Dover High School. Matzke dug into Pandas, examining it page by page and scouring the Internet to see what he could unearth about its history.  If they could show Pandas started out as a creationist book, that would suggest intelligent design is simply creationism repackaged and therefore inherently religious. After much digging, she hit pay dirt. Buried in these documents were two drafts of Pandas straddling the 1987 case of Edwards versus Aguillard, in which the Supreme Court ruled it unconstitutional to teach creationism in public school science class. One draft was written before the case and the other revised just after. Barbara Forrest's testimony would make a strong case that the Dover school board was thrusting religion into the classroom. And in comparing the Of Pandas and People drafts, Forrest discovered that the authors had apparently made their revisions in haste. Barbara Forrest's testimony not only traced the creationist lineage of Pandas. Citing a Christian magazine's interview, Forrest let one of the intelligent design movement's own leaders, Paul Nelson, speak for himself. And on the stand, Michael Behe was asked how he would define science. With the scientific revolution, the work of Galileo, Newton and others banished supernatural explanations from science. But some think the supernatural still has its place.  But Barbara Forrest testified that the intelligent design movement's goals are not entirely scientific and are spelled out in a secret Discovery Institute document that had surfaced on the Internet.  According to the wedge document, Darwin "portrayed humans not as moral and spiritual beings, but as animals," leading people to abandon "objective moral standards."  With Michael Behe and others forming the wide end of the wedge, Johnson hopes the wedge strategy will overturn what he sees as the negative effects of a century and a half of Darwin's theory. Whatever the motivations of the Discovery Institute, the intelligent design movement, or the authors of the book Of Pandas and People, Judge Jones would need to focus on the motivation of the Dover Area School Board. And it was not Buckingham's only mistake. Both Buckingham and Bonsell had sworn in their depositions that they did not know who donated the 60 copies of Pandas to the high school. But by the time Buckingham took the witness stand, a different story emerged.  Buckingham's prayers were answered with donations from members of the church.  But at the trial, Buckingham admitted he had given that check to Alan Bonsell, and that the unknown businessman who bought the books had been Alan Bonsell's father. This contradicted statements Bill Buckingham and Alan Bonsell had originally made in their sworn depositions. After six weeks, the trial concluded with closing arguments that were as divided as the town of Dover itself had become. Judge Jones said he would return a verdict promptly. Though Robertson had already passed judgment, Dover and the nation would have to wait another month for Judge Jones to render his verdict. The 139-page opinion ruled that intelligent design is not science. Finding it had been introduced for religious reasons, Judge Jones decided it was "unconstitutional to teach intelligent design" in Dover science classes.  Citing what he called the "breathtaking inanity" of the school board's decision, he found that several members had lied "to cover their tracks and disguise the real purpose behind the intelligent design policy." Jones recommended to the U.S. Attorney that he investigate bringing perjury charges against Buckingham and Bonsell for lying under oath. And "the overwhelming evidence at trial," he said, "established that intelligent design is a religious view, a mere re-labeling of creationism, and not a scientific theory." The school district was permanently forbidden to teach intelligent design in its science curriculum. The administration was ordered to pay the plaintiff's legal fees, totaling more than a million dollars. And the election of a new school board, opposed to intelligent design, meant no appeal of the ruling would be mounted. The Discovery Institute also was displeased. Soon after the decision, the institute published a 123-page book distancing itself from the case and criticizing the ruling as "judicial activism with a vengeance." For newspaper reporter Lauri Lebo, the verdict was bittersweet. Her father passed away just nine days after the judge's decision. They had never reconciled their differences, though Lauri remains a strong supporter of evolution. Recently, her family took over management of her father's radio station, and Lauri began hosting a weekly show. In the end, though, there is probably one thing everyone in the case can agree on. In a remote part of Africa, a traditional culture is in danger. The people are losing their homes and could lose the crops that keep them alive, because of a devastating drought and a plague of termites.  They turn, for help, to an unlikely army, a unique species of ants, called jaglavak.  With ancient rituals they ask their ancestor spirits to help them save the village, to unleash the power of the legendary jaglavak. But can the ants defeat the termites in time? Or will they turn their destructive force against the people? Up next on NOVA, Master of the Killer Ants. In the central African nation of Cameroon, along the Nigerian border, are the Mandara mountains. This is the home of the Mofu people. For generations they've farmed this land. Their main crop is sorghum. In native language, it's referred to as millet.  The month of May has arrived, and the rains are late. Elders meet with the chief to talk about the problems they face.  Jaglavak is a species of army ant both respected and feared in this community. They hope the ants might drive the termites out of Sidi's house, but they also know that an invasion of jaglavak can attack people and animals. So far, only one house is infested with termites, but the bugs could spread to the rest of the village.  Sidi's roof has already been destroyed in several spots by the termites. If he can't figure out how to get rid of them quickly, they could move on to attack the granary where he keeps food for his family. A house like Sidi's, full of wood, straw and seeds, provides an abundant supply of food for a termite colony. The destruction Sidi can see is only a tiny fraction of the damage hidden inside the walls. A network of tunnels runs deep underground. Sidi hopes the prayers will bring jaglavak to the house in a day or two. But the ants usually come out of the ground in the rainy season. Without rain, they're likely to stay hidden.  Weeks go by and the much-needed drenching rain has still not come. The situation is becoming a crisis. According to the Mofu, a drought is a sign that their ancestors are angry. If someone commits an offense, like adultery, or if work is undone, the chief can't call rain from the sky. Only members of the chief's clan know the village traditions and rituals. And only these few are permitted to rub the rain stones, which are among the most powerful objects in the chief's possession.  The rain stones will be returned to their resting place in the chief's house, and the entire village will wait for signals from nature that their prayers might be answered.  Drums call the villagers together. It's time for final preparations before the rain. Underground, the rain brings temporary chaos to a nest of black ants called Malokoteng. These insects are pests for the Mofu because they steal seeds. But no ants can be as destructive as termites.  The rain has been plentiful. The river beds are full again. The ground is soaked, and sunny days will now provide perfect conditions for the crops to thrive. At this time of year, the mountains are full of grasshoppers, praying mantes, crickets and many other insects that emerge from the ground during the rainy season.  The insects the children caught are grilled with spices for a special feast. They're added to a serving of cooked grains, to round out the everyday dinner. Adults don't usually share these treats, but some can't resist. Through generations of careful observation, the Mofu know that termites are one of jaglavak's favorite prey. The battle begins. The termite mound is well-guarded, and the soldiers are up to 10 times as big as the jaglavak ants.  Everyone's prayers have been answered; the crops and the village are now safe.  The unique relationship between the Mofu people and the insects is a fragile one. It is now up to the next generation to carry the traditions forward. On NOVA's Master of the Killer Ants Web site, see other bugs you can eat, match different ants to their unusual behaviors and more. Find it on PBS.org. Something strange is happening in the forests of Africa. Chimpanzees are doing things no one has seen them do before
 they are having pool parties. But that's not all. At a site called Fongoli, in Senegal, they have also invented a remarkable way to catch a meal. They are making spears and hunting, just like our ancestors. But for every revelation about the power of their minds, another shows up a stunning difference. How big is the gap between them and us? What's holding them back? Inside ape minds, right now on this NOVA/National Geographic special. In a remote part of Africa, there's something new under the sun. Our closest living relatives are getting bold. Chimps are supposed to be afraid of water, but this young male is climbing down for a dip. He keeps a hand on a natural safety line as he overcomes his fear. Has a boy or girl ever had more fun in a swimming hole? Wild chimps have never before been seen playing like this. This is only one of a rush of discoveries that is painting a surprising new portrait of ape minds. They are more like us than most researchers ever imagined.  Using water as a tool seems like something we would do—on a good day. To make a spear, a chimp starts by breaking off a branch, then sharpening the tip, all in the quest to catch a bush baby in its daytime sleeping hollow. It may not be ice-pick-sharp, but when driven by an arm up to five times as strong as a human's, it's a potentially lethal weapon. Break, strip, sharpen, stab
 these chimps take a series of distinct steps in a carefully premeditated hunt. Pruetz and Whiten are closing in on the answers. Most of the 20 spear hunts Pruetz has observed have taken place during the rainy season. Over time she has seen every stage of the kill. She nibbles the tip to sharpen it. Then, with the aid of her foot, she aims the point into a hollow. Whiten is trying to discover what kind of mind can lead an ape to culture. When apes live alongside people, they sometimes copy our behaviors naturally, without any training. Copying someone else's successful actions beats reinventing them from scratch, but it's a lot harder than it looks.  To prove that one ape can copy another, a student of Andrew Whiten's devised an experiment. At the Keeling Center of the University of Texas, Antoine Spiteri has built a kind of slot machine for apes. He loads it with a grape. Something of a revolution came in 1960, when a young researcher, with support from the National Geographic Society, set up camp in Tanzania. Jane Goodall observed that chimps' emotions seemed much like ours, especially the tenacious bond between mother and baby. For weeks after the baby's death, her mother carries the body. Is the mother grieving? Defiant? Can an ape be in denial? It's impossible to say exactly what the mother is thinking, but hard to dismiss her feelings.  What Goodall couldn't have known was that at a place called Goualougo, other chimps had an even more sophisticated way to catch termites. First they use a big stick like a shovel to open the ground, then they switch to a slender probe to pull up the insects. Of course if you've dropped your banana, forget it, you won't get it back. So chimps have a sense of justice, and they can cooperate with people. Can they collaborate spontaneously with each other? It takes the bonobos a while to get on task. But soon they get the hang of it.  With their more congenial temperaments, bonobos are more cooperative than chimps are. In fact, bonobos may take cooperation even further. As they fend off the humans, it seems as if they're cooperating. But what does it take to work together? Are they comparing the number of staff to their own troops? Can they calculate at all? But for Ai, learning numbers was a struggle. Ai never got the "aha" feeling that children have when they realize that you just add one to get to the next number. A bonobo named Kanzi, now at the Great Ape Trust in Iowa, picked up English without being directly taught. Wearing a mask to avoid cueing Kanzi, researcher Sue Savage-Rumbaugh tests his comprehension. Savage-Rumbaugh measures Kanzi's vocabulary at 3,000 spoken English words. The twist was that the chimp got the candy she didn't point to. Could the chimp learn to resist her impulse to reach for the bigger pile? Amazingly, chimps never overcame their greedy urges. They always reached for more and, so, ended up with less. Impulse studies have also been run on humans. In a classic experiment from the 1970s, a researcher gave a four-year-old a simple choice. According to an inconclusive but intriguing study, the longer children resisted temptation, the higher their S.A.T. scores were years later. In any case, the differences between people are small compared to the gap separating humans and apes. Can apes be given skills to help them master their emotions? Sally Boysen trained a chimp to understand numerals. Then she repeated her M&Ms experiment, but now offered different pairs of numerals rather than treats. Remarkably, chimps were now able to learn what they couldn't before
 point to the smaller number to get the bigger prize. Even skeptics agree that Kanzi understands more words than any other non-human animal. He also uses an array of visual symbols to communicate. But on closer inspection, Kanzi, like all great apes, lacks the full mental package. To engage in a real conversation, each speaker needs a sense of what the other is thinking. Call this skill mind-reading. Classic studies showed that three-year-olds make consistent mistakes about what others know. But by the age of four, most children are accomplished mind-readers. That's the right answer.  This chimp seems to know what's on Hare's mind, what he can see and what he can't. So chimps seem to share a bit of our talent for mind-reading. Children copy the actions, much as the chimps did. Only now is it obvious that Horner's tapping and poking don't achieve a thing
 the box has a false ceiling. Why do kids imitate slavishly?  That children expect to be taught is a vital difference. While apes can copy, most researchers believe they don't teach each other. Learning from someone else is the fastest way to get a new idea
 faster than learning by imitation, faster than inventing a new technology in the first place. Apes don't seem to get that kind of pointing. It doesn't matter whether Brian Hare points or stares or orients his body, this young bonobo can't fathom that he is trying to communicate. But Hare suspected a certain domesticated animal would succeed. Sure enough, dogs get it. Pointing has a rational component too. It relies on a particular mental skill, a little difference that makes a big difference. This mental skill, call it "the triangle," turbocharges teamwork.  The triangle is the core skill that makes teaching possible. Humans have it; apes seem to lack it. But apes are also missing one more thing. It's a key emotional driver
 the passion to cheer each other on. The pieces are now coming together. Apes have culture, a rare achievement in the animal world. They can learn from each other by imitation. But this process is passive, often slow and can easily backslide. Unique among animals, humans have both the passion and mental skill to teach each other. When you're a student rather than a spectator, learning jumps to warp speed. That's because teaching locks in progress. An ape may stand on another's shoulders, but only humans can stand on the intellectual shoulders of giants. In spite of their limitations, when we look into the eyes of a fellow ape, we don't feel a gap but a deep connection. We can't dismiss a chimp reaching out for help, or a group of unrelated bonobos rallying to the defense of another, or a mother refusing to let go of her dead baby. But as the most social of apes, we can't help reading thoughts and feelings into the mind behind any familiar face.  One day, long ago, life in a forest came to a sudden halt, snuffed out and buried by volcanic ash. One hundred thirty million years later, fossils are all that remain, and some are like nothing ever seen before. Strangest of all is a creature called Microraptor. It had wings like a bird, but it had them on its arms and its legs. It was a four-winged, feathered dinosaur, and no one has any idea how it worked. Rival teams have been trying to figure it out, piecing together clues about what it looked like and how it functioned from crushed and distorted fossils. Each team has built a model with very different results. Scientists have argued for decades over whether and how dinosaurs evolved into flying birds. Now, they think Microraptor could solve the puzzle, but they still don't agree on the solution. One team is about to fly their model in a wind tunnel. But who's got the real Microraptor? It's the battle of the four-winged dinosaurs, up next on NOVA. One day, in 2002, a courier made a delivery to the Institute of Vertebrate Paleontology in Beijing. It was a nearly complete skeleton of a small dinosaur, with a feature he'd never seen before, long feathers attached to the arms.  For over a century, scientists have searched for the origin of birds and flight, and the evidence keeps pointing to the same improbable conclusion. Somehow, flying birds evolved from Earthbound dinosaurs more than a hundred million years ago. Exactly how it happened is still one of the great mysteries in the history of life. And the solution may be in this box.  Victims were buried quickly in fine ash, preserving detail rarely seen in fossils
 skin impressions on a reptile, fur on a small mammal. The first turned up more than a decade ago with what looked like a feathery fringe along its back. Then came others with feather impressions that were unmistakable. These weren't giants like T. rex. Some were no bigger than crows. But their skeletons showed they belonged to well-known dinosaur clans.  Twenty years ago, Jacques Gauthier worked out the details of the family tree, based on changes in anatomy that appeared as dinosaurs evolved from their earliest ancestors. Gauthier found that dinosaurs and crocodiles parted ways 240 million years ago when the ancestors of dinosaurs evolved the ability to stand up and run with their legs straight under their bodies. And some dinosaurs looked like birds. We now know there's one detail the makers of Jurassic Park got wrong. The raptors should have had feathers. The fossils from China proved it. Feathers would have been useful to the ancestors of birds long before they took to the air. There's nothing better for insulation, which may have been their original function. They can be used to bluff an enemy, attract a mate or simply to show off.  A two-winged dinosaur would be a spectacular find, but four wings border on science fiction. Nothing in the world today has feathers on its feet. And this was the first clue that such a thing ever existed. The origin of flight in birds is a puzzle that seems to defy solution. The aerial skills of modern fliers evolved in small steps over millions of years, and the fossil record provides few clues to how it happened. It's one of the oldest debates in paleontology, and for decades it's been a standoff between two opposing theories. In the arboreal scenario, the bird ancestor was a small climbing animal that evolved flight by gliding from the treetops. And that seemed to rule out dinosaurs, which, presumably, couldn't climb trees. Fossil bird expert Larry Martin has been a thorn in the side of dinosaur paleontologists for decades. Years later, he's still at it. It was hard to imagine what kind of evidence could break this deadlock, until Microraptor turned up. A four-winged dinosaur is a clue that no one expected. For Martin, it's evidence that he was right, at least about the origin of flight. Xu thought the same thing
 with feathers on its feet, Microraptor must have lived in the trees. But he's also quite sure that it was a dinosaur. Numerous details of the skeleton say so, from the long bony tail to the sickle claws on its feet. The wing feathers are asymmetrical, with veins wider on one side of the shaft than the other, which forms airfoil contour, like an airplane wing. Only flying birds have asymmetrical flight feathers. It looked like Xu had finally cracked the origin of flight. But, within days, another scientist announced that he'd solved it and come to the opposite conclusion. Ken Dial is a well-known experimental biologist and a strong believer in the dinosaur-origin of birds. He's convinced that the powered, flapping flight of modern birds really did begin on the ground with a running start. It makes sense, unless the ancestor couldn't run because of feathers on its feet. But Dial says speculation about fossils is not enough to prove him wrong. Science is built on testable ideas, and it's hard to run experiments on a fossil. Together they decide to dig deeper, to see what they can learn. And the process begins at Xu's lab in Beijing. Many bones are damaged, deformed and sometimes missing altogether. They'll need to work with multiple specimens, look for the best preserved examples of each bone, and combine them all into a composite that fills in the blanks in the original fossil. Some specimens have already been analyzed in detail by other scientists. Since the specimens are all slightly different sizes, each bone is scaled to match the dimensions of the original fossil, a process that takes months. By chance, Microraptor is also under investigation at the University of Kansas. Larry Martin and David Burnham have built their own model based on a single specimen and a unique method of preparation. Burnham made molds of each side of the slab, cast the exposed bones and cut out the pieces. Some had good preservation, and some were crushed. When he assembled the bones, the result looked more like a crocodile than a dinosaur. A sprawling Microraptor is the smoking gun Martin has been looking for all these years, to prove that dinosaurs were not the ancestors of birds. News of Martin's latest salvo in the bird-origin debate does not surprise Mark Norell. And, as for the sprawling Microraptor skeleton? Those are the ones the American Museum team has used for its reconstruction. Norell doubts that Microraptor was anything other than a typical dinosaur with legs straight under the body. But for a second opinion, they send the bones to Harvard's Museum of Comparative Zoology. Xu didn't have the benefit of the three-dimensional model when he wrote the paper, and he concedes that he was probably wrong about the posture. He never questioned the dinosaur-origin of birds, and upright posture makes sense for the ancestor, given that all birds are built the same way. They think the evidence is clear. So which model is more reliable? The cast made directly from a fossil? Or the sculpture based on 16 specimens? In a final showdown, Martin and Burnham examine the sculpted bones from the American Museum team. At Harvard, Farish Jenkins looks at Martin and Burnham's cast.  Neither side trusts the other's evidence, so the standoff continues. And with crushed fossils as the starting point, people are more likely to believe what they already believe. Still, the question remains, if Microraptor  couldn't splay its hind limbs, how did it use its leg feathers in flight? Jenkins and Gatesy can't figure it out. Martin and Burnham think they have the answer. The question is, "Could it fly any other way?" Xu Xing has the most at stake. He's claimed that Microraptor was a link between dinosaurs and flying birds. But he needs to show how four wings could work without splaying the legs. Norell, for one, is reserving judgment until he sees some hard evidence. Birds fly with a complex wing beat that propels them through the air and also produces lift. But gliders, like flying squirrels, get the energy to generate lift from falling. The more lift they produce, the longer the glide path, and the farther they can travel before they have to land. In the wind tunnel, the model is mounted on a sensor that measures the forces produced by air flowing over the wings, including the lift that keeps the flier aloft and the drag that slows it down. The data shows up in the control room on a graphic display. The blue dots indicate the amount of lift being generated, and the red triangles are the drag. The higher the lift climbs, relative to drag, the farther Microraptor could glide in that position. With too much drag and not enough lift, the best it could do in this position is not much better than parachuting. A variation with the legs tucked up under the body isn't any better. The front wing doesn't provide enough lift on its own, so the hind limbs will have to contribute somehow. It could be the only way to get more wing area without splaying the legs. If it doesn't work, Xu's dinosaur might not be much of a flier after all. But the early returns are good. It looks like four wings are better than two. The biplane generates enough additional lift to produce a longer, slower, more gradual descent, but still not enough to travel very far. Moving the legs forward is worse, and causes the body to pitch, nose up. Xu Xing has been holding back so far, but now he pitches an idea of his own. It's a bit unorthodox, and takes a while to sink in.  But eventually they come around. Xu's idea is to extend the legs almost straight back, allowing the leg and foot feathers to form a canopy over the tail. Once again, all eyes are on the lift numbers.  Now the lift starts to climb. Xu's posture makes for a long, fast glide. But when it's time to stop, it needs help. And that could be where the biplane comes in.  The experiment says that Microraptor could glide very well without splaying its legs. But does that mean bird-flight evolved through gliding from the trees down? Over millions of years of evolution, feathered dinosaurs could have experimented with flight in different ways, with some becoming flightless again and some going extinct. If Microraptor proves to be a dead-end, then all bets are off on whether flight evolved from the ground, up or the trees, down.  Ken Dial may be right that young birds show how it all began, scrambling to safety with their proto-wings. Or more fossils like  Microraptor could prove Martin and Burnham right about flight evolving from arboreal gliders, though they'll need more evidence than that to persuade other scientists that those gliders were not dinosaurs. We still don't know exactly how it happened, but Microraptor is changing the way people think about the origin of flight. Microraptor is a creature no one expected, but we know of only a tiny fraction of the dinosaurs that once lived. More than 400,000 species may have come and gone in their 175-million-year history. To date, we've found only 1,100, not counting the ones that are still with us today, long after the extinction of their ancestors. On NOVA's Four-Winged Dinosaur Web site, compare the skeletons of ancient feathered animals and learn more about the evolution of flight. Find it at PBS.org.  Every so often, a giant emerges on the stage of science, someone who transcends the narrow boundaries of a particular line of research and alters our perspective of the world. Ed Wilson is such a man. His early fascination with ants launched a dazzling scientific career that led him to lift his eyes from the ground to explain the grand scheme of life itself.  Ed Wilson believes human beings have an instinctive affinity for living things. He even invented a word for it
 "biophilia." It's what draws us to places like Central Park. Beneath the leaves, he imagines a subterranean labyrinth inhabited by micromonsters. An orabitid mite feeds off a fungal thread. A millipede is a lumbering giant in this world; tiny mites can hitch a ride on its back.  But the creature that has inspired Ed Wilson throughout his life is one of the most abundant and highly organized insects on the planet
 the ant. He's a scientist with over 400 published papers, but he writes like a poet. What sets him apart is his unified picture of life. He explores the continuum that extends from subatomic particles and chemical interactions to consciousness and culture. Ed Wilson's imagination thrives on chance discoveries. As a child he was always on the lookout for strange life forms. But a cruel act of fate would determine his future as a naturalist. Like many boys, he had a passion for fishing. By choosing an insect with so many different species and such highly organized societies, he had unwittingly set off down a path that would determine his own evolution as a biologist. For three years, he traveled around the world, collecting specimens from tropical islands, just as Charles Darwin had done in his early twenties.  For decades, he's been collecting ants from one particular genus, a group of closely-related species called Pheidole.  Ed Wilson has discovered 344 of over 600 identified species in this single genus, Pheidole. It took over two decades to identify and compile all the specimens that make up this tombstone of a book. He drew each of the 5,000 meticulous illustrations himself. This is the culmination of a lifetime's devotion to ants. Much later, they became friends, but even while they were enemies, Watson inspired Wilson to use chemistry to unravel complex evolutionary problems, such as how ants coordinate their activities. He devised an artificial nest with Plexiglas®  chambers and galleries, so he could observe the behavior of ants in a colony. The breakthrough came when he noticed the ants laid an invisible trail as they searched for food. He was about to decipher the chemical language of ants. Ed Wilson realized that the code for the chemicals that determined the ants' behavior must be written in their genes. If this were true for ants, then perhaps the behavior of other animals might also have a genetic basis. Ed Wilson set himself a daunting task
 to investigate the origins of all animal behavior, from ants to monkeys, right through to the most social of all primates, humans. He even invented a name for this new discipline
 "sociobiology."  The island is home to over 900 rhesus macaques. They were introduced here, from India, in the 1930s, to provide a breeding colony for medical research.  Field studies like this revealed the complex behavior of non-human primates. When he was here in the '50s, Ed Wilson began to make comparisons among insect societies. He found the island was home to some large termite colonies.  It was on this island that Ed Wilson first began to wrestle with the question of why these creatures acted as they did. Why did monkeys look after each other's interests? And why would a termite put itself at risk to protect the nest? This type of altruism did not seem compatible with the theory of natural selection, where only the fittest survived. Back in the '70s, the received wisdom was that human behavior was a product of how we were reared, a purely environmental phenomenon. To suggest it was in some way genetically programmed was heresy.  Ed Wilson's closest colleague, fellow ant man Bert Hí¶lldobler, leapt to his defense. Undeterred by these attacks, Ed Wilson continued to develop his ideas on human sociobiology in another provocative book, On Human Nature.  Back in 1965, Ed Wilson teamed up with a mathematician-turned-biologist, Daniel Simberloff, to carry out an experiment. They wanted to work out how the number of species an isolated island could support depended on the island's size and distance from the mainland.  After fumigating the island, they returned every couple of weeks to check which species had come back. Today the old buddies return to the site of their mini-apocalypse. After several years of experimenting, they were able to answer some fundamental questions about life on islands. This work provided important scientific evidence to back Ed Wilson's campaign to preserve habitats for the world's endangered species. It confirmed that the smaller the area of land, the fewer the number of species it could support, and the higher the risk of extinction.  The world's species are not spread out evenly. Around 50 percent are found on just two or three percent of the Earth's surface. Some places, like the Dominican Republic, are rich in species found nowhere else in the world and have been designated biodiversity hotspots.  To maintain such biodiversity, Ed Wilson has become an active campaigner to protect what's left of the world's endangered ecosystems. The Dominican Republic has been successful in creating reserves. The same is not true of its neighbor on the island of Hispaniola. The islands of the Caribbean are among 34 biodiversity hotspots around the world that represent the most threatened reservoirs of plant and animal life.  Ed Wilson's dream of listing every living species on the planet is now starting to be realized. The Smithsonian, Harvard University and several other institutions are pooling their resources to create a complete Encyclopedia of Life, with over 1.8 million entries. Naturalists will be able to compare minute differences and to establish the evolutionary pedigrees of any form of life. For Ed Wilson, it is the culmination of a lifetime's fascination with the vast diversity of life, the "macroscope" that he always wanted to go with his microscope. Ed Wilson has lived through several revolutions in biology. Now, it seems, the DNA demons that haunted him in the '60s, have been transformed into guardian angels, as genetics helps unravel evolutionary history.  On NOVA's Lord of the Ants Web site, hear from E.O. Wilson on how a pivotal childhood experience helped shape his career. Find it on PBS.org.  Just across the Golden Gate Bridge from San Francisco, there is a hospital unlike any other. While its patients are bright, appealing and furry, they are also a critical barometer of the decline of our oceans. It's not all that easy. For this sea lion, the story has a happy ending. A month later he is sighted sunning himself on a San Francisco pier, and the entanglement had fallen off. But for hundreds of animals along the California coast, this hospital makes the difference between life and death. Pier 39
 San Francisco's famous tourist attraction and home to hundreds of playful California sea lions. But while they captivate the tourists here, not far away, others are in danger. And each spring, like clockwork, many start hitting the beaches in distress. The response that is launched is one of the most compelling wild animal rescue operations in America. This is the Marine Mammal Center, based in Sausalito, California. It dispatches rescue teams along the Northern California coast to save sick and dying animals. And while the beaches are beautiful, the condition of the animals on them can be heartbreaking. This call is from Pebble Beach, near Monterey, for an elephant seal that is weak and near death. Wood boards are used to corral the pups and protect the rescuers. Even a weak wild animal can still put up quite a fight. Every day brings new animals, during the busy spring season. Some are easily reached on the beaches, but the rescue teams must head out to where the injured animals are. Some are caught in marinas. Others are on the dangerous rock jetties of Monterey Bay. These rescues require specially trained dive teams. The sick animals are then transported to an ocean-side hospital in Sausalito. This hospital has an E.R., an I.C.U., and even treats infants. And instead of beds, each patient has a pool. The cafeteria specializes in raw fish. Once checked in, every animal gets a full veterinary workup. Frances Gulland is the chief veterinarian. Gulland and her team are on the front lines of marine animal medicine and believe they are witnessing devastating changes in the ecology of our oceans. When these animals show up at the E.R., many are at serious risk. Only about 50 percent will survive. The next few weeks will be crucial for Ouzel. X-rays are ordered and this pup, barely a week old, is given anesthesia. A day in the life of this ocean E.R. is much like that at any busy city hospital
 Part high-end science... ...part three-ring circus. While the doctors treat the sick, Shelbi Stoudt mans the phones. A seal is spotted on the beach just below the Center. Instead of waiting for the crew on duty, Shelbi jumps into action. At four-feet-seven, she's smaller than many of the animals she needs to rescue, but she says her size is an advantage. As suspected, it's another malnourished elephant seal pup. The green mark on her head indicates that she may have been in trouble before, and there is a sore on her neck they will have to investigate. After the mom leaves, pups like this must survive off their own blubber, until they figure out how to eat on their own. The ones that need to be rescued just haven't made it. Given that this is Mother Nature's way for the elephant seals, is it appropriate to intervene? Rescuing and caring for these animals costs millions of dollars a year, all paid by charitable contributions. Naming animals here is kind of a game. Each year themes develop. One year it was cocktails—Martini, Mimosa and Mojito have come and gone. This year it's all about family. Once an animal has been stabilized and seen by the vets, they are fed. And what do you feed a baby seal? A fish milkshake, of course, made from a combination of ground up herring and animal baby formula. The bulk of the work at the Marine Mammal Center is provided by a remarkable group of volunteers, all trained in basic marine animal care. The goal with all these animals is to get them into good enough shape to go back into the sea, but to be released they must be a healthy weight and eating fish on their own. Surprisingly, most of these animals have no instinct to eat fish and must learn, just like a baby human. Raya Smith was particularly well trained for this job. She worked for years as an elementary school special ed teacher. Our pup, Ouzel, hasn't quite gotten it, which puts him at serious risk. This California sea lion was entangled in some floating ocean garbage, which cut deeply into his head. Entanglements like these are common for ocean animals, in part because they're so smart and curious. But entanglements are a particularly gruesome example of how pollution can be deadly in the ocean. Healthy animals are released as soon as possible, so they don't become too used to humans. Only about half of the hospital's patients make it to a successful release. Each one that does is a small victory for the Center's volunteers. Back at the hospital, the animals keep coming in. Some are dropped off at the door, literally. This is Duchamp. It looks like the tumor goes deep inside his jaw. A deformity like this cannot be fixed for a wild animal and would make him too vulnerable to predators. Every animal that dies here is given a complete post mortem exam. Tissue samples are taken as part of an ongoing analysis of the health of these animal populations and the declining conditions of our oceans. But finding out what factors have changed in our oceans cannot happen only in a hospital with sick animals. Understanding their normal healthy behavior is essential. Graduate student, Melinda Fowler has located a six-year-old female with a flipper tag showing that she was born here. It's an indication that she is likely to return, so the team can retrieve their satellite receiver, if they can get it on in the first place. The seal is given a sedative and, in about 15 minutes, is much less concerned about what's going on. The team takes advantage of the elephant seal's easygoing, drug- induced condition to get a few vital measurements... ...including her length, girth and weight. So how do you weigh a full grown elephant seal? You deploy a lot of grad students. If you look at them lying on the beach, the life of these animals seems pretty lazy, but the data recorders tell a whole different story. This is one of the longest animal migrations anywhere in the world, made in order to find enough food. Each seal does it alone every year and usually returns to the exact same beach. It's hard to believe that a little pup like Your Sister or Ouzel, who are just learning to eat fish, should someday be able to swim halfway across the Pacific and back. All of the animals are observed daily, by the volunteers. Records are kept of their behavior, what they eat and how much weight they gain. There are daily rounds, just like in a human hospital, where abnormal cases are discussed. Deb Wickham oversees the animals' daily care and is often the first to notice a problem. Xilia is a harbor seal pup, on the surface, like any other. But something is not quite right. So far, this season, Xilia has been getting a lot of medical attention. She was x-rayed a few weeks ago, here at the Center, to see if there was something obstructing her esophagus. But nothing was found. This is a first for the Marine Mammal Center. A few years ago, there was a similar case to Xilia's. As the images come through, the power of this technology becomes clear. It's like a full dissection without ever touching the patient. The early analysis of the CAT scan is encouraging. There are no glaring abnormalities. But from a treatment point of view, that's frustrating, too. Sometimes animals at the Center die, and the cause is never known. In Xilia's case, they'll keep observing her, hoping for clues that might save her. This time, the doctors believe they know what is causing the symptoms. It's a problem they've been seeing every year, since 1998. What Gulland saw were sea lions, mostly adults, in serious trouble. Many had already died along the beaches. A team was quickly assembled to investigate. The poison Gulland found in their bodies was a substance called domoic acid that is known to come from a certain kind of toxic algae. David Caron, an oceanographer at the University of Southern California, is an expert on ocean algae called phytoplankton, the single-cell organism that can be found in every teaspoon of seawater. Somewhere in all these millions of organisms was the killer. Caron and his lab team filter gallons of seawater weekly to try to isolate the particular variety of phytoplankton that produces domoic acid. Once the poison was isolated, the pieces fell quickly into place. It turned out that Gulland was seeing the effects of brain damage. Domoic acid was literally burning holes in the sea lions' brains. The key test for domoic acid poisoning is an E.E.G., or electroencephalogram. This understanding came, in part, from radio tags that were put on sea lions that had domoic acid poisoning but were returned to the wild. So what causes these outbreaks of domoic acid poisoning? David Caron's work shows that human sewage and the runoff of fertilizers from farms increases phytoplankton in the ocean. This satellite map shows that connection. Caron has compared the location of this runoff with the concentration of phytoplankton in the water. What factors in this runoff are causing an increase in domoic acid is the question Caron is now trying to answer. And with each year, that question become more urgent. Frighteningly, domoic acid can affect humans, too, because it's concentrated in filter-feeding fish, like sardines and mussels, which both people and sea lions like to eat. And sea lions like Sardine are suffering the consequences. The damage clearly shows up on her E.E.G. As the spring progresses, the patients at the Marine Mammal Center begin to change over. The elephant seal pups that came in early are getting ready to leave. Our pup, Ouzel, has finally gotten the knack of fishing. Your Sister has gotten good and fat. Others are young pups who've not quite made it on their own. Jennifer is part of an all-out effort to protect a very special mom and pup. A few weeks ago, this Hawaiian monk seal hauled out on this beach to give birth to the little pup on the left. It is estimated that there are just under 1,200 Hawaiian monk seals left on Earth. With so few, each one becomes critical to the survival of the species. Recently, another Hawaiian monk seal pup was found, abandoned by its mother, on the island of Kauai. The pup was rescued, flown to Honolulu, and placed under quarantine in this National Marine Fisheries building. There has never been a newborn Hawaiian monk seal, this young, successfully rescued. Gulland hopes this time it will be different. Instead, we asked one of the staff there to film the midday feeding for us. After the midday tubing, we get another firsthand report. Saving these animals depends upon understanding each species' unique biology and developing effective treatments. It is the daily routine that makes all the difference. There is a new research project under way this summer, and Duchamp and the others have been fitted with tiny satellite tags. Their whereabouts can now be tracked via the internet. Before the last Ice Age, great mammals ruled the plains of North America
 woolly mammoths, saber-tooth cats and other extraordinary animals.  But then, suddenly, they disappeared, and nobody really knows why. Did humans kill them off?  Or was their fate more like the one we face today with our climate in crisis? Or was it something from outer space? And scientists are fighting over the meaning of startling, new discoveries. NOVA wades into the thick of this controversy in hopes of finding the answer. This is science in action; the stakes are high, the outcome uncertain. Right now, on NOVA, go inside the investigation to solve the mystery of this Last Extinction. Thirteen-thousand years ago, the Earth's climate was not unlike ours today. But then, suddenly, it changed radically. It was mysteriously thrown back into the Ice Age, and some of the greatest animals that have ever lived vanished
 enormous creatures including the woolly mammoth, like a modern elephant, with thick fur and huge tusks; and the saber-toothed cat, a vicious predator, built more like a bear than a lion.  Gary Haynes, an archeologist at the University of Nevada, Reno, studies the remains of these animals, and their modern relatives, to try and figure out what happened to this incredible diversity of animal life.  In all there were between 15 and 35 types of large mammals that went extinct suddenly, including giant sloths, which could be as tall as a giraffe with the girth of an elephant. There were some wonderfully odd creatures, too, like the glyptodont. Geologist James Kennett is also fascinated by what killed off these animals, and several of the discoveries throughout his career help illuminate the mystery. It is such a long-standing passion that he, in fact, wrote about it in his very first scientific textbook, at age 11. But there is nothing stupid, Kennett says, in trying to figure out why these large mammals disappeared, especially today when humans worry about changes in our environment.  The extinction of these animals has perplexed scientists for centuries, but today there is a controversial new theory that might just explain it. This extinction boundary, plainly visible in this riverbed in southern Arizona near the Mexican border, shows up right under an ominous dark layer of earth, formed by decayed plants and algae. It is called the "black mat."  In the past three years, West has dug into his retirement savings, shipping boxes of dirt to colleagues around the world, trying to solve the mystery. West has become his very own FedEx hub of Ice Age dirt. As the evidence mounted, the verdict seemed inescapable. An asteroid from outer space wiped out the dinosaurs. The era of giant beasts that had ruled the Earth for millions of years ended with a bang.  Allen West and James Kennett are part of a growing team of scientists that are analyzing this new evidence, and now propose that 12,900 years ago, a comet slammed into the Earth. This cosmic catastrophe would have devastated the great land animals. Surely such a bad day would leave behind obvious evidence, like this impact crater from 50,000 years ago. But, so far, no crater has been found, and that means the impact team needs to find other compelling proof. And they are now going to the ends of the earth to do so, including here at the Greenland ice sheet. These glaciers are like giant computer hard drives filled with icy data, including ancient microscopic dust.  Somewhere in the enormous Greenland ice sheet is the very snow and dust that fell when mammoths walked the Earth, and, possibly, the chemical trace evidence of a cosmic impact that wiped them out. But how can you possibly find that specific layer of ice? And that is why Mayewski is working with J.P. Steffensen, a Danish scientist who knows this glacier as well as anyone in the world. The layer of ice they are looking for is located between two distinct features caused by Ice Age conditions. Glaciers preserve snow in annual layers, which can be clearly visible, much like tree rings. At the edges of the Greenland ice sheet, these layers get exposed. It's similar to the way layers of Earth are exposed at the black mat.  Steffensen has analyzed this area and found evidence of ice from this mysterious period. Using these color differences, he zeros in on a slope with both colors of ice.  This is science in action and also a very long way to come on a guess, even an educated one. But confirming if this is indeed the right spot will take a sophisticated molecular analysis, which can only be done back in the lab. For now, the job is to collect the samples and hope they're in the right spot. Mayewski and Kurbatov cut a 17-meter trench down the hillside into these exposed layers, from the more recent ice, to older ice, deep into the Ice Age. Samples are taken in 15-centimeter sections. That way any change in the levels of extraterrestrial materials, like iridium, will show up. Many different samples are needed. Specially cleaned bottles are used to collect ice to analyze for the presence of iridium. Other samples are collected to test for oxygen isotopes that can help determine the exact age of the ice. And finally, chunks of ice are taken to see if there are other trapped clues that could be the fingerprint of a cosmic catastrophe.  Physicist Mark Boslough analyzes impacts of comets and asteroids. He says one way to evaluate if there was a devastating impact is to calculate the statistical probabilities of it happening. And the odds don't look good. Boslough uses some of the Department of Energy's most powerful supercomputers to model the physics of various cosmic impacts and mid-air explosions... ...and is able to show clearly their devastating power.  Boslough says that while an event like this would certainly devastate the environment and the great animals, he thinks there are far simpler explanations.  Could there be a more down to earth explanation for these mysterious extinctions? Possibly, and to understand them, it is important to investigate what the Earth looked like at that time. And that is the work that Vance Haynes, a legendary archeologist from the University of Arizona, has done.  These sleek, stone weapons were a major advance in hunting technology.  Haynes' excavations at the black mat proved that the Clovis people hunted the mammoth and other animals here, right up until they disappeared.  Efforts to explain this mystery have led to some very peculiar clues.  Jim King, the former director of the Carnegie Museum of Natural History, says the sloth dung is a goldmine of evidence about how these animals lived and possibly died. The manure, discovered in a cave, piled five feet high, is high in carbon and therefore makes for perfect radio carbon dating. The last manure in this cave  More recent history supports this theory. In Mauritius, the arrival of the Dutch doomed the dodo, and in New Zealand, the first settlers killed off the moa. But could this also have happened to these great animals all across North America? Kennett says the idea that primitive humans killed off these powerful animals is absurd, and while it might happen in small island environments, it is impossible to imagine they could wreak such havoc on a continent as vast as North America. If the human overkill theory, as it's called, cannot provide the whole answer, what else can?             This is not the first expedition that Paul Mayewski has made to these glaciers in search of evidence. In the 1990s Mayewski drilled into the center of the Greenland ice sheet and extracted ice cores going back more than 200,000 years to understand how the world's climate changed. At the time, nobody thought to test for impact markers like iridium, but what they did find was remarkable. In possibly less than two years, the annual temperatures in North America dropped up to 18 degrees Fahrenheit, which may not sound like a lot, but the last time it got that cold in what is present-day Chicago, it was buried under a mile of ice. Gary Haynes says that's true, but there were other similar periods of climate change, and these animals survived. Why would this one kill them off? He believes that while climate may have played a role, man was ultimately responsible.  The disappearance of the great land mammals is one of the most dramatic and recent extinction events in Earth's history, the last extinction. It also happens to be the time when the Clovis artifacts disappear from the record. So are Allen West, Jim Wittke, a geologist, and Ted Bunch, who is retired from NASA. One of the most intriguing discoveries, so far, is buried in the spherules. Inside the carbon structures, the impact team has found something that was as thrilling to a scientist as it would be to a young bride, diamonds, nano-scale diamonds to be exact.  These nanodiamonds can be so small that one million of them could be squeezed inside a single grain of sand.  All geology jokes aside, it is an important discovery.  Exactly how these nanodiamonds are formed is poorly understood. The team has discovered several different kinds. But is this necessarily so? Mark Boslough says that we don't know enough about the formation of nanodiamonds, but if they are the indicator of an impact, where is the crater?  When the dinosaur-killing asteroid theory was proposed, no one could find a crater either. But then, more than a decade later they did, mostly underwater, and it confirmed the early iridium findings.              So far, no one has found a crater from the extinction of the large land animals. A small glass pellet is used as the bullet in the gun, and it simulates the cosmic projectile.  In this test, Schultz wants to know what would happen if the object from outer space, or the glass bullet, broke into thousands of pieces before hitting the Earth, an idea inspired by the 1994 comet Shoemaker Levy that broke apart before impacting into Jupiter.  High-speed cameras capture the impact and stop the action at up to an astonishing one million frames per second.  This is the massive crater a single impact would form
 pretty obvious. So, what size crater would show up if the same size comet broke up into thousands of smaller objects? A second scenario is that the comet, or at least a major part of it, would have slammed into the Ice Age glacier that covered a large part of North America at that time. That can be simulated here with the impact gun, using a large piece of ice. An impact into the glacier could be another way to explain the lack of a crater, but the burden of proof still lies with the comet theory team, and their strongest evidence, the nanodiamonds, is under attack. So now a troubling new question has emerged
 when did these nanodiamonds appear? Did they rain in slowly, or appear all at once? Fortunately that is exactly what the glaciers, and their amazing library of information, can answer. A modern example of this will be smoke from the recent California wildfires. This satellite picture shows how it rises into the atmosphere. Eventually that smoke will make its way to Greenland and be captured in the top layer in the ice sheet. This glacier is, in effect, a safety deposit box with a date recorded of when it was sealed off.             Remember how samples were taken across thousands of layers of ice history to see if there is a spike in iridium, carbon spherules or nanodiamonds? Now, back at Mayewski's Climate Change Institute at the University of Maine, the field samples are run through different tests. It looks like Mayewski, Steffenson and Kurbatov found the ice from when these large mammals vanished.  This iridium is a tantalizing clue, but, just like at the black mat, there's no smoking gun, because the levels are low. Now it comes down to the nanodiamonds, which are also the hardest to process. Searching through samples from a 17-meter trench for evidence that is a million times smaller than a grain of sand is a very, very painstaking process. That job fell to Allen West. When the meticulous work is finally done, and West has managed to prepare samples for the transmission electron microscope, NOVA asked Paul Mayewski to join James Kennett and materials scientist Chris Mercer, at U.C. Santa Barbara to have a first look at the evidence.             The first sample they look at is from the suspected time of the extinctions. Mercer conducts a test to see if these particles are diamonds. A beam of electrons is shot into them, which casts a series of rings. Each crystal structure scatters the beam in a unique way, forming an identifiable pattern. Immediately, a familiar pattern shows up. These black specks are nanodiamonds in an extraordinary concentration in this one slide.  For James Kennett this moment of discovery becomes overwhelming.  So far, the nanodiamonds have been found only in the layers of ice around the time of the extinctions, a clear indication that they did not rain out of the atmosphere over a long period of time. Each new finding bolsters the theory that a comet wiped out the great land mammals 12,900 years ago.  On NOVA's Web site, watch video extras, examine a collection of beautiful Clovis artifacts and try your hand at identifying ancient stone tools. Find it on PBS.org. On this island, there lives a hunter that smells its prey with its tongue, that will ambush pigs, deer, even people, tearing them apart. It looks primitive, like a dinosaur, though it's not. But could there be a side to monitors we've missed? That they're not only cunning, clever and fearless, but in some cases downright cuddly? Hungry, sometimes, not for a meal, but a pat or a bath? Lizards as you've never seen them, up next on NOVA
 Lizard Kings.  Beneath Central Australia's great deserts, eggs, still and silent for nearly nine months, are showing signs of life. But no doting mother attends the new arrivals. They either make it out of their shells or not, either gain mastery of their bodies, or die trying. And die they well might.  Known as the "Lizard Man," American biologist Dr. Eric Pianka is a world authority on lizard ecology. He's combed through the globe's deserts for over 40 years, but he's found no better place for his field studies than Red Sands, his research site in the Great Victoria Desert of Western Australia. Red Sands is teeming with skinks, geckoes and monitor lizards of all sizes. And on this trip, Eric will try new ways to get inside the monitors' mind. But finding them is no easy task, even for the Lizard Man. With these pit traps, Dr. Pianka and his field assistant, Stephen Goodyear, catch many of the smaller ground-dwellers. In the past 20 years, Eric's pits have trapped more than 18,000 lizards. It's the most comprehensive survey of a lizard community anywhere in the world. Being top predators, monitor lizards hunt down anything smaller than they are, even their own kin. And in a place too hot and dry for most mammals, these lizards rule. They rival many mammals as cunning hunters. The Red Sands camp is about 250 miles from civilization, and they've been out here for more than two months of searing desert winds and the ever-present bush flies. Eric has been coming here for almost half a century, making his study of the Red Sands lizards unique. It's only long-term data like his that enables us to recognize changes in an ecosystem and understand the local effects of climate change. And soon, Eric will get visitors. He'll be helping them launch a cutting-edge project, one that could give him new insights into the monitors' notoriously secretive lives. Eric's collaborators, Christian Rutz and Lucas Bluff, decide to try the new invention before reaching his camp in Red Sands.  This large specimen is used to having people around, making him an ideal test candidate. He's big enough to carry Lizardcam and should quickly recover from all the high-tech fuss.  The camera sends live pictures back to a mobile receiver and has a radio tag, so it can be found later. And they're all set. It's Lizardcam's world premiere. With Lizardcam up and running, they can see things from a monitor's perspective.  For the first time they see what it sees.  And this means the camera should drop off rather than trap its host. Trial and error is the only way to improve Lizardcam's design. Monitors like this one prefer roaming on the ground, or so it was thought. To see this species climbing is a revelation. The next discoveries will be at Eric's camp in Red Sands. In fact, they're just as fierce as their bigger cousins. In contrast to this tiny hunter, in Indonesia, real-life dragons rule entire islands. And they truly are giants. Up to ten feet long and weighing as much as 200 pounds, the largest Komodo dragons are not only the biggest monitors, but also the biggest lizards now walking the planet.  London Zoo was one of the first in the world to exhibit Komodo dragons, in 1927.  Raja demands caution. He's ten years old but still a youngster, and each day Ian needs to stimulate his natural curiosity. Incredibly, this fearsome beast can be as docile as a puppy. But when it comes to food, he has a dragon's appetite, albeit a semi-tamed dragon. Atypically for a reptile, Raja is responding to training routines you'd expect to see with intelligent mammals. There are even reports of dragons playing, behavior previously unheard of in reptiles. Observing how smart monitors are in the wild is a bigger challenge. But today, the sand monitor might have just run out of luck. But given the sand monitor's stamina, even a fresh trail can stretch for miles. While the hide and seek continues at Red Sands, up in Australia's tropical north, Lizard Kings leave hardly any tracks behind. Back at Red Sands, Eric's found the hideout of his lizard thief. Now he has to get him out. Monitors are a class vanishing act. They disappear from view in an instant, and they build their homes to confuse other predators and, of course, lizard hunters. Eric has to be careful. There could be all kinds of venomous creatures down there. Two hours of digging, and they can almost smell their quarry. The sand monitor is a prize catch, but Eric wasn't the first to get to him. This Lizard King is about to make history. Soon he'll be carrying Red Sands' first Lizardcam. While Lizardcam reveals the monitors' tactics in the wild, at the University of Tennessee, biopsychologist Dr. Gordon Burghardt is investigating their intelligence, in the lab.  Checkmate to the Lizard King might be premature, so Dr. Burghardt's team has begun with something simpler
 a test to see whether monitors can discriminate between different objects. Like the Komodo at London Zoo, Milo is trained to respond to a target to get a reward.  All of Dr. Burghardt's monitors take to the training easily.  Now the monitors face two new challenges. First, they can't see their trainers and nothing in the arena moves, so there are no obvious cues as to what to do. Will they remember?  Second, they can see two balls
 the black one they know and a new white one. Will they tell the colors apart?  Rather than being thrown by the sterile lab environment, these monitors are focused and show an ability to think ahead, which is exceptional for a reptile.  Intelligence is about learning, and the ability to adapt quickly to new experiences, in the lab and in the wild. The Lizardcam team have arrived and they're fitting Eric's freshly caught sand monitor with a made-to-order video camera and radio tag. Cooled down for easier handling, the sand monitor takes the fitting in stride. Now comes the moment of truth. How is this Monitor going to react to its new backpack? Swiftly out of sight, the monitor is up to his old tricks, but Lizardcam is about to reveal just how he pulls off this familiar vanishing act. After 40 years of watching lizards, Eric is seeing, for the first time, what they see, and he's in for a surprise. Sensing the team is hot on his heels, the monitor changes tactics. Sunset is only an hour away and the temperature is dropping.  For a solar-powered reptile, there's only one safe way to go
 down, into a warm hideaway. In just 15 minutes, the monitor has excavated itself a snug refuge.  Already the monitor has made up for stealing Eric's lizards. His camera will be recovered in a few days. Lizardcam has added a new dimension to Eric's research. Other types of disruption, however, are less benign. Climate change and its effect on local weather and vegetation could soon make some lizard species disappear.  As one of his dreams reveals, even Eric's own effect on the lizards leaves him ambivalent. And if it's any defense, probably no one could care about these animals more. On NOVA's Lizard Kings Web site, watch any part of this program, go behind the scenes and more. Find it on PBS.org.